Hawaii, session 2025, HB300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: PART I.  GENERAL PROVISIONS SECTION 1.  SHORT TITLE.  This Act shall be known and may be cited as the General Appropriations Act of 2025. SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS.  Unless otherwise clear from the context, as used in this Act: "Capital project number" means the official number of the capital project, as assigned by the responsible organization. "Expending agency" means the executive department, independent commission, bureau, office, board, or other establishment of the state government (other than the legislature, Office of Hawaiian Affairs, and judiciary), the political subdivisions of the State, or any quasi-public institution supported in whole or in part by state funds, which is authorized to expend specified appropriations made by this Act. Abbreviations where used to denote the expending agency shall mean the following: AGR  Department of Agriculture AGS  Department of Accounting and General Services ATG  Department of the Attorney General BED  Department of Business, Economic Development and Tourism BUF  Department of Budget and Finance CCA  Department of Commerce and Consumer Affairs DEF  Department of Defense EDN  Department of Education GOV  Office of the Governor HHL  Department of Hawaiian Home Lands HMS  Department of Human Services HRD  Department of Human Resources Development HTH  Department of Health LAW  Department of Law Enforcement LBR  Department of Labor and Industrial Relations LNR  Department of Land and Natural Resources LTG  Office of the Lieutenant Governor PSD  Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation SUB  Subsidies TAX  Department of Taxation TRN  Department of Transportation UOH  University of Hawaii CCH  City and County of Honolulu COH  County of Hawaii COK  County of Kauai COM  County of Maui "Means of financing" or "MOF" means the source from which funds are appropriated or authorized to be expended for the programs and projects specified in this Act. All appropriations are followed by letter symbols.  Such letter symbols, where used, shall have the following meanings: A  general funds B  special funds C  general obligation bond fund D  general obligation bond fund with debt service cost to be paid from special funds E  revenue bond funds J  federal aid interstate funds K  federal aid primary funds L  federal aid secondary funds M  federal aid urban funds N  federal funds P  other federal funds R  private contributions S  county funds T  trust funds U  interdepartmental transfers V  American Rescue Plan funds W  revolving funds X  other funds "Position ceiling" means the maximum number of permanent and temporary full-time equivalent positions that an expending agency is authorized for a particular program during a specified period or periods, as denoted by a single asterisk for permanent full-time equivalent positions and a pound sign for temporary full-time equivalent positions. "Program ID" means the unique identifier for the specific program and consists of the abbreviation for the organization responsible for carrying out the program, followed by the organization number for the program. PART II.  PROGRAM APPROPRIATIONS SECTION 3. APPROPRIATIONS.  The following sums, or so much thereof as may be sufficient to accomplish the purposes and programs designated herein, are hereby appropriated or authorized, as the case may be, from the means of financing specified to the expending agencies designated for the fiscal biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.  The total expenditures and the number of positions in each fiscal year of the biennium shall not exceed the sums and the position ceiling indicated for each fiscal year, except as provided elsewhere in this Act, or as provided by general law. A.  ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT 1.   BED100 - STRATEGIC MARKETING AND SUPPORT 10.00*         10.00* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         BED        3,893,040A     3,893,040A BED        1,823,499W     1,823,499W BED          700,000P       700,000P 2.   BED101 - OFFICE OF INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS OPERATING                         BED          400,000A              A INVESTMENT CAPITAL                BED        5,000,000C              C 3.   BED105 - CREATIVE INDUSTRIES DIVISION 15.00*         15.00* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         BED        1,885,986A     1,921,494A BED        1,080,000B     1,080,000B 4.   BED107 - FOREIGN TRADE ZONE 16.00*         16.00* OPERATING                         BED        2,796,043B     2,796,043B 5.   BED142 - GENERAL SUPPORT FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT 26.00*         26.00* 4.00#          4.00# OPERATING                         BED        3,802,604A     3,802,952A 6.   BED113 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY - ADMINISTRATION AND GOVERNANCE 14.00*         14.00* OPERATING                         BED        3,696,660A     3,696,660A BED       26,977,020B    14,000,000B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                BED       36,400,000C              C 7.   BED114 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY - BRANDING AND MARKETING 5.00*          5.00* OPERATING                         BED       39,249,201A    39,249,201A 8.   BED115 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY  SPORTS AND SIGNATURE EVENTS 1.00*          1.00* OPERATING                         BED        7,318,075A     7,318,075A 9.   BED116 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY  DESTINATION STEWARDSHIP AND COMMUNITY 7.00*          7.00* OPERATING                         BED        7,923,883A     7,923,883A 10.  BED117 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY  REGENERATIVE TOURISM DEVELOPMENT 3.00*          3.00* OPERATING                         BED        3,762,181A     3,762,181A 11.  BED118 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY  WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT OPERATING                         BED        1,050,000A     1,050,000A 12.  AGR101 - FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE FOR AGRICULTURE 9.00*          9.00* OPERATING                         AGR          874,338A       874,338A AGR        5,500,000W     5,500,000W 13.  AGR122 - PLANT PEST AND DISEASE CONTROL 143.00*        143.00* OPERATING                         AGR       21,335,989A    21,335,989A AGR        4,130,800B     4,130,800B AGR          512,962T       512,962T AGR          212,095U       212,095U AGR           50,360W        50,360W AGR          365,946P       365,946P 14.  AGR131 - RABIES QUARANTINE 32.32*         32.32* OPERATING                         AGR        4,781,110B     4,781,110B 15.  AGR132 - ANIMAL DISEASE CONTROL 25.68*         25.68* OPERATING                         AGR        3,421,755A     3,352,755A AGR           47,802B        47,802B 1.00#          1.00# AGR          306,941P       306,941P INVESTMENT CAPITAL                AGS        7,000,000C              C 16.  LNR172 - FORESTRY - RESOURCE MANAGEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT 34.00*         34.00* OPERATING                         LNR        8,808,994A     8,808,994A LNR        2,455,475B     2,455,475B 1.00*          1.00* LNR        7,100,000P    10,530,000P 17.  AGR151 - QUALITY AND PRICE ASSURANCE 23.50*         23.50* OPERATING                         AGR        1,826,443A     1,826,443A AGR          109,046B       109,046B AGR          100,000N       100,000N AGR          300,000T       300,000T AGR          186,848W       127,848W AGR          138,624P       138,624P 18.  AGR171 - AGRICULTURAL DEVELOPMENT AND MARKETING 11.00*         11.00* OPERATING                         AGR        1,109,694A     1,067,694A AGR           15,000B        15,000B 0.75*          0.75* AGR        2,051,568N     2,051,568N 1.25*          1.25* AGR        5,289,219P     5,289,219P 19.  AGR141 - AGRICULTURAL RESOURCE MANAGEMENT 26.50*         19.00* OPERATING                         AGR        4,221,136A     1,798,532A 13.50*         13.50* AGR        2,851,320B     2,851,320B *          7.50* AGR        2,747,123W     1,375,787W INVESTMENT CAPITAL                AGR        5,000,000C              C AGR            1,000N              N 20.  AGR192 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION FOR AGRICULTURE 33.00*         32.00* OPERATING                         AGR        5,580,886A     5,556,126A *          1.00* AGR                 P       164,450P INVESTMENT CAPITAL                AGS        1,900,000C     2,200,000C 21.  BED170 - AGRIBUSINESS DEVELOPMENT AND RESEARCH 13.50*         13.50* OPERATING                         BED        4,825,616A     4,823,166A 0.50*          0.50* BED           82,126U        82,126U 2.00*          2.00* 6.00#          6.00# BED       16,259,661W     4,048,264W INVESTMENT CAPITAL                BED      111,201,000C     5,150,000C 22.  AGR153 - AQUACULTURE DEVELOPMENT 7.00*          7.00* OPERATING                         AGR          978,519A       978,519A AGR          125,000B       125,000B 23.  BED120 - HAWAII STATE ENERGY OFFICE 1.00*          1.00* 25.00#         25.00# OPERATING                         BED        2,571,816A     2,571,816A BED          795,000B       795,000B BED        7,146,250T     7,146,250T 24.  BED143 - HAWAII TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION 8.00*          8.00* 4.00#          4.00# OPERATING                         BED        4,701,795A     4,701,795A BED        1,604,258B     1,604,258B BED        2,017,203W     2,017,203W 10.00#         10.00# BED          994,214P       994,214P 25.  BED146 - NATURAL ENERGY LABORATORY OF HAWAII AUTHORITY 17.00#         17.00# OPERATING                         BED        7,929,310B     7,929,310B 26.  BED138 - HAWAII GREEN INFRASTRUCTURE AUTHORITY 7.25#          7.25# OPERATING                         BED       86,633,318B    86,639,653B 1.75#          1.75# BED          444,261P       444,261P 27.  LNR141 - WATER AND LAND DEVELOPMENT 24.00*         24.00* OPERATING                         LNR        3,403,862A     3,403,862A 4.00*          4.00* LNR          907,330B       907,330B LNR          199,479T       199,479T INVESTMENT CAPITAL                LNR        2,000,000C              C 28.  BED150 - HAWAII COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY 13.00*         13.00* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         BED        1,526,750A     1,526,750A 11.00*         11.00* 1.00#          1.00# BED        2,554,972B     2,554,972B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                BED       38,000,000C    29,450,000C 29.  BED160 - HAWAII HOUSING FINANCE AND DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION OPERATING                         BED        3,100,000N     3,100,000N 23.00*         23.00* 48.00#         48.00# BED       16,060,058W    15,889,058W BED        3,000,000P     3,000,000P INVESTMENT CAPITAL                BED      100,000,000C   140,000,000C B.  EMPLOYMENT 1.   LBR111 - WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT 13.10*         13.10* OPERATING                         LBR        6,822,007A     6,822,007A LBR        5,364,646B     5,364,646B 57.20*         57.20* 34.00#         34.00# LBR        6,550,000N     6,550,000N LBR        2,891,173U     2,891,173U 0.70*          0.70* LBR          300,000P       300,000P 2.   LBR135 - WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT COUNCIL OPERATING                         LBR          455,026A       455,026A 7.00*          7.00* LBR       10,700,000N    10,700,000N 3.   LBR171 - UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE PROGRAM 10.00*         10.00* OPERATING                         LBR        1,098,246A     1,098,246A LBR        2,173,756B     2,173,756B 187.50*        187.50* LBR       18,000,000N    18,000,000N LBR      341,400,000T   341,400,000T 4.   LBR903 - OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES 13.00*         13.00* 5.00#          5.00# OPERATING                         LBR        4,971,563A     4,971,563A LBR            5,000B         5,000B 4.00#          4.00# LBR        6,517,000N     6,517,000N INVESTMENT CAPITAL                LBR       20,000,000C              C 5.   HMS802 - VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION 38.73*         38.73* 2.00#          2.00# OPERATING                         HMS        5,056,561A     6,138,995A 73.27*         73.27* HMS       19,176,876N    19,176,876N HMS        2,000,000W     2,000,000W 6.   LBR143 - HAWAII OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH PROGRAM 17.30*         17.30* 0.50#          0.50# OPERATING                         LBR        1,393,204A     1,393,204A 19.00*         19.00* LBR        2,746,105W     2,746,105W 19.70*         19.70* LBR        2,400,000P     2,400,000P 7.   LBR152 - WAGE STANDARDS PROGRAM 20.00*         20.00* OPERATING                         LBR        1,383,835A     1,442,931A LBR          500,000B       500,000B 8.   LBR153 - HAWAII CIVIL RIGHTS COMMISSION 22.50*         22.50* OPERATING                         LBR        1,843,633A     1,843,633A 0.50*          0.50* 5.00#          5.00# LBR          350,000P       350,000P 9.   LBR183 - DISABILITY COMPENSATION PROGRAM 77.00*         77.00* OPERATING                         LBR        8,679,642A     9,039,187A 11.00*         11.00* 5.00#          5.00# LBR       24,157,551T    24,157,551T 10.  LBR161 - HAWAII LABOR RELATIONS BOARD 3.00*          3.00* 7.00#          7.00# OPERATING                         LBR        1,138,087A     1,138,087A 11.  LBR812 - LABOR AND INDUSTRIAL RELATIONS APPEALS BOARD 12.00*         12.00* OPERATING                         LBR        1,209,410A     1,209,410A 12.  LBR901 - RESEARCH AND STATISTICS 2.00*          2.00* OPERATING                         LBR          178,081A       178,081A 4.00*          4.00* 1.00#          1.00# LBR          440,322N       440,322N 13.  LBR902 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION 18.83*         18.83* 3.46#          3.46# OPERATING                         LBR        3,937,790A     2,912,790A LBR          200,000B       200,000B 32.17*         32.17* 1.54#          1.54# LBR        6,000,000P     6,000,000P C.  TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES 1.   TRN102 - DANIEL K. INOUYE INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT 661.00*        661.00* 15.00#         15.00# OPERATING                         TRN      283,790,642B   285,933,581B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                TRN       17,061,000E    26,760,000E TRN            1,000N         1,000N 2.   TRN104 - GENERAL AVIATION 31.00*         31.00* OPERATING                         TRN       19,811,421B    17,928,307B 3.   TRN111 - HILO INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT 85.00*         85.00* 2.00#          2.00# OPERATING                         TRN       26,440,201B    28,974,929B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                TRN       26,000,000E              E TRN            1,000N              N 4.   TRN114 - ELLISON ONIZUKA KONA INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT AT KEAHOLE 110.00*        110.00* 3.00#          3.00# OPERATING                         TRN       34,282,904B    34,549,166B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                TRN      137,045,000E              E TRN       10,000,000N              N 5.   TRN116 - WAIMEA-KOHALA AIRPORT 4.00*          4.00* OPERATING                         TRN        1,338,058B     1,339,121B 6.   TRN118 - UPOLU AIRPORT OPERATING                         TRN           51,100B        51,100B 7.   TRN131 - KAHULUI AIRPORT 183.00*        183.00* 4.00#          4.00# OPERATING                         TRN       52,283,111B    52,419,747B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                TRN       52,250,000E    57,500,000E TRN        5,000,000N              N 8.   TRN133 - HANA AIRPORT 3.00*          3.00* OPERATING                         TRN          762,108B       762,525B 9.   TRN135 - KAPALUA AIRPORT 12.00*         12.00* OPERATING                         TRN        3,133,189B     3,135,770B 10.  TRN141 - MOLOKAI AIRPORT 14.00*         14.00* OPERATING                         TRN        3,993,273B     3,998,586B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                TRN        6,230,000E              E TRN        2,000,000N              N 11.  TRN143 - KALAUPAPA AIRPORT 2.00*          2.00* OPERATING                         TRN          520,929B       520,929B 12.  TRN151 - LANAI AIRPORT 14.00*         14.00* OPERATING                         TRN        4,575,622B     4,584,732B 13.  TRN161 - LIHUE AIRPORT 115.00*        115.00* 3.00#          3.00# OPERATING                         TRN       32,974,694B    33,055,875B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                TRN        9,225,000E     5,140,000E TRN            1,000N     4,600,000N 14.  TRN163 - PORT ALLEN AIRPORT OPERATING                         TRN            1,841B         1,841B 15.  TRN195 - AIRPORTS ADMINISTRATION 135.00*        135.00* OPERATING                         TRN      476,268,398B   467,112,227B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                TRN        7,500,000B     7,500,000B TRN      294,381,000E   751,666,000E TRN        1,802,000N    60,002,000N TRN      301,200,000X       200,000X 16.  TRN301 - HONOLULU HARBOR 104.00*        104.00* OPERATING                         TRN       33,294,730B    33,212,670B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                TRN       24,992,000B    39,992,000B TRN            4,000N         4,000N TRN            4,000R         4,000R 17.  TRN303 - KALAELOA BARBERS POINT HARBOR 6.00*          6.00* OPERATING                         TRN        2,258,009B     2,252,332B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                TRN            4,000B    34,992,000B TRN            4,000N         4,000N TRN            4,000R         4,000R 18.  TRN311 - HILO HARBOR 15.00*         15.00* OPERATING                         TRN        4,733,388B     4,728,916B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                TRN            4,000B    44,992,000B TRN            4,000N         4,000N TRN            4,000R         4,000R 19.  TRN313 - KAWAIHAE HARBOR 2.00*          2.00* OPERATING                         TRN        2,585,678B     2,585,027B 20.  TRN331 - KAHULUI HARBOR 19.00*         19.00* OPERATING                         TRN        6,732,925B     6,725,038B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                TRN            4,000B     9,992,000B TRN            4,000N         4,000N TRN            4,000R         4,000R 21.  TRN341 - KAUNAKAKAI HARBOR 1.00*          1.00* OPERATING                         TRN          834,558B       834,216B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                TRN            4,000B         4,000B TRN            4,000N         4,000N TRN            4,000R         4,000R 22.  TRN361 - NAWILIWILI HARBOR 15.00*         15.00* OPERATING                         TRN        4,579,638B     4,570,717B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                TRN        9,992,000B     4,992,000B TRN            4,000N         4,000N TRN            4,000R         4,000R 23.  TRN363 - PORT ALLEN HARBOR 1.00*          1.00* OPERATING                         TRN          255,870B       255,379B 24.  TRN351 - KAUMALAPAU HARBOR 1.00*          1.00* OPERATING                         TRN          514,295B       511,891B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                TRN            4,000B     1,992,000B TRN            4,000N         4,000N TRN            4,000R         4,000R 25.  TRN395 - HARBORS ADMINISTRATION 72.00*         72.00* OPERATING                         TRN      122,924,440B   103,372,371B TRN       25,000,000N    25,000,000N INVESTMENT CAPITAL                TRN       17,492,000B    17,492,000B TRN            4,000N         4,000N TRN            4,000R         4,000R 26.  TRN333 - HANA HARBOR OPERATING                         TRN           13,519B        13,519B 27.  TRN501 - OAHU HIGHWAYS 184.00*        184.00* OPERATING                         TRN       97,979,039B    98,253,732B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                TRN        5,445,000C              C TRN       14,898,000E       800,000E TRN       22,134,000N     3,200,000N 28.  TRN511 - HAWAII HIGHWAYS 117.50*        117.50* OPERATING                         TRN       25,508,570B    25,522,385B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                TRN        4,500,000E     4,800,000E TRN                 N    19,200,000N TRN        1,000,000S              S 29.  TRN531 - MAUI HIGHWAYS 90.00*         90.00* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         TRN       28,978,093B    28,041,366B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                TRN        1,000,000B              B TRN        5,000,000E       100,000E TRN        4,001,000N       400,000N 30.  TRN561 - KAUAI HIGHWAYS 60.00*         60.00* OPERATING                         TRN       15,191,701B    14,943,899B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                TRN        1,000,000E     5,200,000E TRN        4,000,000N    20,800,000N 31.  TRN595 - HIGHWAYS ADMINISTRATION OPERATING                         TRN       20,000,000A              A 520.50*        520.50* 3.00#          3.00# TRN      229,186,637B   207,904,208B TRN       15,763,634N    16,213,634N INVESTMENT CAPITAL                TRN       22,721,000B    17,343,000B TRN        1,000,000C              C TRN      156,684,000E   111,324,000E TRN      614,705,000N   426,975,000N TRN          700,000S              S 32.  TRN597 - HIGHWAYS SAFETY 32.20*         32.20* OPERATING                         TRN       12,319,296B    12,319,296B 6.00*          6.00* TRN        6,495,670N     6,495,670N 0.80*          0.80* TRN        1,214,379P     1,214,379P 33.  TRN995 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION OPERATING                         TRN          350,000A              A 110.00*        110.00* 2.00#          2.00# TRN       33,851,577B    34,069,484B 1.00*          1.00* TRN       12,784,696N    12,784,696N TRN          743,067R       743,067R 34.  TRN695 - ALOHA TOWER DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION 1.00*          1.00* OPERATING                         TRN        1,842,580B     1,842,580B D.  ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION 1.   HTH840 - ENVIRONMENTAL MANAGEMENT 90.00*         90.00* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         HTH        7,063,978A     7,379,458A 59.00*         59.00* 4.00#          4.00# HTH       80,891,943B    80,891,943B 33.50*         33.50* 1.00#          1.00# HTH        4,064,084N     4,064,084N 2.00*          2.00* HTH        3,013,024U     3,013,024U 43.00*         43.00* HTH      260,514,599W   260,514,599W 7.25*          7.25* 4.00#          4.00# HTH        8,889,111P     7,998,178P INVESTMENT CAPITAL                HTH       10,995,000C    10,995,000C HTH       54,964,000N    54,964,000N 2.   AGR846 - PESTICIDES 37.00*         37.00* 2.00#          2.00# OPERATING                         AGR        2,729,255A     2,729,255A AGR        2,598,038W     2,364,038W 2.00*          2.00* 1.00#          1.00# AGR          464,629P       464,629P 3.   LNR401 - ECOSYSTEM PROTECTION AND RESTORATION 64.00*         64.00* 0.50#          0.50# OPERATING                         LNR        5,526,913A     5,526,913A 3.00*          3.00* 0.25#          0.25# LNR        4,239,054B     4,239,054B 1.00*          1.00* 1.75#          1.75# LNR        4,864,500N     4,889,500N 2.00*          2.00* 6.50#          6.50# LNR       12,537,534P       283,534P INVESTMENT CAPITAL                LNR        1,150,000C              C 4.   LNR402 - NATIVE RESOURCES AND FIRE PROTECTION PROGRAM 73.50*         73.50* OPERATING                         LNR       26,434,031A    23,539,031A 18.50*         18.50* 1.00#          1.00# LNR        3,679,077N     3,679,077N LNR          106,475T       106,475T 7.00#          7.00# LNR        1,686,056U     1,686,056U 2.50*          2.50* LNR        4,571,982P     2,883,534P INVESTMENT CAPITAL                LNR       10,500,000C              C 5.   LNR404 - WATER RESOURCES 28.00*         28.00* OPERATING                         LNR        4,584,758A     4,484,758A 5.00*          5.00* LNR        1,283,123B     1,283,123B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                LNR        6,000,000C              C 6.   LNR405 - CONSERVATION AND RESOURCES ENFORCEMENT 199.25*        199.25* OPERATING                         LNR       20,509,745A    17,545,614A LNR        2,021,447B       921,447B 3.75*          3.75* LNR          958,875N       958,875N LNR           32,671W        32,671W LNR          100,000P       100,000P INVESTMENT CAPITAL                LNR        4,450,000C              C 7.   LNR407 - NATURAL AREA RESERVES AND WATERSHED MANAGEMENT 69.50*         69.50* 4.00#          4.00# OPERATING                         LNR       11,709,704A    11,334,704A LNR          180,000B       180,000B LNR          440,000N       440,000N 0.50*          0.50* LNR        3,000,000P     3,000,000P INVESTMENT CAPITAL                LNR        7,200,000C              C 8.   LNR906 - LNR - NATURAL AND PHYSICAL ENVIRONMENT 55.00*         55.00* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         LNR        7,011,321A     7,061,839A 20.00*         20.00* 1.00#          1.00# LNR        3,475,827B     3,475,827B 1.00#          1.00# LNR          116,466P       116,466P 9.   HTH849 - ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION 29.50*         29.50* 1.25#          1.25# OPERATING                         HTH        3,878,888A     3,878,888A 2.15*          2.15* 0.60#          0.60# HTH          189,937N       189,937N 11.00*         11.00* HTH        2,826,328W     2,826,328W 11.95*         11.95* 2.15#          2.15# HTH        2,330,057P     5,751,220P 10.  LNR907 - AHA MOKU ADVISORY COMMITTEE 1.00*          1.00* OPERATING                         LNR          286,300A       286,300A 11.  LNR908 - KAHOOLAWE ISLAND RESERVE COMMISSION 2.00*          2.00* 14.00#         14.00# OPERATING                         LNR        1,845,510A     1,845,510A 12.  LNR909 - MAUNA KEA STEWARDSHIP & OVERSIGHT AUTHORITY 13.00#         13.00# OPERATING                         LNR       14,000,800A    14,000,800A E.  HEALTH 1.   HTH100 - COMMUNICABLE DISEASE AND PUBLIC HEALTH NURSING 236.87*        236.87* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         HTH       33,001,090A    33,067,876A 22.00#         22.00# HTH        8,827,137N     8,827,137N 3.00*          3.00* HTH          637,849U       637,849U 11.00*         11.00* 23.50#         23.50# HTH        5,311,894P     5,311,894P INVESTMENT CAPITAL                AGS        8,000,000C              C 2.   HTH131 - DISEASE OUTBREAK CONTROL 26.60*         26.60* OPERATING                         HTH        2,333,942A     2,604,086A 20.40*         20.40* 9.00#          9.00# HTH       20,255,445N     3,705,177N 1.00*          1.00* 21.50#         21.50# HTH        9,378,970P     9,378,970P 3.   HTH730 - EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES AND INJURY PREVENTION SYSTEM 10.00*         10.00* 2.20#          2.20# OPERATING                         HTH       59,091,232A    59,321,974A 6.00#          6.00# HTH       22,323,419B    22,323,419B 3.00#          3.00# HTH          420,000P       420,000P 4.   HTH560 - FAMILY HEALTH SERVICES 114.00*        114.00* 0.50#          0.50# OPERATING                         HTH       45,499,911A    45,566,966A 11.40*         11.40* 2.00#          2.00# HTH       17,965,804B    17,965,804B 99.80*         99.80* 8.50#          8.50# HTH       38,121,215N    38,121,215N 1.00#          1.00# HTH          101,558U       101,558U 15.30*         15.30* 14.00#         14.00# HTH       12,523,019P    12,523,019P 5.   HTH590 - CHRONIC DISEASE PREVENTION AND HEALTH PROMOTION 46.50*         46.50* 2.00#          2.00# OPERATING                         HTH        7,041,748A     7,041,748A HTH       48,706,356B    48,706,356B 1.00*          1.00* HTH        1,192,408U     1,192,408U 9.50*          9.50* 17.50#         17.50# HTH        6,740,166P     6,740,166P 6.   HTH595 - HEALTH RESOURCES ADMINISTRATION 2.00*          2.00* OPERATING                         HTH          244,093A       244,093A 7.   HTH596 - OFFICE OF MEDICAL CANNABIS CONTROL & REGULATION 21.00*         21.00* 5.00#          5.00# OPERATING                         HTH        3,109,260A     3,109,260A 7.00*          7.00* HTH        2,578,518B     2,425,368B 8.   HTH210 - HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS CORPORATION  CORPORATE OFFICE 54.50*         54.50* OPERATING                         HTH       17,509,280B    17,509,280B 9.   HTH211 - KAHUKU HOSPITAL OPERATING                         HTH        2,157,500A     2,032,500A INVESTMENT CAPITAL                HTH        5,800,000C     5,000,000C 10.  HTH212 - HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS CORPORATION   REGIONS OPERATING                         HTH      216,537,303A   199,816,303A 2,337.85*      2,337.85* HTH      582,286,185B   582,286,185B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                HTH       28,839,000C    53,709,000C HTH                 R    25,000,000R 11.  HTH213 - ALII COMMUNITY CARE OPERATING                         HTH        3,500,000B     3,500,000B 12.  HTH214 - MAUI HEALTH SYSTEM, A KFH LLC OPERATING                         HTH       12,000,000A     6,000,000A INVESTMENT CAPITAL                HTH        6,000,000C     6,000,000C 13.  HTH215 - HHSC - OAHU REGION OPERATING                         HTH        8,000,000A    14,000,000A 439.00*        439.00* HTH       48,500,000B    48,400,000B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                HTH        5,600,000C     5,110,000C 14.  HTH420 - ADULT MENTAL HEALTH - OUTPATIENT 343.00*        343.00* 49.50#         49.50# OPERATING                         HTH       89,622,044A    93,667,271A HTH       11,610,000B    11,610,000B 1.00#          1.00# HTH        2,333,370N     2,333,370N 1.00#          1.00# HTH          137,363P       137,363P 15.  HTH430 - ADULT MENTAL HEALTH - INPATIENT 853.00*        853.00* 20.00#         20.00# OPERATING                         HTH      157,045,865A   134,673,554A INVESTMENT CAPITAL                AGS       23,650,000C    16,750,000C 16.  HTH440 - ALCOHOL AND DRUG ABUSE DIVISION 29.00*         29.00* OPERATING                         HTH       20,395,713A    20,395,713A HTH          750,000B       750,000B 1.00*          1.00* HTH        9,038,656N     9,038,656N 5.00#          5.00# HTH        6,654,376P     6,722,746P 17.  HTH460 - CHILD AND ADOLESCENT MENTAL HEALTH 159.50*        159.50* 8.00#          8.00# OPERATING                         HTH       63,631,355A    63,631,355A 29.00*         29.00* HTH       15,375,579B    15,375,579B 5.00#          5.00# HTH        2,339,630N     2,339,630N 2.00#          2.00# HTH        2,281,992U     2,281,992U 18.  HTH501 - DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES 211.00*        211.00* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         HTH      121,506,572A   131,398,120A 5.00*          5.00* HTH        7,747,738B     7,747,738B 19.  HTH495 - BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION 2.00*          2.00* OPERATING                         HTH          210,907A       210,907A 20.  HTH610 - ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH SERVICES 127.00*        127.00* OPERATING                         HTH        9,207,720A     9,292,836A 34.00*         34.00* HTH        4,487,489B     4,936,115B 2.00*          2.00* HTH          158,000N       158,000N 3.00*          3.00* HTH          271,269U       271,269U 2.00*          2.00* HTH          396,994P       396,994P 21.  HTH710 - STATE LABORATORY SERVICES 69.00*         69.00* OPERATING                         HTH        9,189,196A     9,262,196A 0.75*          0.75* 2.00#          2.00# HTH          272,901B       272,901B 9.00#          9.00# HTH        1,029,222N     1,029,222N 0.25*          0.25* HTH           23,967W        23,967W 2.00#          2.00# HTH          429,999P       429,999P 22.  HTH720 - HEALTH CARE ASSURANCE 22.55*         22.55* 2.00#          2.00# OPERATING                         HTH        4,030,204A     4,030,204A 2.85*          2.85* HTH        2,355,000B     2,105,000B 21.60*         21.60* HTH        4,841,562P     4,841,562P 23.  HTH906 - STATE HEALTH PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT AGENCY 7.00*          7.00* OPERATING                         HTH          941,225A       726,733A HTH          340,000B       114,000B 24.  HTH760 - HEALTH STATUS MONITORING 38.50*         38.50* 3.00#          3.00# OPERATING                         HTH        3,079,488A     2,258,388A 2.00#          2.00# HTH          530,318B       530,318B 5.00*          5.00* HTH          627,294P       627,294P 25.  HTH905 - DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES COUNCIL 2.50*          2.50* OPERATING                         HTH          262,940A       262,940A 5.00*          5.00* HTH          527,570N       527,570N 26.  HTH907 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION 180.00*        180.00* 11.00#         11.00# OPERATING                         HTH       36,764,229A    32,038,805A 8.00*          8.00* 20.00#         20.00# HTH        5,275,000N     5,275,000N 4.00#          4.00# HTH          684,932P       684,932P 27.  HTH908 - OFFICE OF LANGUAGE ACCESS 6.00*          6.00* OPERATING                         HTH          714,494A       714,494A F.  SOCIAL SERVICES 1.   HMS301 - CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES 303.75*        303.75* OPERATING                         HMS       50,570,717A    50,570,717A 1.00*          1.00* HMS        6,124,053B     6,124,053B 84.75*         84.75* HMS       49,452,950N    49,452,950N HMS          400,000P       400,000P 2.   HMS302 - GENERAL SUPPORT FOR CHILD CARE 38.92*         38.92* OPERATING                         HMS        2,840,528A     2,840,528A 38.08*         38.08* HMS       14,137,770N    14,137,770N 3.   HMS303 - CHILD PROTECTIVE SERVICES PAYMENTS OPERATING                         HMS       48,265,586A    48,265,586A HMS       31,542,000N    31,542,000N 4.   HMS305 - CASH SUPPORT FOR CHILD CARE OPERATING                         HMS       57,811,811A    57,811,811A HMS       69,565,754N    69,565,754N 5.   HMS501 - IN-COMMUNITY YOUTH PROGRAMS 18.50*         18.50* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         HMS       10,764,943A    10,800,451A 0.50*          0.50* 0.50#          0.50# HMS        2,050,000N     1,534,135N 6.   HMS503 - HAWAII YOUTH CORRECTIONAL FACILITY (HYCF) 90.00*         90.00* OPERATING                         HMS        9,992,933A     9,992,933A INVESTMENT CAPITAL                AGS        3,720,000C              C 7.   DEF112 - SERVICES TO VETERANS 28.00*         28.00* OPERATING                         DEF        2,066,978A     2,066,978A INVESTMENT CAPITAL                DEF       35,000,000C              C DEF       58,000,000P              P 8.   HMS601 - ADULT PROTECTIVE AND COMMUNITY SERVICES 69.48*         69.48* OPERATING                         HMS        6,875,326A     6,875,326A 7.02*          7.02* 3.00#          3.00# HMS          838,010N       838,010N HMS           10,000R        10,000R HMS          387,560U       387,560U HMS        1,321,390P     1,321,390P 9.   HMS202 - AGED, BLIND AND DISABLED PAYMENTS OPERATING                         HMS        4,029,480A     4,029,480A 10.  HMS204 - GENERAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS OPERATING                         HMS       23,889,056A    23,889,056A HMS        3,000,000B     3,000,000B 11.  HMS206 - FEDERAL ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS OPERATING                         HMS        8,345,024N     8,345,024N 12.  HMS211 - CASH SUPPORT FOR FAMILIES - SELF-SUFFICIENCY OPERATING                         HMS       26,715,965A    26,715,965A HMS       44,000,000N    44,000,000N 13.  HMS220 - RENTAL HOUSING SERVICES 5.00*          5.00* OPERATING                         HMS        4,694,409A     4,694,409A 191.00*        191.00* 4.50#          4.50# HMS      106,838,200N   112,088,200N 17.00*         17.00* HMS        5,134,715W     5,187,506W INVESTMENT CAPITAL                BED       68,000,000C              C 14.  HMS229 - HAWAII PUBLIC HOUSING AUTHORITY ADMINISTRATION 2.00*          2.00* 3.00#          3.00# OPERATING                         HMS          502,838A       502,838A HMS       27,864,996N    27,840,930N 119.00*        119.00* 47.00#         47.00# HMS       17,416,598W    17,676,361W 15.  HMS222 - RENTAL ASSISTANCE SERVICES 1.00*          1.00* OPERATING                         HMS        1,557,121A     1,557,121A 34.00*         34.00* 1.00#          1.00# HMS       73,368,975N    77,039,700N 16.  HMS224 - HOMELESS SERVICES 11.00*         11.00* OPERATING                         HMS       27,931,773A    27,931,773A HMS          814,000N       814,000N 17.  HMS605 - COMMUNITY-BASED RESIDENTIAL & MEDICAID FACILITY SUPPORT OPERATING                         HMS       17,810,955A    17,810,955A 18.  HMS401 - HEALTH CARE PAYMENTS OPERATING                         HMS     1,031,466,906A  1,031,466,906A HMS      230,000,000B   230,000,000B HMS     2,291,497,122N  2,291,497,122N HMS        6,781,921U     6,781,921U HMS       15,798,564P    15,798,564P 19.  HMS236 - CASE MANAGEMENT FOR SELF-SUFFICIENCY 287.43*        287.43* OPERATING                         HMS       19,875,373A    19,673,479A 226.57*        226.57* HMS       26,545,359N    26,393,053N HMS           30,237P        30,237P 20.  HMS238 - DISABILITY DETERMINATION 50.00*         50.00* OPERATING                         HMS        8,859,927N     8,859,927N 21.  ATG500 - CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT SERVICES 69.70*         69.70* 0.34#          0.34# OPERATING                         ATG        5,448,469A     5,448,469A ATG        2,231,224T     2,231,224T 135.30*        135.30* 0.66#          0.66# ATG       20,006,088P    20,006,088P 22.  HMS237 - EMPLOYMENT AND TRAINING OPERATING                         HMS          469,505A       469,505A HMS        2,575,945N     2,575,945N 23.  HHL602 - PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT FOR HAWAIIAN HOMESTEADS OPERATING                         HHL       10,000,000A    10,000,000A HHL      101,866,373B     4,824,709B 4.00*          4.00* 8.00#          8.00# HHL       24,126,731N    24,126,731N HHL        3,740,534T     3,740,534T HHL        7,000,000W     7,000,000W 3.00#          3.00# HHL          393,600P       442,800P INVESTMENT CAPITAL                HHL       20,000,000C              C 24.  HHL625 - ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATING SUPPORT 200.00*        200.00* OPERATING                         HHL       18,032,234A    18,032,234A 25.  HTH904 - EXECUTIVE OFFICE ON AGING 17.60*         17.60* 3.35#          3.35# OPERATING                         HTH       12,988,560A    13,024,068A 7.40*          7.40* 1.00#          1.00# HTH       10,405,377N    10,405,377N 8.00#          8.00# HTH        1,223,791P     1,223,791P 26.  HTH520 - DISABILITY AND COMMUNICATIONS ACCESS BOARD 7.00*          7.00* OPERATING                         HTH          724,846A       767,346A 13.00*         13.00* HTH        2,186,855B     2,186,855B 2.00*          2.00* HTH          314,641U       314,641U 27.  HMS902 - GENERAL SUPPORT FOR HEALTH CARE PAYMENTS 137.00*        137.00* 4.50#          4.50# OPERATING                         HMS       16,133,771A    16,133,771A 0.87*          0.87* HMS       30,104,367B    30,104,367B 145.63*        145.63* 16.50#         16.50# HMS       96,345,000N    96,345,000N HMS        1,200,000P     1,200,000P 28.  HMS903 - GENERAL SUPPORT FOR SELF-SUFFICIENCY SERVICES 51.30*         51.30* OPERATING                         HMS       48,609,196A    48,604,950A 46.70*         46.70* HMS       95,422,009N    95,418,155N HMS       19,560,000P    19,560,000P 29.  HMS904 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION - DHS 151.59*        151.59* 8.00#          5.00# OPERATING                         HMS       18,703,261A    14,292,045A 31.41*         31.41* 6.00#              # HMS       17,288,921N     4,788,768N INVESTMENT CAPITAL                HMS       10,000,000C              C 30.  HMS901 - GENERAL SUPPORT FOR SOCIAL SERVICES 33.50*         33.50* OPERATING                         HMS        4,287,230A     3,487,230A 9.50*          9.50* HMS        3,246,986N     3,246,986N 31.  HMS777 - OFFICE ON HOMELESSNESS AND HOUSING SOLUTIONS 8.00*          8.00* OPERATING                         HMS          611,040A       611,040A INVESTMENT CAPITAL                HMS       24,400,000C    13,000,000C 32.  HMS555 - OFFICE OF WELLNESS AND RESILIENCE 12.00*         12.00* OPERATING                         HMS        1,346,000A     1,346,000A G.  FORMAL EDUCATION 1.   EDN100 - SCHOOL-BASED BUDGETING 12,397.75*     12,397.75* 680.25#        680.25# OPERATING                         EDN     1,301,966,939A  1,319,319,292A EDN        5,251,693B     5,251,693B EDN      167,203,642N   167,203,642N EDN       13,390,000T    13,390,000T EDN        7,495,605U     7,495,605U 9.00*          9.00* EDN        3,239,686W     3,239,301W 1.00*          1.00* EDN       21,414,657P    21,414,657P INVESTMENT CAPITAL                EDN      323,300,000C    46,500,000C EDN                 P   120,000,000P 2.   EDN150 - SPECIAL EDUCATION AND STUDENT SUPPORT SERVICES 5,348.50*      5,368.50* 1,228.25#      1,228.25# OPERATING                         EDN      520,838,678A   525,281,027A EDN          250,000B       250,000B 2.00*          2.00* 33.00#         33.00# EDN       60,084,267N    61,584,267N 14.00*         14.00* EDN       11,000,000W    11,000,000W EDN        5,950,000P     5,950,000P 3.   EDN200 - INSTRUCTIONAL SUPPORT 457.00*        457.00* 48.00#         48.00# OPERATING                         EDN       92,999,004A    93,374,921A 2.00#          2.00# EDN          500,000N       500,000N 1.00#          1.00# EDN          273,794P       273,794P 4.   EDN300 - STATE ADMINISTRATION 422.00*        424.00* 7.00#          7.00# OPERATING                         EDN       48,692,750A    47,007,968A EDN          112,140N       112,140N EDN        3,807,440P     3,807,440P 5.   EDN400 - SCHOOL SUPPORT 849.50*        849.50* 5.00#          5.00# OPERATING                         EDN      425,299,069A   423,937,360A 11.00*         11.00* EDN       44,200,920B    44,200,920B 718.50*        718.50* 98.50#         98.50# EDN       74,600,000N    74,600,000N EDN          150,000R       150,000R 4.00*          4.00* 2.00#          2.00# EDN       11,597,927W    11,597,927W EDN        1,000,000P     1,000,000P 6.   EDN450 - SCHOOL FACILITIES AUTHORITY 12.00*         12.00* OPERATING                         EDN        1,731,283A     1,738,979A INVESTMENT CAPITAL                EDN       55,000,000C              C 7.   EDN500 - SCHOOL COMMUNITY SERVICES 42.00*         42.00* 6.00#          6.00# OPERATING                         EDN        6,296,201A     6,325,235A EDN        1,633,908B     1,633,908B 2.00#          2.00# EDN        3,266,757N     3,266,757N EDN       23,224,665W    23,224,665W EDN          300,000P       300,000P 8.   EDN600 - CHARTER SCHOOLS OPERATING                         EDN      159,798,565A   162,578,377A EDN        5,042,000N     5,042,000N 9.   EDN612 - CHARTER SCHOOLS COMMISSION AND ADMINISTRATION 81.12*         81.12* OPERATING                         EDN       12,554,269A    12,564,269A 6.88*          6.88* EDN        1,800,000N     1,800,000N 10.  EDN700 - EARLY LEARNING 281.00*        331.00* OPERATING                         EDN       21,305,769A    24,749,084A EDN        3,000,000B     3,000,000B 1.00#          1.00# EDN          125,628N       125,628N 2.00#          2.00# EDN          380,000P       380,000P 11.  BUF745 - RETIREMENT BENEFITS - DOE OPERATING                         BUF      552,407,076A   572,505,610A 12.  BUF765 - HEALTH PREMIUM PAYMENTS - DOE OPERATING                         BUF      187,755,868A   191,510,985A 13.  BUF725 - DEBT SERVICE PAYMENTS - DOE OPERATING                         BUF      446,515,250A   521,973,994A 14.  AGS807 - SCHOOL R&M, NEIGHBOR ISLAND DISTRICTS 81.00*         81.00* OPERATING                         AGS        6,973,068A     6,951,567A 10.00*         10.00* AGS        2,346,640U     2,346,640U 15.  EDN407 - PUBLIC LIBRARIES 566.50*        567.50* OPERATING                         EDN       47,850,582A    47,632,130A EDN        4,000,000B     4,000,000B EDN        2,000,000N     2,000,000N INVESTMENT CAPITAL                AGS       27,000,000C    25,000,000C 16.  DEF114 - HAWAII NATIONAL GUARD YOUTH CHALLENGE ACADEMY 24.50#         24.50# OPERATING                         DEF        3,885,050A     3,885,050A 73.50#         73.50# DEF        6,482,477P     6,482,477P INVESTMENT CAPITAL                DEF        8,000,000C              C 17.  UOH100 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, MANOA 2,969.64*      2,969.64* 42.25#         42.25# OPERATING                         UOH      290,419,091A   290,618,531A 368.25*        368.25* 2.00#          2.00# UOH      361,552,962B   361,552,962B 75.06*         75.06* UOH        6,873,565N     6,873,565N 28.00*         28.00* UOH       65,569,059W    65,569,059W INVESTMENT CAPITAL                UOH       59,750,000C    28,500,000C UOH       30,750,000E    28,500,000E 18.  UOH110 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, JOHN A. BURNS SCHOOL OF MEDICINE 209.03*        209.03* 3.50#          3.50# OPERATING                         UOH       27,613,321A    27,613,321A UOH       28,917,688B    28,917,688B UOH        8,010,453W     8,010,453W 19.  UOH210 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, HILO 534.25*        534.25* 7.00#          7.00# OPERATING                         UOH       50,610,150A    50,727,650A 25.00*         25.00* UOH       44,435,015B    44,435,015B UOH          443,962N       443,962N 2.00*          2.00* UOH        7,489,592W     7,489,592W INVESTMENT CAPITAL                UOH       15,000,000C              C 20.  UOH220 - SMALL BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT 11.00#         11.00# OPERATING                         UOH          978,941A       978,941A 21.  UOH700 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, WEST OAHU 246.50*        246.50* 1.50#          1.50# OPERATING                         UOH       23,838,504A    24,015,377A UOH       22,028,269B    22,028,269B UOH          802,037N       802,037N UOH        2,097,704W     2,097,704W INVESTMENT CAPITAL                UOH        6,500,000C              C 22.  UOH800 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, COMMUNITY COLLEGES 1,825.50*      1,825.50* 46.00#         46.00# OPERATING                         UOH      192,200,937A   192,200,937A UOH       75,650,296B    75,650,296B 0.50*          0.50* UOH        4,428,296N     4,428,296N 34.00*         34.00* UOH       31,826,332W    31,826,332W INVESTMENT CAPITAL                UOH       45,000,000C    10,000,000C 23.  UOH900 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, SYSTEMWIDE SUPPORT 424.00*        411.00* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         UOH       65,093,776A    65,093,776A 14.00*         14.00* UOH       24,242,602B    24,242,602B 4.00*          4.00* 4.00#          4.00# UOH        1,094,875N     1,094,875N 2.00*         15.00* UOH       18,501,700W    18,501,700W INVESTMENT CAPITAL                UOH       50,504,000C         4,000C 24.  BUF748 - RETIREMENT BENEFITS - UH OPERATING                         BUF      219,919,128A   224,317,511A 25.  BUF768 - HEALTH PREMIUM PAYMENTS - UH OPERATING                         BUF       68,661,870A    70,035,107A 26.  BUF728 - DEBT SERVICE PAYMENTS - UH OPERATING                         BUF      165,254,696A   193,181,876A 27.  UOH115 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, CANCER CENTER 37.00*         37.00* OPERATING                         UOH        3,797,693A     3,797,693A H.  CULTURE AND RECREATION 1.   UOH881 - AQUARIA 9.00*          9.00* OPERATING                         UOH          919,917A       919,917A 7.00*          7.00* UOH        3,517,717B     3,517,717B UOH          996,530W       996,530W INVESTMENT CAPITAL                UOH        1,702,000C              C 2.   AGS881 - STATE FOUNDATION ON CULTURE AND THE ARTS 1.50*         17.75* OPERATING                         AGS       10,435,556A    14,432,957A AGS        3,335,150B     3,335,150B *          4.25* AGS          523,074N       992,771N INVESTMENT CAPITAL                AGS        8,500,000C              C 3.   LNR802 - HISTORIC PRESERVATION 45.00*         45.00* OPERATING                         LNR        4,520,402A     4,520,402A 3.00*          3.00* LNR          923,397B       923,397B 6.00*          6.00* LNR          751,525N       751,525N 4.   LNR804 - FOREST AND OUTDOOR RECREATION 37.50*         37.50* OPERATING                         LNR        4,812,230A     4,812,230A 3.00*          3.00* LNR          917,145B       917,145B 19.00*         19.00* LNR        5,396,897N     5,396,897N 3.00*          3.00* LNR          913,329W       913,329W 5.   LNR806 - PARKS ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION 155.00*        155.00* OPERATING                         LNR       12,886,065A    12,886,065A LNR       31,094,536B    31,094,536B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                LNR        8,400,000C     2,150,000C LNR          750,000N       250,000N 6.   LNR801 - OCEAN-BASED RECREATION 7.00*          7.00* OPERATING                         LNR          478,396A       478,396A 124.00*        124.00* LNR       42,965,486B    42,965,486B LNR        1,500,000N     1,500,000N INVESTMENT CAPITAL                LNR       28,650,000C              C 7.   BED180 - SPECTATOR EVENTS & SHOWS -ALOHA STADIUM 18.00*         18.00* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         BED        8,772,356B     8,772,356B I.  PUBLIC SAFETY 1.   PSD402 - HALAWA CORRECTIONAL FACILITY 410.00*        410.00* OPERATING                         PSD       39,211,885A    39,211,885A 2.   PSD403 - KULANI CORRECTIONAL FACILITY 83.00*         83.00* OPERATING                         PSD        7,099,249A     7,099,249A 3.   PSD404 - WAIAWA CORRECTIONAL FACILITY 112.00*        112.00* OPERATING                         PSD        9,032,631A     9,032,631A 4.   PSD405 - HAWAII COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER 193.00*        193.00* OPERATING                         PSD       15,855,815A    15,855,815A 5.   PSD406 - MAUI COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER 205.00*        205.00* OPERATING                         PSD       16,652,787A    16,652,787A 6.   PSD407 - OAHU COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER 500.00*        500.00* OPERATING                         PSD       43,886,972A    43,160,178A 7.   PSD408 - KAUAI COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER 74.00*         74.00* OPERATING                         PSD        6,628,031A     6,628,031A 8.   PSD409 - WOMEN'S COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER 269.00*        269.00* OPERATING                         PSD       20,991,799A    20,991,799A 9.   PSD410 - INTAKE SERVICE CENTERS 73.00*         73.00* OPERATING                         PSD        5,891,809A     5,891,809A 10.  PSD420 - CORRECTIONS PROGRAM SERVICES 185.00*        185.00* OPERATING                         PSD       26,143,271A    26,143,271A PSD        1,045,989N     1,045,989N 11.  PSD421 - HEALTH CARE 264.60*        264.60* OPERATING                         PSD       38,877,361A    38,877,361A 12.  PSD422 - HAWAII CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES 2.00*          2.00* 42.00#         42.00# OPERATING                         PSD       10,884,725W    10,884,725W 13.  PSD808 - NON-STATE FACILITIES 9.00*          9.00* OPERATING                         PSD       42,589,908A    42,589,908A 14.  LAW502 - NARCOTICS ENFORCEMENT DIVISION 14.00*         14.00* OPERATING                         LAW        1,713,945A     1,713,945A 8.00*          8.00* LAW        1,004,853W     1,004,853W LAW          800,000P       800,000P 15.  LAW503 - SHERIFF 318.00*        318.00* OPERATING                         LAW       28,441,127A    28,623,526A LAW          600,000N       600,000N 150.00*        150.00* LAW       19,616,116U    19,616,116U LAW          600,000P       600,000P 16.  LAW504 - CRIMINAL INVESTIGATION DIVISION 16.00*         16.00* 6.00#          6.00# OPERATING                         LAW        4,113,508A     3,462,585A 2.00*          2.00* 5.00#          5.00# LAW          731,972U       731,972U 17.  LAW505 - LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAINING DIVISION 8.00*          8.00* OPERATING                         LAW        2,668,464A     2,668,464A 18.  LAW900 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION 72.00*         72.00* OPERATING                         LAW       20,894,244A    16,957,744A LAW        5,000,000U     5,000,000U INVESTMENT CAPITAL                LAW        3,000,000C              C 19.  LAW901 - OFFICE OF HOMELAND SECURITY 14.00*         14.00* 8.50#          8.50# OPERATING                         LAW        2,362,031A     2,362,031A LAW        3,724,886N     4,551,095N LAW        9,405,469P     9,550,715P 20.  PSD611 - ADULT PAROLE DETERMINATIONS 7.00*          7.00* OPERATING                         PSD          569,373A       569,373A 21.  PSD612 - ADULT PAROLE SUPERVISION AND COUNSELING 61.00*         61.00* OPERATING                         PSD        5,211,808A     5,211,808A 22.  PSD613 - CRIME VICTIM COMPENSATION COMMISSION 13.00*         13.00* OPERATING                         PSD        1,125,638A     1,125,638A PSD        1,186,017B     1,186,017B 1.00#          1.00# PSD          859,315P       859,315P 23.  PSD900 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION 149.00*        149.00* OPERATING                         PSD       25,287,667A    25,287,667A 4.00*          4.00* PSD        1,331,967B     1,331,967B PSD           75,065T        75,065T INVESTMENT CAPITAL                AGS       64,750,000C    15,000,000C PSD       10,000,000C              C 24.  ATG231 - STATE CRIMINAL JUSTICE INFORMATION AND IDENTIFICATION 23.50*         23.50* OPERATING                         ATG        2,614,592A     2,497,809A 24.50*         24.50* ATG        4,370,515W     4,370,515W ATG        1,204,841P     1,204,841P 25.  LNR810 - PREVENTION OF NATURAL DISASTERS 1.00*          1.00* OPERATING                         LNR          110,000A       110,000A 8.00*          8.00* LNR        7,660,556B     7,660,556B LNR       10,522,413P     1,160,621P 26.  DEF110 - AMELIORATION OF PHYSICAL DISASTERS 100.25*        100.25* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         DEF       10,455,364A    10,256,912A 21.75*         21.75* 1.50#          1.50# DEF        1,430,238P     1,430,238P INVESTMENT CAPITAL                DEF          725,000C              C 27.  DEF116 - HAWAII ARMY AND AIR NATIONAL GUARD 19.75*         19.75* OPERATING                         DEF        7,081,247A     7,081,247A 99.25*         99.25* 20.00#         20.00# DEF       40,051,745P    40,210,106P INVESTMENT CAPITAL                DEF        1,173,000C              C DEF        3,223,000P              P 28.  DEF118 - HAWAII EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY 26.00*         26.00* 90.00#         90.00# OPERATING                         DEF       14,097,375A    14,097,375A DEF          500,000B       500,000B DEF        4,156,958N     4,156,958N 2.00#          2.00# DEF          500,000W       500,000W 25.00#         25.00# DEF       22,497,034P    22,497,034P INVESTMENT CAPITAL                AGS        6,500,000C     6,500,000C AGS        1,500,000P     1,500,000P J.  INDIVIDUAL RIGHTS 1.   CCA102 - CABLE TELEVISION 6.00*          6.00* OPERATING                         CCA        2,511,181B     2,507,752B 2.   CCA103 - CONSUMER ADVOCATE FOR COMMUNICATION, UTILITIES, AND TRANSPORTATION SERVICES 25.00*         25.00* OPERATING                         CCA        4,944,320B     4,944,320B 3.   CCA104 - FINANCIAL SERVICES REGULATION 43.00*         43.00* OPERATING                         CCA        6,417,109B     6,417,109B CCA          301,000T       301,000T 4.   CCA105 - PROFESSIONAL AND VOCATIONAL LICENSING 72.00*         72.00* 11.00#         11.00# OPERATING                         CCA        9,909,730B     9,909,730B 8.00*          8.00* 4.00#          4.00# CCA        2,880,256T     2,880,256T 5.   CCA106 - INSURANCE REGULATORY SERVICES 95.00*         95.00* OPERATING                         CCA       23,746,784B    22,746,784B CCA          201,000T       201,000T 6.   CCA107 - POST-SECONDARY EDUCATION AUTHORIZATION 1.00*          1.00* OPERATING                         CCA          249,052B       249,052B 7.   CCA901 - PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION 69.00*         69.00* OPERATING                         CCA       19,725,310B    19,777,291B 8.   CCA110 - OFFICE OF CONSUMER PROTECTION 20.00*         20.00* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         CCA        3,833,679B     3,833,679B CCA          100,681T       100,681T 9.   AGR812 - MEASUREMENT STANDARDS 10.00*         10.00* OPERATING                         AGR          746,480A       746,480A 10.  CCA111 - BUSINESS REGISTRATION AND SECURITIES REGULATION 77.00*         77.00* OPERATING                         CCA       10,459,932B    10,432,895B 11.  CCA112 - REGULATED INDUSTRIES COMPLAINTS OFFICE 66.00*         66.00* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         CCA        8,930,940B     8,930,940B 12.  CCA191 - GENERAL SUPPORT 54.00*         54.00* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         CCA       24,860,659B    12,858,290B 13.  AGS105 - ENFORCEMENT OF INFORMATION PRACTICES 10.50*         10.50* OPERATING                         AGS        1,258,905A     1,258,905A 14.  BUF151 - OFFICE OF THE PUBLIC DEFENDER 133.50*        133.50* OPERATING                         BUF       15,137,691A    15,137,691A 15.  LNR111 - CONVEYANCES AND RECORDINGS 56.00*         56.00* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         LNR        7,731,946B     7,731,946B 16.  HMS888 - COMMISSION ON THE STATUS OF WOMEN 1.00*          1.00* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         HMS          184,462A       184,462A K.  GOVERNMENT-WIDE SUPPORT 1.   GOV100 - OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR 24.00*         24.00* 23.00#         23.00# OPERATING                         GOV        4,701,872A     4,551,872A 2.   LTG100 - OFFICE OF THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR 17.00*         17.00* OPERATING                         LTG        2,251,665A     2,251,665A LTG          312,000B       312,000B 3.   BED144 - STATEWIDE PLANNING AND COORDINATION 30.00*         30.00* 8.00#          7.00# OPERATING                         BED        4,580,161A     4,280,161A 5.00#          5.00# BED        2,041,871N     2,041,871N BED        2,000,000W     2,000,000W INVESTMENT CAPITAL                BED        7,500,000C              C 4.   BED130 - ECONOMIC PLANNING AND RESEARCH 18.46*         18.46* 5.00#          5.00# OPERATING                         BED        5,744,533A     5,744,533A 8.04*          8.04* BED          864,351P       864,351P 5.   BUF101 - DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND BUDGET DIVISION 53.00*         58.00* OPERATING                         BUF       14,051,217A    13,504,737A BUF      427,305,000B   427,305,000B 6.   BUF103 - VACATION PAYOUT - STATEWIDE OPERATING                         BUF        9,700,000A     9,700,000A 7.   AGS871 - CAMPAIGN SPENDING COMMISSION 7.00*          7.00* OPERATING                         AGS        2,757,314A     1,027,919A AGS        1,043,732T     1,043,732T 8.   AGS879 - OFFICE OF ELECTIONS 16.50*         16.50* 3.00#          3.00# OPERATING                         AGS        6,452,228A     2,595,761A 0.50*          0.50* 1.00#          1.00# AGS           99,694N        99,694N 9.   TAX100 - COMPLIANCE 149.00*        149.00* OPERATING                         TAX       10,613,723A    10,668,773A 10.  TAX103 - TAX COLLECTION SERVICES OFFICE 43.00*         43.00* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         TAX        3,427,288A     3,427,288A 11.  TAX105 - TAX SERVICES AND PROCESSING 129.00*        129.00* OPERATING                         TAX        7,116,185A     7,116,185A 12.  TAX107 - SUPPORTING SERVICES - REVENUE COLLECTION 86.00*         87.00* 7.00#          7.00# OPERATING                         TAX       18,528,791A    19,823,837A 15.00#         15.00# TAX        3,629,626B     3,629,626B 13.  AGS101 - ACCOUNTING SYSTEM DEVELOPMENT AND MAINTENANCE 22.00*         22.00* OPERATING                         AGS       10,964,409A     8,431,323A 14.  AGS102 - EXPENDITURE EXAMINATION 18.00*         18.00* OPERATING                         AGS        1,628,950A     1,629,046A 15.  AGS103 - RECORDING AND REPORTING 13.00*         13.00* OPERATING                         AGS        1,386,549A     1,387,165A 16.  AGS104 - INTERNAL POST AUDIT 7.00*          7.00* 3.00#          3.00# OPERATING                         AGS        1,023,968A     1,025,751A 17.  BUF115 - FINANCIAL ADMINISTRATION 18.00*         18.00* OPERATING                         BUF        2,870,681A     2,867,681A 9.00*          9.00* BUF       15,957,630T    15,957,630T 18.  BUF721 - DEBT SERVICE PAYMENTS - STATE OPERATING                         BUF      668,429,515A   605,294,407A 19.  ATG100 - LEGAL SERVICES 321.74*        321.74* 18.67#         18.67# OPERATING                         ATG       47,212,444A    45,402,026A 32.90*         32.90* 1.00#          1.00# ATG        6,484,008B     6,542,845B 5.23#          5.23# ATG       11,641,670N    11,641,670N 1.00*          1.00* ATG        4,065,177T     4,065,177T 111.60*        111.60* 17.10#         17.10# ATG       21,765,719U    21,765,719U 5.60*          5.60* 2.00#          2.00# ATG        3,539,882W     3,539,882W 21.44*         21.44* 0.50#          0.50# ATG        4,890,531P     5,005,104P 20.  AGS131 - ENTERPRISE TECHNOLOGY SERVICES 138.00*        138.00* OPERATING                         AGS       51,336,206A    52,238,803A 12.00*         12.00* 1.00#          1.00# AGS        2,578,244B     2,578,244B 33.00*         33.00* AGS        6,315,295U     6,315,295U INVESTMENT CAPITAL                AGS        4,000,000C     2,000,000C 21.  AGS111 - ARCHIVES - RECORDS MANAGEMENT 19.00*         19.00* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         AGS        4,383,125A     6,469,149A 3.00*          3.00* AGS          521,304B       521,304B 2.00#          2.00# 22.  AGS891 - ENHANCED 911 BOARD 2.00*          2.00* OPERATING                         AGS       14,035,349B    14,035,349B 23.  HRD102 - WORKFORCE ATTRACTION, SELECTION, CLASSIFICATION, AND EFFECTIVENESS 89.00*         89.00* OPERATING                         HRD       28,276,844A    27,649,629A HRD          700,000B       700,000B 2.00*          2.00* HRD        5,178,161U     5,178,161U 24.  HRD191 - SUPPORTING SERVICES  HUMAN RESOURCES DEVELOPMENT 12.00*         12.00* OPERATING                         HRD        2,897,063A     2,750,816A 25.  BUF141 - EMPLOYEES RETIREMENT SYSTEM 117.00*        117.00* OPERATING                         BUF       30,773,357X    25,727,960X 26.  BUF143 - HAWAII EMPLOYER UNION TRUST FUND 63.00*         63.00* OPERATING                         BUF       11,193,297T    11,337,016T 27.  AGS234 - CENTRAL SERVICES - CEMETERY MANAGEMENT OFFICE 2.00*          2.00* OPERATING                         AGS        1,088,500A     1,167,000A 28.  BUF741 - RETIREMENT BENEFITS - STATE OPERATING                         BUF      512,718,644A   522,870,219A BUF        4,000,000U     4,000,000U 29.  BUF761 - HEALTH PREMIUM PAYMENTS - STATE OPERATING                         BUF      158,214,808A   161,379,104A 30.  BUF762 - HEALTH PREMIUM PAYMENT FOR ANNUAL REQUIRED CONTRIBUTION (ARC). OPERATING                         BUF      838,506,000A   846,891,000A 31.  LNR101 - PUBLIC LANDS MANAGEMENT 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         LNR          177,872A       177,872A 63.00*         63.00* LNR       24,483,607B    22,983,607B INVESTMENT CAPITAL                LNR        3,200,000B              B LNR        3,355,000C              C 32.  AGS203 - STATE RISK MANAGEMENT AND INSURANCE ADMINISTRATION OPERATING                         AGS       26,987,995A    26,987,995A 5.00*          5.00* AGS       25,701,949W    25,706,793W 33.  AGS211 - LAND SURVEY 10.00*         10.00* OPERATING                         AGS          913,342A       914,121A AGS          285,000U       285,000U 34.  AGS223 - OFFICE LEASING 8.00*          8.00* OPERATING                         AGS        7,177,674A     7,178,040A AGS        5,500,000U     5,500,000U 35.  LNR102 - LEGACY LAND CONSERVATION PROGRAM 2.00*          2.00* OPERATING                         LNR        9,034,784B     9,034,784B 36.  AGS221 - PUBLIC WORKS - PLANNING, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION 91.00*         91.00* OPERATING                         AGS        8,105,782A     8,112,911A AGS        4,000,000W     4,000,000W INVESTMENT CAPITAL                AGS       24,004,000C         4,000C 37.  AGS231 - CENTRAL SERVICES - CUSTODIAL SERVICES 125.00*        126.00* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         AGS       25,792,541A    25,844,638A AGS        1,699,084U     1,699,084U 38.  AGS232 - CENTRAL SERVICES - GROUNDS MAINTENANCE 32.00*         32.00* OPERATING                         AGS        2,669,822A     2,669,822A 39.  AGS233 - CENTRAL SERVICES - BUILDING REPAIRS AND ALTERATIONS 33.00*         33.00* OPERATING                         AGS        3,692,561A     3,693,069A 40.  AGS240 - STATE PROCUREMENT 25.00*         25.00* 1.00#          1.00# OPERATING                         AGS        2,203,297A     2,205,274A 41.  AGS244 - SURPLUS PROPERTY MANAGEMENT 5.00*          5.00* OPERATING                         AGS        2,006,599W     2,006,803W 42.  AGS251 - AUTOMOTIVE MANAGEMENT - MOTOR POOL 13.00*         13.00* OPERATING                         AGS        3,541,577W     3,539,054W 43.  AGS252 - AUTOMOTIVE MANAGEMENT - PARKING CONTROL 27.00*         27.00* OPERATING                         AGS        4,563,614W     4,561,089W 44.  AGS901 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES 54.00*         54.00* 2.00#          2.00# OPERATING                         AGS        5,905,937A     5,904,935A INVESTMENT CAPITAL                AGS       35,000,000C              C 45.  SUB201 - CITY AND COUNTY OF HONOLULU INVESTMENT CAPITAL                CCH        2,000,000C              C CCH        8,000,000S              S 46.  SUB301 - COUNTY OF HAWAII INVESTMENT CAPITAL                COH        3,500,000C              C COH        3,500,000S              S 47.  SUB501 - COUNTY OF KAUAI INVESTMENT CAPITAL                COK       13,000,000C              C COK       13,000,000S              S PART III.  PROGRAM APPROPRIATION PROVISIONS SECTION 4. Provided that of the general fund appropriations for debt service payments (BUF721-BUF728) for fiscal biennium 2025-2027, balances that are unrequired for debt service payments may be used to pay for expenses related to section 39-14, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and for costs of bond issuance, or may be transferred to retirement benefits payments (BUF741-BUF748) and health premium payments (BUF761-BUF768); provided further that the funds shall not be expended for any other purpose; and provided further that any unexpended funds shall lapse to the general fund at the end of the respective fiscal year for which the appropriation was made. SECTION 5. Provided that of the general fund appropriation for the Hawaii technology development corporation (BED143), the sum of $1,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be expended for manufacturing assistance program grants in alignment with regional economic development and opportunities; provided further that the Hawaii technology development corporation shall submit a report of all grant awardees, including the amounts awarded, alignment to regional economic development and statewide initiatives, and resulting impacts, to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026; provided further that any funds not expended or encumbered for this purpose shall lapse to the general fund at the end of each fiscal year. SECTION 6.  Provided that of the general fund appropriation for the Hawaii technology development corporation (BED143), the sum of $1,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be expended for small business innovation research phase II and phase III matching grants in alignment with regional economic development and opportunities; provided further that the Hawaii technology development corporation shall submit a reportof all grant awardees, including the amounts awarded, alignment to regional economic development and statewide initiatives, and resulting impacts, to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026; provided further that any funds not expended or encumbered for this purpose shall lapse to the general fund at the end of each fiscal year. SECTION 7. Provided that of the general fund appropriation for the Hawaii technology development corporation (BED143), the sum of $1,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be expended for accelerator program grants in alignment with regional economic development and opportunities; provided further that the Hawaii technology development corporation shall submit a report of all grant awardees, including the amounts awarded, alignment to regional economic development and statewide initiatives, and resulting impacts, to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026; provided further that any funds not expended or encumbered for this purpose shall lapse to the general fund at the end of each fiscal year. SECTION 8. Provided that of the general fund appropriation for strategic marketing and support (BED100), the sum of $865,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be expended for the made in Hawaii workforce development program in accordance with section 486-119, Hawaii Revised Statutes; provided further that the department of business, economic development, and tourism shall submit a report to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026, that shall include but not be limited to the number of new companies assisted at local events and shows, number of new to export companies for both domestic and international exports, number of market expansion companies that are expanding into a new region or country market, aggregate actual sales of companies assisted at consumer shows or at local, domestic, and international trade shows, aggregate projected sales anticipated within twelve to eighteen months after an export activity, aggregate number of jobs generated or supported as a result of assistance, and economic impact from assistance provided; provided further that any funds not expended or encumbered for this purpose shall lapse to the general fund at the end of each fiscal year. SECTION 9. Provided that of the general fund appropriation for the office of the governor (GOV100), the sum of $4,551,872 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be for the office of the governor; provided further that the governor submits the supplemental budget to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026 in accordance with section 37-72, Hawaii Revised Statutes, as prescribed by the legislature. SECTION 10. Provided that of the general fund appropriation for agricultural resource management (AGR141), the sum of $2,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 shall be deposited into the irrigation system revolving fund, to be expended for irrigation related expenses pursuant to section 167-22, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 11. Provided that of the general fund appropriation for departmental administration and budget division (BUF101), the sum of $1,011,564 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 shall be expended for salary adjustments as recommended by the commission on salaries; provided that the governor may transfer funds between departments and programs to implement any salary adjustments as recommended by the commission on salaries. SECTION 12.  Provided that of the general fund appropriation for school support (EDN400), the sum of $5,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be expended to contract the department of law enforcement to improve school safety across department of education campuses via technology; provided further that any funds not expended for this purpose shall lapse to the general fund. PART IV. GRANT-IN-AID APPROPRIATIONS SECTION 13. APPROPRIATIONS.  The legislature finds that the grant recipients named in this part have applied for a grant pursuant to section 42F-102, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and qualify to receive a grant pursuant to section 42F-103, Hawaii Revised Statutes. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $10,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 to the expending agencies listed in this part and in the sums indicated for the purpose of providing grants to the corresponding grant recipient. The appropriations shall be disbursed by a contract between the named expending agency and the grant recipient pursuant to sections 42F-104, 42F-105, and 42F-106, Hawaii Revised Statutes.  Further, the legislature finds and declares that the grants are in the public interest and for the public health, safety, and general welfare of the State. AMOUNT               PROJECT 1. $225,000.00       808 CLEANUPS ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR 808 CLEANUPS, FOR COSTS RELATED TO PERSONNEL AND PROGRAMS FOCUSED ON CONSERVATION PROJECTS IN HAWAII FOR LNR - NATURAL AND PHYSICAL ENVIRONMENT (LNR906) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 2.  $300,000.00       ADULT FRIENDS FOR YOUTH ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR ADULT FRIENDS FOR YOUTH, FOR COSTS RELATED TO EDUCATIONAL SUPPORT SERVICES FOR HIGH-RISK YOUTH FOR IN-COMMUNITY YOUTH PROGRAMS (HMS501) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 3.  $115,000.00       AFTER SCHOOL ALL-STARS HAWAII ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR AFTER SCHOOL ALL-STARS HAWAII, FOR COSTS RELATED TO EXPANSION OF AFTER-SCHOOL AND SUMMER PROGRAMS FOR TITLE I SCHOOLS FOR STATE ADMINISTRATION (EDN300) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 4.  $100,000.00       ALALUA LIFE FOUNDATION ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR ALALUA LIFE FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS RELATED TO A MEMORIAL GARDEN FOR LAHAINA FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 5.  $140,000.00       ALOHA HARVEST ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR ALOHA HARVEST, FOR COSTS RELATED TO FOOD RESCUE AND REDISTRIBUTION FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 6.  $75,000.00        BEST BUDDIES HAWAII, LLC ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR BEST BUDDIES HAWAII, LLC, FOR COSTS RELATED TO FRIENDSHIP AND LEADERSHIP DEVELOPMENT FOR STUDENTS WITH INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES FOR STATE ADMINISTRATION (EDN300) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 7.  $125,000.00       CATHOLIC CHARITIES HAWAII ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR CATHOLIC CHARITIES HAWAII, FOR COSTS RELATED TO EDUCATION, RECREATION, HEALTH PROMOTION, AND HEALTH SCREENING FOR SENIORS FOR GENERAL ADMINISTRATION (HTH907) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 8.  $125,000.00       CENTER FOR TOMORROWS LEADERS ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR CENTER FOR TOMORROWS LEADERS, FOR COSTS RELATED TO STRENGTHENING THE STATE'S WORKFORCE PIPELINE FOR IN-COMMUNITY YOUTH PROGRAMS (HMS501) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 9.  $50,000.00        COMMON GRACE ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR COMMON GRACE, FOR COSTS RELATED TO ASSISTING SOCIALLY DISENGAGED YOUTH WITH ACADEMIC AND BEHAVIORAL CHALLENGES FOR GENERAL ADMINISTRATION - DHS (HMS904) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 10.  $100,000.00      DOWNTOWN ART CENTER ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR DOWNTOWN ART CENTER, FOR COSTS RELATED TO ESTABLISHING AN ARTS AND CULTURE COMMUNITY CENTER IN HONOLULU FOR STATE FOUNDATION ON CULTURE AND THE ARTS (AGS881) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 11.  $50,000.00       EPILEPSY FOUNDATION ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR EPILEPSY FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS RELATED TO EXPANSION OF EPILEPSY EDUCATION, ADVOCACY AND SUPPORT SERVICES STATEWIDE FOR FAMILY HEALTH SERVICES (HTH560) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 12.  $20,000.00       EWA BEACH LIONS CLUB FOUNDATION ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR EWA BEACH LIONS CLUB FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS RELATED TO ANNUAL COMMUNITY ENRICHMENT EVENTS FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 13.  $40,000.00       FRIENDS OF CHILDREN'S JUSTICE CENTER OF EAST HI ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR FRIENDS OF CHILDREN'S JUSTICE CENTER OF EAST HI, FOR COSTS RELATED TO EMERGENCY, SPECIAL NEEDS, AND ENHANCEMENT SERVICES TO CHILD VICTIMS OF ABUSE FOR GENERAL ADMINISTRATION - DHS (HMS904) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 14.  $100,000.00      GOVERNOR ARIYOSHI FOUNDATION: GALT LEADERSHIP TRAINING ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR GOVERNOR ARIYOSHI FOUNDATION: GALT LEADERSHIP TRAINING, FOR COSTS RELATED TO ESTABLISHING A LEADERSHIP TRAINING PROGRAM FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 15.  $200,000.00      HALE MAHAOLU ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR HALE MAHAOLU, FOR COSTS RELATED TO PROVIDING ESSENTIAL WRAP AROUND SERVICES FOR VULNERABLE POPULATIONS FOR GENERAL ADMINISTRATION - DHS (HMS904) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 16.  $20,000.00       HAMAKUA YOUTH FOUNDATION, INC. ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR HAMAKUA YOUTH FOUNDATION, INC., FOR COSTS RELATED TO AFTER SCHOOL CARE, CULTURAL PROGRAMS, AND INTERMITTENT FOOD ASSISTANCE FOR IN-COMMUNITY YOUTH PROGRAMS (HMS501) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 17.  $300,000.00      HAWAII AG AND CULINARY ALLIANCE ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR HAWAII AG AND CULINARY ALLIANCE, FOR COSTS RELATED TO WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT OUTREACH INITIATIVES FOR AGRICULTURAL DEVELOPMENT AND MARKETING (AGR192) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 18.  $325,000.00      HAWAII AGRICULTURAL FOUNDATION ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR HAWAII AGRICULTURAL FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS RELATED TO EXPANSION OF AGRICULTURAL EDUCATION, WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT, AND COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT FOR GENERAL ADMINISTRATION FOR AGRICULTURE (AGR171) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 19.  $100,000.00      HAWAII CONSTRUCTION CAREER DAYS ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR HAWAII CONSTRUCTION CAREER DAYS, FOR COSTS RELATED TO PROVIDING CAREER PATHWAYS IN THE CONSTRUCTION INDUSTRY FOR SCHOOL-BASED BUDGETING (EDN100) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 20.  $125,000.00      HAWAII COUNCIL FOR THE HUMANITIES ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR HAWAII COUNCIL FOR THE HUMANITIES, FOR COSTS RELATED TO DEVELOPMENT OF RESEARCH-BASED HISTORY CURRICULUM AND TEACHER RESOURCES AND TRAINING IN ENGLISH AND HAWAIIAN FOR STATE ADMINISTRATION (EDN300) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 21.  $350,000.00      HAWAII FARM BUREAU FOUNDATION ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR HAWAII FARM BUREAU FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS RELATED TO AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH AND MARKET DEVELOPMENT FOR GENERAL ADMINISTRATION FOR AGRICULTURE (AGR171), ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 22.  $20,000.00       HAWAII HEALTH & HARM REDUCTION CENTER ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR HAWAII HEALTH & HARM REDUCTION CENTER, FOR COSTS RELATED TO DIRECT LEGAL ASSISTANCE FOR UNSHELTERED HOMELESS FOR LEGAL SERVICES (ATG100) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 23.  $100,000.00      HAWAII ISLAND HUMANE SOCIETY S.P.C.A. ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR HAWAII ISLAND HUMANE SOCIETY S.P.C.A., FOR COSTS RELATED TO SPAY AND NEUTER PROGRAMS FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 24.  $40,000.00       HAWAII STATE SCIENCE OLYMPIAD ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR HAWAII STATE SCIENCE OLYMPIAD, FOR COSTS RELATED TO EXPANSION AND ENHANCEMENT OF STATEWIDE STEM EDUCATION INITIATIVES FOR SCHOOL-BASED BUDGETING (EDN100) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 25.  $250,000.00      HAWAII SYMPHONY ORCHESTRA ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR HAWAII SYMPHONY ORCHESTRA, FOR COSTS RELATED TO YOUTH EDUCATION AND COMMUNITY MUSIC PERFORMANCES FOR STATE FOUNDATION ON CULTURE AND THE ARTS (AGS881) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 26.  $50,000.00       HAWAII TAX HELP AND FINANCIAL EMPOWERMENT SOLUTIONS ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR HAWAII TAX HELP AND FINANCIAL EMPOWERMENT SOLUTIONS, FOR COSTS RELATED TO FREE TAX SERVICES AND TAX EDUCATION FOR GENERAL SUPPORT FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT (BED142) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 27.  $100,000.00      HAWAII VOLCANO CIRCUS ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR HAWAII VOLCANO CIRCUS, FOR COSTS RELATED TO PERFORMANCE, FINE ARTS, AGRICULTURE, AND TECHNOLOGY EDUCATION AND DISASTER PREPAREDNESS PLANNING SERVICES AND TRAINING FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND . 28.  $50,000.00       HELPING HANDS HAWAII ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR HELPING HANDS HAWAII, FOR COSTS RELATED TO INTERPRETATION AND WRITTEN TRANSLATION TO LOW-INCOME RESIDENTS FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 29.  $20,000.00       HOKULANI CHILDREN'S THEATRE OF MOLOKAI ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR HOKULANI CHILDREN'S THEATRE OF MOLOKAI, FOR COSTS RELATED TO PERFORMING ARTS PROGRAMS FOR STATE FOUNDATION ON CULTURE AND THE ARTS (AGS881) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 30.  $75,000.00       HOOKIPA KAUAI ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR HOOKIPA KAUAI, FOR COSTS RELATED TO PURCHASE OF FOOD, HYGIENE, AND SHELTERING PRODUCTS FOR GENERAL ADMINISTRATION - DHS (HMS904) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 31.  $270,000.00      HOOLA NA PUA ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR HOOLA NA PUA, FOR COSTS RELATED TO CONTINUUM OF PREVENTION, INTERVENTION, AND TRAUMA INFORMED, EVIDENCE BASED SERVICES FOR IN-COMMUNITY YOUTH PROGRAMS (HMS501) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 32.  $75,000.00       HOSPICE OF HILO ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR HOSPICE OF HILO, FOR COSTS RELATED TO INTERDISCIPLINARY PALLIATIVE CARE TEAM FOR GENERAL ADMINISTRATION - DHS (HMS904) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 33.  $10,000.00       HUA O LAHUI ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR HUA O LAHUI, FOR COSTS RELATED TO CANOE CARVING, KOI MAKING, AND FILMMAKING TARGETING NATIVE HAWAIIAN VETERANS FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 34.  $110,000.00      HUI O HAUULA ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR HUI O HAUULA, FOR COSTS RELATED TO CONTINUATION AND EXPANSION OF AFTER SCHOOL PROGRAMS, EMERGENCY PREPARATION, SENIOR SERVICES, FOOD DISTRIBUTION, AND DIGITAL LITERACY FOR ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATING SUPPORT (HHL625) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 35.  $65,000.00       IBOUNCE UP, INC. ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR IBOUNCE UP, INC., FOR COSTS RELATED TO MENTAL RESILIENCE TRAINING SESSIONS FOR AT-RISK AND UNDERSERVED INDIVIDUALS FOR ADULT MENTAL HEALTH - OUTPATIENT (HTH420) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 36.  $150,000.00      INNOVATIONS PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL FOUNDATION ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR INNOVATIONS PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS RELATED TO ACQUISITION OF FURNITURE, FIXTURES, AND EQUIPMENT FOR STATE ADMINISTRATION (EDN300) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 37.  $250,000.00      JAPAN-AMERICA SOCIETY OF HAWAII ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR JAPAN-AMERICA SOCIETY OF HAWAII, FOR COSTS RELATED TO A HAWAII-JAPAN SISTER SUMMIT FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 8.  $200,000.00       KALIHI COMMUNITY CENTER ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR KALIHI COMMUNITY CENTER, FOR COSTS RELATED TO CULTURAL ASSISTANCE AND LEADERSHIP BUILDING FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 39.  $40,000.00       KAPULE ORGANIZATION ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR KAPULE ORGANIZATION, FOR COSTS RELATED TO EDUCATIONAL NATURE EXPLORATIONS, FISHPOND RESTORATION, AND NATIVE HAWAIIAN CANOE SAILING FOR HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS FOR ECOSYSTEM PROTECTION AND RESTORATION (LNR401) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 40.  $75,000.00       KAUAI FOODBANK, INC., THE ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR THE KAUAI FOODBANK, INC., FOR COSTS RELATED TO VARIOUS FOOD DISTRIBUTION PROGRAMS TARGETING SENIORS AND CHILDREN FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 41.  $375,000.00      KOOLAULOA HEALTH CENTER ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR KOOLAULOA HEALTH CENTER, FOR COSTS RELATED TO OPERATIONS OF A HEALTH CENTER FOR GENERAL ADMINISTRATION (HTH907) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 42.  $175,000.00      KUALOA-HEEIA ECUMENICAL YOUTH PROJECT ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR KUALOA-HEEIA ECUMENICAL YOUTH PROJECT, FOR COSTS RELATED TO EXPANSION OF A CULTURALLY GROUNDED YOUTH PROGRAM FOR ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATING SUPPORT (HHL625) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 43.  $185,000.00      KUMANO I KE ALA O MAKAWELI ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, KUMANO I KE ALA O MAKAWELI, FOR COSTS RELATED TO EDUCATION IN NATIVE HAWAIIAN FOOD CROPS, LAND MANAGEMENT, AND MITIGATION OF EROSION FOR ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATING SUPPORT (HHL625) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 44.  $25,000.00       LANAI ACADEMY OF PERFORMING ARTS, INC. ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR LANAI ACADEMY OF PERFORMING ARTS, INC., FOR COSTS RELATED TO A PERFORMING ARTS PROGRAM OFFERING ART CLASSES, MUSIC PRODUCTION, AND PERFORMING ART CAMPS FOR STATE FOUNDATION ON CULTURE AND THE ARTS (AGS881) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 45.  $75,000.00       LEGAL CLINIC, THE ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR THE LEGAL CLINIC, FOR COSTS RELATED TO IN-STATE JOB TRAINING PROGRAMS AND IMMIGRATION LAW CAPACITY FOR LEGAL SERVICES (ATG100) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 46.  $200,000.00      LEILEHUA ALUMNI AND COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR LEILEHUA ALUMNI AND COMMUNITY ASSOCIATION, FOR COSTS RELATED TO DEVELOPMENT OF AGRICULTURAL, AGRICULTURAL TECHNOLOGY, AND AGRICULTURAL ENTREPRENEURSHIP PROGRAMS FOR HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS IN THE LEILEHUA COMPLEX FOR SCHOOL-BASED BUDGETING (EDN100) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 47.  $150,000.00      MAUI ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT BOARD, INC. ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR MAUI ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT BOARD, INC., FOR COSTS RELATED TO PROGRAMS THAT PROVIDE PROFESSIONAL DEVELOPMENT, INTERNSHIPS, CAREER AWARENESS OPPORTUNITIES, EXTRACURRICULAR ACTIVITIES, AND IN-CLASSROOM SUPPORT TO PUBLIC SCHOOL STUDENTS AND TEACHERS STATEWIDE FOR SCHOOL-BASED BUDGETING (EDN100) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 48.  $375,000.00      MOILIILI COMMUNITY CENTER ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR MOILIILI COMMUNITY CENTER, FOR COSTS RELATED TO SUSTAIN ESSENTIAL COMMUNITY CENTER PROGRAMS AND OPERATIONS FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; PROVIDED THAT NO FUNDS SHALL BE USED FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE MOILIILI COMMUNITY CENTER JAPANESE LANGUAGE SCHOOL, IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE X, SECTION 1, OF THE HAWAII STATE CONSTITUTION; AND 49.  $100,000.00      NA WAHINE PAANI O PUNAHOU ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR NA WAHINE PAANI O PUNAHOU, FOR COSTS RELATED TO OPERATIONS OF AN ALL-GIRL HIGH SCHOOL WRESTLING TOURNAMENT FOR STATE ADMINISTRATION (EDN300) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 50.  $100,000.00      OAHU RESOURCE CONSERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT COUNCIL ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR OAHU RESOURCE CONSERVATION AND DEVELOPMENT COUNCIL, FOR COSTS RELATED TO OPERATION OF POP-UP LABS FOR STEM FOR SCHOOLS AND YOUTH ORGANIZATIONS FOR SCHOOL-BASED BUDGETING (EDN100) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 51.  $250,000.00      OCEANIT RESEARCH FOUNDATION ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR OCEANIT RESEARCH FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS RELATED TO A PROJECT TO RESTORE A BALANCED COASTAL ECOSYSTEM IN MANTOKUJI BAY FOR HAWAII TECHNOLOGY DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION (BED143) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 52.  $100,000.00      OHANA ARTS ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR OHANA ARTS, FOR COSTS RELATED TO TRANSPORTATION COSTS FOR YOUTH TOURING CAST PERFORMANCES FOR STATE FOUNDATION ON CULTURE AND THE ARTS (AGS881) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 53.  $150,000.00      PACIFIC BIRTH COLLECTIVE INCORPORATED ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR PACIFIC BIRTH COLLECTIVE INCORPORATED, FOR COSTS RELATED TO PROVIDING FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE TO INDIVIDUALS PURSUING LICENSURE AS A CERTIFIED MIDWIFE FOR GENERAL ADMINISTRATION (HTH907) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 54.  $175,000.00      PACIFIC INTERNATIONAL CENTER FOR HIGH TECHNOLOGY RESEARCH ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR PACIFIC INTERNATIONAL CENTER FOR HIGH TECHNOLOGY RESEARCH, FOR COSTS RELATED TO THE ANNUAL US-JAPAN COUNCIL ANNUAL CONFERENCE FOR GENERAL SUPPORT FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT (BED142) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 55.  $150,000.00      PACIFIC TSUNAMI MUSEUM, INC. ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR PACIFIC TSUNAMI MUSEUM, INC., FOR COSTS RELATED TO TSUNAMI PREPAREDNESS THROUGH MUSEUM EDUCATION AND COMMUNITY OUTREACH FOR AMELIORATION OF PHYSICAL DISASTERS (DEF110) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 56.  $55,000.00       PARENTS AND CHILDREN TOGETHER ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR PARENTS AND CHILDREN TOGETHER, FOR COSTS RELATED TO PROTECTION OF VICTIMS OF FAMILY VIOLENCE FOR FAMILY HEALTH SERVICES (HTH560) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 57.  $200,000.00      RESCUE TUBE FOUNDATION, THE ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR THE RESCUE TUBE FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS RELATED TO EXPANSION OF DEPLOYMENT AND BUILDING OF SUSTAINABILITY FOR PUBLIC RESCUE TUBES FOR LNR - NATURAL AND PHYSICAL ENVIRONMENT (LNR906) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 58.  $50,000.00       RISEHI ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR RISEHI, FOR COSTS RELATED TO EXPANSION OF MENTORSHIP PROGRAMS FOR STUDENTS STATEWIDE FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 59.  $300,000.00      SEARIDER PRODUCTIONS FOUNDATION ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR SEARIDER PRODUCTIONS FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS RELATED TO PROVIDING ACTIVITIES AND OPPORTUNITIES TO LEEWARD COAST STUDENTS FOCUSING ON HEALTHY LIVING, MAINTAINING A POSITIVE ATTITUDE, AND SAFETY FOR SCHOOL-BASED BUDGETING (EDN100)) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 60.  $200,000.00      SURFRIDER SPIRIT SESSIONS ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR SURFRIDER SPIRIT SESSIONS, FOR COSTS RELATED TO PROVIDING CULTURALLY RELEVANT, HIGH VALUE PROGRAMS FOR AT-RISK YOUTH TO OVERCOME TRAUMA, BUILD RESILIENCE, AND PROMOTE POSITIVE DEVELOPMENT FOR GENERAL ADMINISTRATION - DHS (HMS904) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 61.  $170,000.00      SUSTAINABLE COASTLINES HAWAII ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR SUSTAINABLE COASTLINES HAWAII, FOR COSTS RELATED TO ONGOING COASTAL AND MAUKA STEWARDSHIP, LEARNING COHORTS, AND EDUCATIONAL SERVICES RELATED TO RESOURCE RECOVERY AND SUSTAINABILITY FOR LNR - NATURAL AND PHYSICAL ENVIRONMENT (LNR906) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 62.  $200,000.00      UNITED KOREAN ASSOCIATION OF HAWAII, THE ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR THE UNITED KOREAN ASSOCIATION OF HAWAII, FOR COSTS RELATED TO OPERATING A CULTURAL COMMUNITY CENTER FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 63.  $200,000.00      WAHIAWA CENTER FOR COMMUNITY HEALTH, THE ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR THE WAHIAWA CENTER FOR COMMUNITY HEALTH, FOR COSTS RELATED TO PROVIDING PRIMARY CARE, MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES, SUBSTANCE ABUSE DISORDER TREATMENT, AND SOCIAL SERVICES IN WAIALUA, MOKULEIA, AND KAENA POINT FOR FAMILY HEALTH SERVICES (HTH560) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 64.  $250,000.00      WAIANAE DISTRICT COMPREHENSIVE HEALTH AND HOSPITAL BOARD, INCORPORATED ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR WAIANAE DISTRICT COMPREHENSIVE HEALTH AND HOSPITAL BOARD, INCORPORATED, FOR COSTS RELATED TO SECURITY STAFFING, STAFF EMERGENCY SCENARIO TRAINING, AND EXPANSION OF SURVEILLANCE AND MONITORING SYSTEMS FOR FAMILY HEALTH SERVICES (HTH560) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 65.  $400,000.00      WAIKIKI BUSINESS IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT ASSOCIATION ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR WAIKIKI BUSINESS IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT ASSOCIATION, FOR COSTS RELATED TO AN AMBASSADOR PROGRAM PROVIDING CUSTODIAL SERVICES, SAFETY AND SECURITY, HOSPITALITY SERVICES, AND SUPPORT FOR MENTALLY ILL AND HOMELESS INDIVIDUALS IN WAIKIKI FOR GENERAL SUPPORT FOR ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT (BED142) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 66.  $75,000.00       WAIKIKI COMMUNITY CENTER ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR WAIKIKI COMMUNITY CENTER, FOR COSTS RELATED TO EVIDENCE-BASED WELLNESS ACTIVITIES AND PERSONALIZED RESOURCE NAVIGATION FOR SENIORS FOR GENERAL ADMINISTRATION (HTH907) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 67.  $80,000.00       WAIPA FOUNDATION, THE ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR THE WAIPA FOUNDATION, FOR COSTS RELATED TO UPGRADE OF KITCHEN FACILITIES, SUSTAIN OPERATIONAL STAFF, AND CONDUCT A PROFESSIONAL ASSESSMENT OF THE FACILITIES' OVERALL CONDITION AND FUNCTIONALITY FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 68. $200,000.00     WEED AND SEED HAWAII, INC. ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR WEED AND SEED HAWAII, INC., FOR COSTS RELATED TO STAFFING, TRAINING, AND ACTIVITIES IN COMMUNITIES WITH A HISTORY OF HIGH LEVELS OF CRIME, DRUG USE, VIOLENCE, AND SEVERE ECONOMIC DETERIORATION FOR LEGAL SERVICES (ATG100) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS; AND 69. $100,000.00     YOUNG WOMEN'S CHRISTIAN ASSOCIATION OF OAHU ADD FUNDS AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HAWAII REVISED STATUTES, FOR YOUNG WOMEN'S CHRISTIAN ASSOCIATION OF OAHU, FOR COSTS RELATED TO OPERATIONS OF EMPLOYMENT SUPPORT SERVICES FOR WOMEN EXPERIENCING ECONOMIC, EDUCATIONAL, AND EMOTIONAL INSTABILITY FOR OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES (LBR903) ALL EXPENSES RELATED TO THEIR APPLICATION OF FUNDS. PART V.  CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS SECTION 14.  CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROJECTS AUTHORIZED.  The sums appropriated or authorized in part II of this Act for capital improvements shall be expended for the projects listed below.  Accounting of the appropriations by the department of accounting and general services shall be based on the projects as such projects are listed in this section. Several related or similar projects may be combined into a single project if such combination is advantageous or convenient for implementation; and provided further that the total cost of the projects thus combined shall not exceed the total of the sum specified for the projects separately.  The amount after each cost element and the total funding for each project listed in this part are in thousands of dollars. A.  ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT BED101 - OFFICE OF INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS 1.          EAST-WEST CENTER, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT TO RENOVATE, IMPROVE, AND MODERNIZE EAST-WEST CENTER BUILDINGS. TOTAL FUNDING              BED             5,000 C           C BED113 - HAWAII TOURISM AUTHORITY - ADMINISTRATION AND GOVERNANCE 2.          HAWAII CONVENTION CENTER IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE HAWAII CONVENTION CENTER. TOTAL FUNDING              BED            36,400 C           C AGR132 - ANIMAL DISEASE CONTROL 3.          HALAWA ANIMAL INDUSTRY FACILITY IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE ANIMAL INDUSTRY FACILITY IN HALAWA. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS             7,000 C           C AGR141 - AGRICULTURAL RESOURCE MANAGEMENT 4.          STATE IRRIGATION SYSTEM RESERVOIR SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR THE STATE IRRIGATION SYSTEM RESERVOIR SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              AGR             5,000 C           C AGR                 1 N           N AGR192 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION FOR AGRICULTURE 5.          MISCELLANEOUS HEALTH, SAFETY, CODE, AND OTHER REQUIREMENTS, STATEWIDE DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO ADDRESS HEALTH, SAFETY, CODE, AND OTHER REQUIREMENTS, STATEWIDE. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS             1,900 C      2,200 C BED170 - AGRIBUSINESS DEVELOPMENT AND RESEARCH 6.          ACQUISITION OF AGRICULTURAL LANDS, KAPAIA, KAUAI LAND ACQUISITION FROM GROVE FARM ON KAUAI. TOTAL FUNDING              BED            39,000 C           C 7.          ACQUISITION OF AGRICULTURAL LANDS, WAIMEA, KAUAI LAND ACQUISITION FOR AGRICULTURAL LANDS ON KAUAI, TMKS: 1-6-001-045, 1-6-001-030, AND 1-6-001-028. TOTAL FUNDING              BED             1,300 C           C 8.          AGRICULTURAL INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO AGRICULTURAL INFRASTRUCTURE IN WAHIAWA AND WAIALUA, OAHU. TOTAL FUNDING              BED             9,200 C           C 9.          ANIMAL PROCESSING AND STORAGE FACILITY, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT, AND FURNISHINGS FOR A DEDICATED SMALL ANIMAL PROCESSING AND STORAGE FACILITY ON OAHU TO SUPPORT POST-SLAUGHTER HANDLING.  THIS FACILITY WILL INCLUDE AREAS FOR CARCASS BREAKDOWN, MEAT CUTTING, PACKAGING, CHILLING, AND COLD STORAGE TO EXPAND LOCAL CAPACITY FOR SAFE, HIGH-QUALITY MEAT PROCESSING.  THE PROJECT WILL SERVE SMALL- AND MID-SIZED PRODUCERS, IMPROVE LOCAL FOOD SYSTEM INFRASTRUCTURE, AND ENHANCE THE AVAILABILITY OF HAWAII-GROWN MEAT FOR CONSUMERS. TOTAL FUNDING              BED            17,000 C           C 10.         COMMERCIAL LAND PURCHASE, OAHU LAND ACQUISITION OF COMMERCIAL LAND ON OAHU, TMK 7-1-006-001. TOTAL FUNDING              BED               500 C      4,500 C 11.         CONSTRUCTION FOR A STATE POSTHARVEST FACILITY, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR A POSTHARVEST FACILITY ON OAHU, TMKs 7-1-002:004 (por.); 009 (por.); 023 (por.). TOTAL FUNDING              BED            22,076 C           C 12.         FOOD AND PRODUCT INNOVATION NETWORK (FPIN), STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT, LAND ACQUISITION, AND FURNISHINGS FOR A FOOD AND PRODUCT INNOVATION NETWORK, STATEWIDE. TOTAL FUNDING              BED               350 C           C 13.         FOOD PROCESSING PLANT, OAHU LAND ACQUISITION, PLANS, DESIGN, EQUIPMENT, AND FURNISHING FOR A FOOD PROCESSING PLANT, OAHU, TMKs 7-4-005-032 and 7-4-005-018. TOTAL FUNDING              BED             6,275 C        650 C 14.         IRRIGATION SYSTEM, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, LAND ACQUISITION, REHABILITATION, AND EXPANSION COSTS FOR AN AGRICULTURAL IRRIGATION SYSTEM, WAHIAWA, OAHU. TOTAL FUNDING              BED             2,000 C           C 15.         PURCHASE OF LAND LOCKED BETWEEN STATE-OWNED LAND, OAHU LAND ACQUISITION FOR AGRICULTURAL LANDS ON OAHU, TMK 6-5-002-027. TOTAL FUNDING              BED             3,000 C           C 16.         SMALL ANIMAL SLAUGHTERHOUSE, OAHU LAND ACQUISITION, PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND FURNISHING EQUIPMENT FOR A SMALL ANIMAL SLAUGHTERHOUSE.  GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS, EQUIPMENT, AND APPURTENANCES, OAHU. TOTAL FUNDING              BED             4,000 C           C 17.         WAIAHOLE WATER SYSTEM IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE WAIAHOLE WATER SYSTEM AND APPURTENANT WORKS. TOTAL FUNDING              BED             2,500 C           C 18.         WASTEWATER RECLAIMED WATER IRRIGATION SYSTEM, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR A WASTEWATER RECLAIMED WATER IRRIGATION SYSTEM AND INTAKE PUMP STATION, WAHIAWA, OAHU. TOTAL FUNDING              BED             4,000 C           C LNR141 - WATER AND LAND DEVELOPMENT 19.         ROCKFALL AND FLOOD MITIGATION, STATEWIDE DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR ROCKFALL AND FLOOD MITIGATION AT VARIOUS LOCATIONS, STATEWIDE.  THE LEGISLATURE FINDS AND DECLARES THAT THE APPROPRIATION IS IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST AND FOR THE PUBLIC'S HEALTH, SAFETY AND GENERAL WELFARE OF THE STATE. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR             2,000 C           C BED150 - HAWAII COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY 20.         99-YEAR LEASEHOLD PROGRAM, PHASE 2, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR A LEASEHOLD CONDOMINIUM FACILITY UNDER THE 99-YEAR LEASEHOLD PROGRAM, LOCATED AT TMKs 2-1-049-080 AND 2-1-049-063. TOTAL FUNDING              BED            15,000 C           C 21.         CLIMATE CHANGE IMPACT ASSESSMENT, OAHU PLANS TO CONDUCT AN ASSESSMENT AND RULEMAKING TO CONSIDER THE IMPACTS OF CLIMATE CHANGE AND SEA LEVEL RISE FOR THE DEVELOPMENT IN HCDA'S KAKAAKO AND KALAELOA COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT DISTRICTS. TOTAL FUNDING              BED             2,000 C           C 22.         IWILEI-KAPALAMA COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT, OAHU DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION OF INFRASTRUCTURE PROJECTS TO SUPPORT IWILEI-KAPALAMA COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              BED            12,000 C           C 23.         KAKAAKO MAKAI GEOTECHNICAL ASSESSMENT, OAHU RESEARCH PAST STUDIES AND CONDUCT GEOTECHNICAL SURVEY OF CONTAMINATED MAKAI LANDS. TOTAL FUNDING              BED             1,500 C           C 24.         KAKAAKO MAKAI PLANNING, OAHU PLANS FOR AN INFRASTRUCTURE ASSESSMENT AND COMMUNITY PLANNING FOR KAKAAKO MAKAI. TOTAL FUNDING              BED             1,000 C           C 25.         KALAELOA INFRASTRUCTURE-EIS DISTRICT WIDE, KALAELOA, OAHU PLANS FOR PROGRAMMATIC ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT STATEMENT FOR THE KALAELOA COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT. TOTAL FUNDING              BED             1,000 C           C 26.         KUPUNA SUPPORTIVE HOUSING, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF KUPUNA SUPPORTIVE HOUSING, LOCATED AT TMK 2-1-030-012. TOTAL FUNDING              BED             5,500 C     29,450 C BED160 - HAWAII HOUSING FINANCE AND DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION 27.         CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING REVOLVING FUND, STATEWIDE CONSTRUCTION TO PROVIDE AN INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE ADDITIONAL AFFORDABLE RENTAL HOUSING, STATEWIDE. TOTAL FUNDING              BED            50,000 C     50,000 C 28.         CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING REVOLVING FUND, TIER II, STATEWIDE CONSTRUCTION TO PROVIDE AN INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE RENTAL HOUSING REVOLVING FUND TIER II AFFORDABLE RENTAL HOUSING, STATEWIDE. TOTAL FUNDING              BED            50,000 C     50,000 C 29.         DWELLING UNIT REVOLVING FUND INFUSION, STATEWIDE CONSTRUCTION TO PROVIDE AN INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE ADDITIONAL AFFORDABLE HOUSING, STATEWIDE. TOTAL FUNDING              BED                   C     40,000 C B.  EMPLOYMENT LBR903 - OFFICE OF COMMUNITY SERVICES 1.          442ND LEGACY CENTER CONSTRUCTION FOR COMPLETION OF MUSEUM. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               300 C           C 2.          ADULT FRIENDS FOR YOUTH LAND ACQUISITION FOR HIGH-RISK YOUTH REDIRECTIONAL THERAPY. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               300 C           C 3.          ALCOHOLIC REHABILITATION SERVICES OF HAWAII, INC., THE CONSTRUCTION FOR INSTALLATION OF SOLAR PANELS. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               400 C           C 4.          ARC OF HILO, THE LAND ACQUISITION FOR REDIRECTIONAL THERAPY FOR HIGH-RISK YOUTH. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               300 C           C 5.          ARC OF MAUI COUNTY CONSTRUCTION AND LAND ACQUISITION FOR SAFE AND ACCESSIBLE ENVIRONMENT FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENT DISABILITIES, AND ELECTRICAL UPGRADES. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               200 C           C 6.          BACK TO THE BEGINNING, INC. CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR BUILDING OF RESIDENTIAL FACILITIES. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               300 C           C 7.          BLOOD BANK OF HAWAII EQUIPMENT FOR BLOODMOBILE VEHICLE. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               500 C           C 8.          BOYS AND GIRLS CLUB OF HAWAII CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR CLUBHOUSE REPAIRS ON OAHU AND KAUAI. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               600 C           C 9.          DIGS DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT, AND LAND ACQUISITION FOR PROCUREMENT AND CONSTRUCTION OF AN AFFORDABLE CENTER ON OAHU. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               600 C           C 10.         ELEPAIO SOCIAL SERVICES PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR DEVELOPMENT OF A COMMUNITY RESILIENCE FACILITY. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               600 C           C 11.         EPISCOPAL CHURCH IN HAWAII, THE CONSTRUCTION FOR CONSTRUCTION OF A COMMUNITY CENTER IN KAPOLEI. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               480 C           C 12.         FILIPINO COMMUNITY CENTER INC., THE CONSTRUCTION FOR SECURITY, SAFETY, AND FACILITY INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS, AND LANDSCAPE REHABILITATION. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               250 C           C 13.         FIVE MOUNTAINS HAWAII, INC. CONSTRUCTION FOR CONSTRUCTION OF A RURAL HEALTH CLINIC ON HAWAII ISLAND. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               200 C           C 14.         FRIENDS OF THE SUNSET MEMORIAL CEMETERY CONSTRUCTION FOR MAUSOLEUM RENOVATION. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               150 C           C 15.         GREGORY HOUSE PROGRAMS PLANS AND CONSTRUCTION FOR REPAIR AND IMPROVEMENTS TO A TRANSITIONAL HOUSING FACILITY ON OAHU. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               300 C           C 16.         HABITAT FOR HUMANITY INTERNATIONAL, INC. (HONOLULU) CONSTRUCTION FOR A HOME REPAIR REVOLVING FUND PROGRAM ON OAHU. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               175 C           C 17.         HALE OPIO KAUAI, INC. CONSTRUCTION FOR RENOVATION OF TWO RESIDENTIAL TREATMENT HOMES IN LAWAI AND KAPAHI. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               168 C           C 18.         HANA HEALTH DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTIONS FOR CONSTRUCTION OF A SPECIALTY MEDICAL AND DENTAL FACILITY. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               600 C           C 19.         HAWAII FOODBANK, INC. PLANS, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR SOLAR PANEL INSTALLATION. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               800 C           C 20.         HAWAII ISLAND VETERANS MEMORIAL CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR RENOVATIONS OF ADULT DAY HEALTH HALLWAYS, CLASSROOMS, AND MEETING AREAS. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               175 C           C 21.         HAWAII THEATRE CENTER CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR BUILDING RESIDENTIAL FACILITIES. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               150 C           C 22.         HAWAII UNITED OKINAWA ASSOCIATION CONSTRUCTION AND LAND ACQUISITION FOR THE PURCHASE OF LAND AND ELECTRICAL UPGRADES. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               400 C           C 23.         HIIPAKA, LLC CONSTRUCTION FOR  A CULTURAL TRAINING AND EDUCATION CENTER. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               400 C           C 24.         HILO BAYFRONT TRAILS, INC. CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR SAFETY REPAIRS AND IMPROVEMENTS. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               120 C           C 25.         HOLUALOA FOUNDATION FOR ARTS & CULTURE PLANS AND DESIGN FOR MASTER CAMPUS PLAN DEVELOPMENT TO RENOVATE AND UPGRADE EXISTING FACILITIES. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               300 C           C 26.         HOMESTEAD COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION DESIGN FOR DEVELOPMENT OF A HAWAIIAN HOMESTEAD MULTI-PURPOSE CENTER IN SOUTH HILO. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               350 C           C 27.         HOOULU LAHUI LAND ACQUISITION FOR ACQUISITION OF A PROPERTY FOR PUBLIC CHARTER SCHOOL IN PUNA. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               500 C           C 28.         HUI MALAMA O KANEIOLOUMA CONSTRUCTION AND EQUIPMENT FOR RESTORATION OF ANCIENT HAWAIIAN VILLAGE ON KAUAI. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               400 C           C 29.         INSPIRATION HAWAII MUSEUM, INC. PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR REPAIR AND RENOVATION OF RESTROOMS. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               311 C           C 30.         ISLAND OF HAWAII YMCA, THE DESIGN FOR DESIGN OF NEW COMMUNITY CENTER PROJECT ON HAWAII ISLAND. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               300 C           C 31.         JAPANESE CULTURAL CENTER OF HAWAII CONSTRUCTION FOR RENOVATION OF HISTORICAL HERITAGE EXHIBIT ON OAHU. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               300 C           C 32.         KALIHI-PALAMA HEALTH CENTER (HALE HOOLA HOU) CONSTRUCTION FOR RENOVATION OF BATHROOM, NEW ALARM, NEW AIR CONDITIONING, AND REPLACEMENT OF DENTAL EQUIPMENT. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               350 C           C 33.         KAUAI ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY INCORPORATED CONSTRUCTION FOR REPAIR OF HOMELESS SHELTER PROPERTIES. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               600 C           C 34.         KAUAI FOODBANK, INC., THE CONSTRUCTION FOR REPAIR OF WAREHOUSE IN LIHUE. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               116 C           C 35.         LAI OPUA 2020 PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR COMPLETION OF COMMUNITY COMPLEX IN KEALAKEHE. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               300 C           C 36.         LANAKILA PACIFIC PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR AIR CONDITIONING REPLACEMENT. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               500 C           C 37.         MAKIKI CHRISTIAN CHURCH CONSTRUCTION FOR RE-ROOFING OF TOWER AND SOCIAL HALL. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               500 C           C 38.         MALAMA KAUAI (AGRICULTURAL PARK) DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR ESTABLISHMENT OF AN AGRICULTURAL PARK IN EAST KAUAI. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               350 C           C 39.         MALAMA NA MAKUA A KEIKI CONSTRUCTION FOR REPAIR AND REPLACE ROOF AND CEILING, RENOVATION OF BATHROOM, AND OFFICE SPACE. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               425 C           C 40.         MANOA JAPANESE LANGUAGE SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION FOR BATHROOM RENOVATION. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               130 C           C 41.         MAUI ADVANCED MANUFACTURING ALLIANCE CORP. CONSTRUCTION FOR DEVELOPMENT OF AN ADVANCED MANUFACTURING CENTER. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               400 C           C 42.         NAMAHANA EDUCATION FOUNDATION CONSTRUCTION FOR CONSTRUCTION OF CLASSROOMS AT NAMAHANA SCHOOL. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               400 C           C 43.         OLELO COMMUNITY TELEVISION DESIGN AND EQUIPMENT FOR SERVER CAPACITY FOR MEDIA CAPTURE, PROCESSING, AND ADDITIONAL ARCHIVAL SPACE. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               400 C           C 44.         PAPAKOLEA COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION PLANS FOR MASTER PLANNING FOR EXPANSION OF NATIVE HAWAIIAN EDUCATION AND CULTURE CENTER IN PUOWAINA. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               500 C           C 45.         POLYNESIAN VOYAGING SOCIETY PLANS AND CONSTRUCTION FOR RENOVATIONS OF A MARINE EDUCATION AND TRAINING CENTER. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               175 C           C 46.         PUNA COMMUNITY HEALTH CENTER FOUNDATION PLANS AND DESIGN FOR A MEDICAL CAMPUS IN PUNA. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               400 C           C 47.         REHABILITATION HOSPITAL OF THE PACIFIC, THE EQUIPMENT FOR PURCHASE AND INSTALLATION OF HOSPITAL BEDS. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               600 C           C 48.         ST. JAMES EPISCOPAL CHURCH CONSTRUCTION FOR NEW COMMUNITY CENTER IN WAIMEA. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               200 C           C 49.         TRUST FOR PUBLIC LAND, THE PLANS AND DESIGN FOR AALA PARK IMPROVEMENTS. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               475 C           C 50.         UNITED STATES VETERANS INITIATIVE CONSTRUCTION FOR MAINTENANCE AND IMPROVEMENTS TO EMERGENCY SHELTER IN WAIANAE. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               100 C           C 51.         WAHIAWA CENTER FOR COMMUNITY HEALTH, THE PLANS AND CONSTRUCTION FOR RENOVATION OF A PEDIATRIC CLINIC. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               400 C           C 52.         WAIANAE COMMUNITY RE-DEVELOPMENT CORPORATION EQUIPMENT FOR FARM EQUIPMENT FOR PRODUCTION OF ORGANIC PRODUCE. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               100 C           C 53.         WAIMANALO HEALTH CENTER CONSTRUCTION FOR ENHANCEMENTS TO A PATIENT-CENTERED HEALTH CARE HOME. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               350 C           C 54.         WAIOHULI HAWAIIAN HOMESTEADERS ASSOCIATION, INC. PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR COMPUTER CENTER CONSTRUCTION. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               400 C           C 55.         WEST HAWAII COMMUNITY HEALTH CENTER, INC. PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR CONSTRUCTION OF WORKFORCE HOUSING. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               500 C           C 56.         YOUNG WOMEN'S CHRISTIAN ASSOCIATION OF OAHU (KOKOKAHI) CONSTRUCTION FOR RENOVATIONS TO JULIETTE M. ATHERTON HALL AND KITCHEN. THIS PROJECT QUALIFIES AS A GRANT PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 42F, HRS. TOTAL FUNDING              LBR               400 C           C C.  TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES TRN102 - DANIEL K. INOUYE INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT 1.          DANIEL K. INOUYE INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT, AIRPORT IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO TERMINALS, SYSTEMS, AND FACILITIES AT THE AIRPORT. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN            17,061 E     26,760 E TRN                 1 N          1 N TRN111 - HILO INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT 2.          HILO INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT, AIRPORT IMPROVEMENTS, HAWAII DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO TERMINALS, SYSTEMS, AND FACILITIES AT THE AIRPORT. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN            26,000 E           E TRN                 1 N           N TRN114 - ELLISON ONIZUKA KONA INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT AT KEAHOLE 3.          ELLISON ONIZUKA KONA INTERNATIONAL AIRPORT AT KEAHOLE, AIRPORT IMPROVEMENTS, HAWAII DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO TERMINALS, SYSTEMS, AND FACILITIES AT THE AIRPORT. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN           137,045 E           E TRN            10,000 N           N TRN131 - KAHULUI AIRPORT 4.          KAHULUI AIRPORT, AIRPORT IMPROVEMENTS, MAUI DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO TERMINALS, SYSTEMS, AND FACILITIES AT THE AIRPORT. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN            52,250 E     57,500 E TRN             5,000 N           N TRN141 - MOLOKAI AIRPORT 5.          MOLOKAI AIRPORT, AIRPORT IMPROVEMENTS, MOLOKAI DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO TERMINALS, SYSTEMS, AND FACILITIES AT THE AIRPORT. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             6,230 E           E TRN             2,000 N           N TRN161 - LIHUE AIRPORT 6.          LIHUE AIRPORT, AIRPORT IMPROVEMENTS, KAUAI DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO TERMINALS, SYSTEMS, AND FACILITIES AT THE AIRPORT. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             9,225 E      5,140 E TRN                 1 N      4,600 N TRN195 - AIRPORTS ADMINISTRATION 7.          AIRFIELD IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR AIRFIELD IMPROVEMENTS AT STATEWIDE AIRPORTS. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN           154,877 E    656,162 E TRN             1,800 N     60,000 N 8.          AIRPORT DEVELOPMENT, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR STATEWIDE IMPROVEMENTS. IMPROVEMENTS INCLUDE PLANNING STUDIES, SAFETY, COMPLIANCE, OPERATIONAL EFFICIENCY, DEVELOPMENT, AND MANAGEMENT SUPPORT SERVICES. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN            50,000 E     39,000 E TRN                 1 N          1 N 9.          AIRPORTS DIVISION CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM PROJECT STAFF COSTS, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR COSTS RELATED TO WAGES AND FRINGE BENEFITS FOR PERMANENT PROJECT FUNDED STAFF POSITIONS FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM PROJECTS FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION'S AIRPORTS DIVISION. PROJECT MAY ALSO INCLUDE FUNDS FOR NON-PERMANENT CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM RELATED POSITIONS (OTHER FUNDS FROM PASSENGER FACILITY CHARGES). TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             7,500 B      7,500 B TRN               200 X        200 X 10.         FACILITY IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS OF VARIOUS FACILITIES AND OTHER RELATED IMPROVEMENTS. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN            89,500 E     56,500 E TRN                 1 N          1 N 11.         LUMP SUM CIP  AIRPORTS PROJECT ADJUSTMENT FUND, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A CONTINGENCY FUND FOR PROJECT ADJUSTMENT PURPOSES SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THE APPROPRIATIONS ACT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN                 4 E          4 E 12.         RENTAL CAR FACILITY IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION TO PROVIDE CONSOLIDATED CAR RENTAL FACILITIES FOR THE RENTAL CAR AGENCIES AND OTHER RELATED IMPROVEMENTS (OTHER FUNDS FROM CUSTOMER FACILITY CHARGES). TOTAL FUNDING              TRN           301,000 X           X TRN301 - HONOLULU HARBOR 13.         HONOLULU HARBOR IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS THROUGHOUT HONOLULU HARBOR, OAHU. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN            24,992 B     39,992 B TRN                 4 N          4 N TRN                 4 R          4 R TRN303 - KALAELOA BARBERS POINT HARBOR 14.         KALAELOA BARBERS POINT HARBOR IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS THROUGHOUT KALAELOA BARBERS POINT HARBOR, OAHU. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN                 4 B     34,992 B TRN                 4 N          4 N TRN                 4 R          4 R TRN311 - HILO HARBOR 15.         HILO HARBOR IMPROVEMENTS, HAWAII PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS THROUGHOUT HILO HARBOR, HAWAII. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN                 4 B     44,992 B TRN                 4 N          4 N TRN                 4 R          4 R TRN331 - KAHULUI HARBOR 16.         KAHULUI HARBOR IMPROVEMENTS, MAUI PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS THROUGHOUT KAHULUI HARBOR, MAUI. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN                 4 B      9,992 B TRN                 4 N          4 N TRN                 4 R          4 R TRN341 - KAUNAKAKAI HARBOR 17.         KAUNAKAKAI HARBOR IMPROVEMENTS, MOLOKAI PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS THROUGHOUT KAUNAKAKAI HARBOR, MOLOKAI. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN                 4 B          4 B TRN                 4 N          4 N TRN                 4 R          4 R TRN361 - NAWILIWILI HARBOR 18.         NAWILIWILI HARBOR IMPROVEMENTS, KAUAI PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS THROUGHOUT NAWILIWILI HARBOR, KAUAI. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             9,992 B      4,992 B TRN                 4 N          4 N TRN                 4 R          4 R TRN351 - KAUMALAPAU HARBOR 19.         KAUMALAPAU HARBOR IMPROVEMENTS, LANAI PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM PROJECTS THAT WILL PROVIDE FOR SAFER, MORE EFFICIENT USE OF EXISTING AND/OR ADDITIONAL OPERATIONAL AREAS THROUGHOUT KAUMALAPAU HARBOR, LANAI. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN                 4 B      1,992 B TRN                 4 N          4 N TRN                 4 R          4 R TRN395 - HARBORS ADMINISTRATION 20.         COMMERCIAL HARBORS ADMINISTRATIVE INITIATIVES, STATEWIDE PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR COST RELATED TO STATEWIDE IMPROVEMENTS FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION'S HARBORS DIVISION, STATEWIDE. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN            14,992 B     14,992 B TRN                 4 N          4 N TRN                 4 R          4 R 21.         MODERNIZATION PROGRAM - HARBORS DIVISION CIP PROJECT STAFF COSTS, STATEWIDE PLANS FOR COSTS RELATED TO WAGES AND FRINGE BENEFITS FOR PERMANENT HARBOR MODERNIZATION PLAN PROJECT FUNDED STAFF POSITIONS FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF MODERNIZATION PROGRAM PROJECTS FOR THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION'S HARBORS DIVISION, STATEWIDE. PROJECTS MAY ALSO INCLUDE FUNDS FOR NON-PERMANENT CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM RELATED POSITIONS. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             2,500 B      2,500 B TRN501 - OAHU HIGHWAYS 22.         ALA WAI CANAL AND WATERWAYS DEBRIS CLEARING, OAHU DESIGN AND IMPLEMENT PILOT PROJECT FOR ALA WAI CANAL AND WATERWAYS TO PREVENT DEBRIS FROM FLOWING INTO THE ALA WAI SMALL BOAT HARBOR AND OCEAN. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN               750 C           C 23.         INTERSTATE ROUTE H-1 IMPROVEMENTS, KUALAKAI INTERCHANGE TO WAIAWA INTERCHANGE, OAHU DESIGN FOR THE ADDITION OF A TRAVEL LANE IN EACH DIRECTION OF INTERSTATE ROUTE H-1, BETWEEN KUALAKAI INTERCHANGE AND WAIAWA INTERCHANGE. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN               400 E        800 E TRN             1,600 N      3,200 N 24.         INTERSTATE ROUTE H-1, KUNIA EAST BOUND ON-RAMP, OAHU PLANS FOR A KUNIA EAST BOUND ON-RAMP; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             1,500 E           E 25.         INTERSTATE ROUTE H-3, FINISH WORK AND MITIGATION, JUNCTION AT H-1 TO KMCAS, OAHU CONSTRUCTION FOR FINISH WORK RELATED TO THE CONSTRUCTION OF INTERSTATE ROUTE H-3. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             2,428 E           E TRN             5,654 N           N 26.         KAMEHAMEHA HIGHWAY, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR A BARRIER AND SIGNAGE ALONG KAMEHAMEHA HIGHWAY NEAR THE KIPAPA GULCH BRIDGE TO ENHANCE PUBLIC SAFETY, PREVENT UNAUTHORIZED ENCAMPMENTS, AND ENSURE UNOBSTRUCTED ACCESS TO THE HIGHWAY. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             1,850 E           E 27.         KAMEHAMEHA HIGHWAY, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO KAMEHAMEHA HIGHWAY BETWEEN MILILANI AND PEARL CITY. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. . TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             3,720 E           E TRN            14,880 N           N 28.         LAND ACQUISITION TO SUPPORT THE NORTH SHORE SUSTAINABLE COMMUNITIES PLAN, OAHU PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, AND DESIGN FOR ACQUISITION, DUE DILIGENCE, AND EIS FOR PARCEL LOCATED AT TMK: 6-4-001-015. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             4,695 C           C 29.         PAAKEA ROAD, OAHU CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO PAAKEA ROAD FOR USE AS AN EMERGENCY PARALLEL ROUTE ON THE WEST COAST OF OAHU. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             5,000 E           E TRN511 - HAWAII HIGHWAYS 30.         ALTERNATE ROUTE SELECTION STUDY FOR PUNA MAKAI ALTERNATE ROUTE, HAWAII PLANS FOR ALTERNATIVE ROUTE FOR PUNA MAKAI. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             1,500 E           E 31.         ALTERNATE ROUTE SELECTION STUDY FOR PUNA MAUKA, HAWAII PLANS FOR ALTERNATIVE ROUTE FOR PUNA MAUKA; PROVIDED THAT NO STATE FUNDS SHALL BE EXPENDED UNLESS THE COUNTY OF HAWAII CONTRIBUTES MATCHING COUNTY FUNDS FOR STATE FUNDS ON A DOLLAR-FOR-DOLLAR BASIS. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             1,000 E           E TRN             1,000 S           S 32.         PUAINAKO STREET IMPROVEMENTS, HAWAII DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR CORRIDOR IMPROVEMENTS ALONG PUAINAKO STREET. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             2,000 E      4,800 E TRN                   N     19,200 N TRN531 - MAUI HIGHWAYS 33.         HANA HIGHWAY IMPROVEMENTS, HUELO TO HANA, MAUI CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVING, UPGRADING AND/OR REPAIRING ROADWAYS, BRIDGES, WALLS, DRAINAGE STRUCTURES, GUARDRAILS, AND OTHER FACILITIES ON ROUTE 360 HANA HIGHWAY. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             1,000 B           B TRN             4,000 N           N 34.         PIILANI HIGHWAY WIDENING, KILOHANA DRIVE TO WAILEA IKE DRIVE, MAUI LAND ACQUISITION FOR SAFETY, OPERATIONAL, AND CAPACITY IMPROVEMENTS FOR VEHICLES AND MULTIMODAL USERS ALONG PIILANI HIGHWAY FROM KILOHANA DRIVE TO WAILEA IKE DRIVE. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN                   E        100 E TRN                   N        400 N 35.         WAIALE ROAD EXTENSION, MAUI PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR A WAIALE ROAD EXTENSION TO THE WAIKAPU COUNTRY TOWN PROJECT. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             5,000 E           E TRN                 1 N           N TRN561 - KAUAI HIGHWAYS 36.         KAUMUALII HIGHWAY IMPROVEMENTS, LIHUE TO WEST OF MALUHIA ROAD, KAUAI LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR WIDENING OF KAUMUALII HIGHWAY, LIHUE TO WEST OF MALUHIA ROAD, FROM TWO TO FOUR LANES. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             1,000 E      5,200 E TRN             4,000 N     20,800 N TRN595 - HIGHWAYS ADMINISTRATION 37.         HIGHWAY DRAINAGE IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR DRAINAGE IMPROVEMENTS TO HIGHWAY FACILITIES INCLUDING INSTALLATION OF DRAINAGE FACILITIES, CATCH BASINS, GRATED DROP INLETS, LINED SWALES, HEADWALLS, AND CULVERTS, DRYWELLS, DITCHES, AND BASINS AT VARIOUS LOCATIONS. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             1,348 B           B TRN             3,090 E      1,600 E TRN             4,360 N      4,000 N 38.         HIGHWAY ENVIRONMENTAL MITIGATION AND REMEDIATION, STATEWIDE LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR ENVIRONMENTAL MITIGATION AND REMEDIATION MEASURES, INCLUDING EROSION CONTROL INSTALLATIONS AND BEST MANAGEMENT PRACTICES AT VARIOUS LOCATIONS, STATEWIDE. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             4,250 E      4,000 E 39.         HIGHWAY PLANNING, STATEWIDE PLANS FOR FEDERAL AID AND NON-FEDERAL AID PROGRAMS AND PROJECTS THAT INCLUDE ROADWAY CLASSIFICATION, DATA COLLECTION, LONG- AND MID-RANGE PLANNING, TRANSPORTATION NEEDS STUDIES, HRS 343/NEPA STUDIES, CORRIDOR STUDIES, SCOPING, AND BRIDGE EVALUATIONS. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN               962 E           E TRN             3,848 N           N 40.         HIGHWAY PROJECT CLOSEOUT, STATEWIDE LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR COMPLETION AND CLOSEOUT OF PROJECTS IN CLOSING STAGES AND/OR FOR PROJECTS REQUIRING FUNDS FOR FINAL SETTLEMENT. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN               800 E        900 E TRN                 2 N          3 N 41.         HIGHWAY RESEARCH, STATEWIDE PLANS FOR FEDERAL AID AND NON-FEDERAL AID RESEARCH AND PROJECTS, INCLUDING TECHNOLOGY TRANSFER AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN               600 B           B TRN             4,425 E      4,300 E TRN            20,101 N     17,200 N 42.         HIGHWAY SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO HIGHWAY FACILITIES NECESSARY FOR HIGHWAY SYSTEM SAFETY. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             1,405 B        300 B TRN            11,308 E     12,190 E TRN            24,994 N      9,560 N 43.         HIGHWAY STRUCTURAL FACILITIES PROGRAM, STATEWIDE PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR THE REPLACEMENT, UPGRADE, REHABILITATION, AND/OR MAJOR REPAIR OF HIGHWAY STRUCTURES, INCLUDING BRIDGES, TUNNELS, METAL CULVERTS, AND DESTINATION SIGN STRUCTURES. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN            14,063 B     11,920 B TRN            66,686 E     72,603 E TRN           396,400 N    338,094 N 44.         HIGHWAY SYSTEM ENHANCEMENT, STATEWIDE PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION TO PROVIDE FOR AND IMPROVE HIGHWAY SYSTEM ENHANCEMENTS, INCLUDING PEDESTRIAN AND BICYCLE FACILITIES. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN               990 B        610 B TRN            15,738 E      5,631 E TRN            26,502 N     17,717 N 45.         HIGHWAY SYSTEM PRESERVATION IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE CONSTRUCTION FOR THE PRESERVATION OF THE STATE HIGHWAY SYSTEM AND ITS FACILITIES, INCLUDING PAVEMENT, AND SIGNAGE, AND THE ADDRESS OF SHORELINE AND BRIDGE SCOUR ISSUES. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             2,540 B      4,513 B TRN            23,361 E           E TRN           106,104 N          1 N 46.         HIGHWAY TRAFFIC OPERATIONAL IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO EXISTING HIGHWAY FACILITIES FOR MORE EFFICIENT TRAFFIC FLOW. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             1,775 B           B TRN            26,064 E     10,100 E TRN            32,394 N     40,400 N TRN               700 S           S 47.         PACIFIC PALISADES, OAHU PLANS FOR AN EMERGENCY EGRESS/INGRESS ROUTE FOR PACIFIC PALISADES. TOTAL FUNDING              TRN             1,000 C           C D.  ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION HTH840 - ENVIRONMENTAL MANAGEMENT 1.          SAFE DRINKING WATER REVOLVING FUND, STATEWIDE CONSTRUCTION TO PROVIDE STATE MATCH FUNDS FOR FEDERAL CAPITALIZATION GRANTS FOR DRINKING WATER TREATMENT REVOLVING LOAN FUND, PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 340E, HRS. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              HTH             5,913 C      5,913 C HTH            29,558 N     29,558 N 2.          WASTEWATER TREATMENT REVOLVING FUND FOR POLLUTION CONTROL, STATEWIDE CONSTRUCTION FUNDS TO PROVIDE STATE MATCH FOR FEDERAL CAPITALIZATION GRANTS FOR WASTEWATER PROJECTS. FUNDS TO BE TRANSFERRED TO THE WATER POLLUTION CONTROL REVOLVING FUND PURSUANT TO CHAPTER 342D, HRS. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              HTH             5,082 C      5,082 C HTH            25,406 N     25,406 N LNR401 - ECOSYSTEM PROTECTION AND RESTORATION 3.          ANUENUE FISHERIES RESEARCH CENTER ANNEX, ROOF REPAIR/PHOTOVOLTAIC SYSTEM INSTALLATION, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR ROOF REPAIR AND INSTALLATION OF A PHOTOVOLTAIC SYSTEM AT THE ANUENUE FISHERIES RESEARCH CENTER ANNEX (AFRC ANNEX). TOTAL FUNDING              LNR               750 C           C 4.          FISHING ACCESS IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT, AND RELATED WORK FOR IMPROVEMENTS ACROSS FISHING AREAS ON OAHU. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR               400 C           C LNR402 - NATIVE RESOURCES AND FIRE PROTECTION PROGRAM 5.          KAWAINUI MARSH PROTECTION AND IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR PREDATOR FENCING, BUFFERS, AND ACCESS IMPROVEMENTS, VICINITY OF KAWAINUI LEVEE TO KAWAINUI MODEL AIRPLANE FIELD. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR             8,750 C           C 6.          POHAKEA FIRE PREVENTION AND SUPPRESSION INFRASTRUCTURE, MAUI PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR A SECTION OF DLNR LANDS IN WEST MAUI HIGHLY PRONE TO WILDFIRE DUE TO INVASIVE GRASSES. THE RECENT ACQUISITION OF THREE WELLS AND A 750,000-GALLON WATER TANK WILL ENABLE THE BRANCH TO REPLACE HAZARDOUS FUEL LOADS WITH GREEN BREAKS, RIPARIAN CORRIDORS, AND GRAZING BREAKS. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR             1,750 C           C LNR404 - WATER RESOURCES 7.          DEEP MONITOR WELLS, STATEWIDE PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION TO CONSTRUCT AND/OR REPAIR DEEP MONITOR WELLS STATEWIDE TO MONITOR THE HEALTH OF DRINKING WATER AQUIFERS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS, AND OTHER RELATED WORK. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR             2,000 C           C 8.          KEAUHOU AQUIFER SYSTEM, HAWAII PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR TWO DEEP MONITOR WELLS FOR THE KEAUHOU AQUIFER SYSTEM TO MONITOR THE HEALTH OF THE DRINKING WATER AQUIFER; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS, AND OTHER RELATED WORK. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR             4,000 C           C LNR405 - CONSERVATION AND RESOURCES ENFORCEMENT 9.          DOCARE HAWAII BRANCH OFFICE BUILDING RENOVATION, HAWAII DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR THE RENOVATION OF THE DOCARE HAWAII BRANCH OFFICE DUE TO SEVERE TERMITE INFESTATION RESULTING IN MAJOR DAMAGE TO THE STRUCTURE, INCLUDING INTERIOR WALLS, SUPPORT BEAMS, DOORS, AND RELATED WORK. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR             2,000 C           C 10.         LAND ACQUISITION, PLANS, AND DESIGN FOR DIVISION OF CONSERVATION AND RESOURCES ENFORCEMENT FACILITY, OAHU. LAND ACQUISITION, PLANS, AND DESIGN FOR DIVISION OF CONSERVATION AND RESOURCES ENFORCEMENT FACILITY, OAHU, TMK 7-4-001-025. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR             2,450 C           C LNR407 - NATURAL AREA RESERVES AND WATERSHED MANAGEMENT 11.         KAWAINUI MARSH, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF WATER TRANSFER SYSTEM FROM KAWAINUI MARSH ACROSS THE KAWAINUI FLOOD CONTROL LEVEE TO HAMAKUA MARSH AND IMPROVEMENTS TO ROAD AND ACCESS TO KAWAINUI FLOOD CONTROL LEVEE FOR MAINTENANCE TO USACE STANDARDS. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR             2,200 C           C 12.         WATERSHED PROTECTION AND INITIATIVES, STATEWIDE PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT TO PROTECT AND RESTORE FORESTED WATERSHEDS AND OTHER WATER SUPPLIES, STATEWIDE; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES, AND ALL PROJECT RELATED COSTS. THE LEGISLATURE FINDS AND DECLARES THAT THE APPROPRIATION IS IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST AND FOR THE PUBLIC'S HEALTH, SAFETY, AND GENERAL WELFARE OF THE STATE. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR             5,000 C           C E.  HEALTH HTH100 - COMMUNICABLE DISEASE AND PUBLIC HEALTH NURSING 1.          KALAUPAPA SETTLEMENT, CARE HOME IMPROVEMENTS, MOLOKAI DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR NECESSARY IMPROVEMENTS TO PROVIDE FOR HEALTH AND SAFETY, ACCESSIBILITY, AND OTHER CODE REQUIREMENTS. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS             2,500 C           C 2.          KALAUPAPA SETTLEMENT, CLOSE C&D LANDFILL, AND INSTALL SYNTHETIC COVER LAYER AT MSW LANDFILL, MOLOKAI DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION TO CLOSE LANDFILLS AND INSTALL SYNTHETIC COVER. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS             5,500 C           C HTH211 - KAHUKU HOSPITAL 3.          KAHUKU MEDICAL CENTER, LUMP SUM PROJECTS, OAHU DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR RENOVATION AND IMPROVEMENTS OF KAHUKU MEDICAL CENTER BUILDING AND CAMPUS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              HTH             5,800 C      5,000 C HTH212 - HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS CORPORATION  REGIONS 4.          HOOLA LAHUI HAWAII, KAUAI PLANS AND DESIGN FOR A MEDICAL AND DENTAL OUTPATIENT CLINIC FOR A FEDERALLY QUALIFIED HEALTH CENTER AND NATIVE HAWAIIAN HEALTH CARE SYSTEM SITE. TOTAL FUNDING              HTH             1,500 C           C 5.          KAU HOSPITAL, KEAAU OUTPATIENT CENTER, HAWAII DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR SITE WORK FOR A NEW AMBULATORY CARE CENTER IN KEAAU, PROVIDED THAT NO FUNDS SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE UNLESS MATCHED DOLLAR-FOR-DOLLAR IN CASH OR BY IN-KIND DONATIONS BY THE PRIVATE SECTOR. TOTAL FUNDING              HTH                   C     25,000 C HTH                   R     25,000 R 6.          LUMP SUM HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS CORPORATION - HAWAII REGION, HAWAII DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR THE HAWAII REGIONS OF THE HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS CORPORATION FOR IMPROVEMENTS AND RENOVATIONS INCLUDING RENOVATIONS AND/OR EXPANSION OF FACILITIES; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              HTH             5,500 C      4,300 C 7.          LUMP SUM HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS CORPORATION - KAUAI REGION, KAUAI DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR THE KAUAI REGION OF THE HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS CORPORATION FOR IMPROVEMENTS AND RENOVATIONS INCLUDING NEW FACILITIES, RENOVATION, EXPANSION, AND/OR REPLACEMENT OF FACILITIES; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              HTH            20,000 C     12,500 C 8.          SAMUEL MAHELONA MEMORIAL HOSPITAL MASTER PLAN, KAUAI PLANS AND DESIGN FOR DEVELOPMENT OF A MASTER PLAN FOR SAMUEL MAHELONA MEMORIAL HOSPITAL, INCLUDING CONNECTOR ROAD PLANNING. TOTAL FUNDING              HTH               500 C           C 9.          WHR KONA COMMUNITY HOSPITAL - EMERGENCY DEPARTMENT, HAWAII PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR THE RECONFIGURATION AND RENOVATION OF THE EMERGENCY ROOM AND ADJACENT CRITICAL CARE FACILITIES. TOTAL FUNDING              HTH             1,339 C     11,909 C HTH214 - MAUI HEALTH SYSTEM, A KFH LLC 10.         LUMP SUM MAUI HEALTH SYSTEM, FACILITIES REPAIR, RENOVATIONS AND UPGRADES, MAUI AND LANAI PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS, REPAIRS, RENOVATIONS, EXPANSION, MODERNIZATION AND UPGRADES TO MAUI MEMORIAL MEDICAL CENTER (MMMC), KULA HOSPITAL (KH), AND LANAI COMMUNITY HOSPITAL (LCH). TOTAL FUNDING              HTH             6,000 C      6,000 C HTH215 - HHSC - OAHU REGION 11.         LUMP SUM HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS CORPORATION, OAHU REGION, OAHU DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR THE OAHU REGION OF THE HAWAII HEALTH SYSTEMS CORPORATION FOR IMPROVEMENTS AND RENOVATIONS INCLUDING RENOVATIONS AND/OR EXPANSION OF FACILITIES; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              HTH             5,600 C      5,110 C HTH430 - ADULT MENTAL HEALTH - INPATIENT 12.         HAWAII STATE HOSPITAL, HALE HOOLA BUILDING, RENOVATIONS, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR RENOVATIONS TO THE HAWAII STATE HOSPITAL. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS            16,000 C     11,000 C 13.         HAWAII STATE HOSPITAL, HEALTH AND SAFETY, OAHU DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR NECESSARY IMPROVEMENTS TO PROVIDE FOR HEALTH AND SAFETY, ACCESSIBILITY, AND OTHER CODE REQUIREMENTS. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS             3,150 C      5,750 C 14.         HAWAII STATE HOSPITAL, REPAIR CHILLED WATER LINE AND RELATED IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT TO REPAIR UNDERGROUND CHILLED WATER LINE AND OTHER RELATED IMPROVEMENTS. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS             1,000 C           C 15.         HAWAII STATE HOSPITAL, WATER SYSTEM IMPROVEMENTS AND OTHER WORK, OAHU DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR WATER SYSTEM IMPROVEMENTS AND OTHER WORK. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS             3,500 C           C F.  SOCIAL SERVICES HMS503 - HAWAII YOUTH CORRECTIONAL FACILITY (HYCF) 1.          KYFWC SECURED CUSTODY FACILITY REROOF, OAHU DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION TO REPAIR AND RENOVATE THE SECURED CUSTODY FACILITY'S ROOF AT THE KAWAILOA YOUTH AND FAMILY WELLNESS CENTER CAMPUS. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS             3,720 C           C DEF112 - SERVICES TO VETERANS 2.          3RD HAWAII STATE VETERAN'S HOME, MAUI PLANS, DESIGNS, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT COSTS FOR A NEW LONG-TERM CARE STATE VETERANS HOME ON THE ISLAND OF MAUI. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              DEF            35,000 C           C DEF            58,000 P           P HMS220 - RENTAL HOUSING SERVICES 3.          CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI DEVELOPMENT, MAYOR WRIGHT HOMES, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION TO PROVIDE AN INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE HPHA KA LEI MOMI DEVELOPMENT, MAYOR WRIGHT HOMES. TOTAL FUNDING              BED            56,000 C           C 4.          CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, KAAHUMANU HOMES I, OAHU PLANS AND DESIGN TO PROVIDE AN INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE HPHA KA LEI MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, KAAHUMANU HOMES I, WHICH MAY INCLUDE ASSESSMENTS, STUDIES, PERMITTING, ARCHITECTURAL DESIGNS, AND OTHER RELATED WORK. TOTAL FUNDING              BED             2,350 C           C 5.          CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, KAAHUMANU HOMES, MULTI-PHASE, OAHU PLANS AND DESIGN TO PROVIDE AN INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE HPHA KA LEI MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, KAAHUMANU HOMES, MULTI-PHASE, WHICH MAY INCLUDE ASSESSMENTS, STUDIES, PERMITTING, ARCHITECTURAL DESIGNS, AND OTHER RELATED WORK. TOTAL FUNDING              BED               700 C           C 6.          CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, KAPAA HOMES, KAUAI PLANS AND DESIGN TO PROVIDE AN INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE HPHA KA LEI MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, KAPAA HOMES, WHICH MAY INCLUDE ASSESSMENTS, STUDIES, PERMITTING, ARCHITECTURAL DESIGNS, AND OTHER RELATED WORK. TOTAL FUNDING              BED             4,000 C           C 7.          CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, LANAKILA HOMES I, HAWAII PLANS AND DESIGN TO PROVIDE AN INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE HPHA KA LEI MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, LANAKILA HOMES I, WHICH MAY INCLUDE ASSESSMENTS, STUDIES, PERMITTING, ARCHITECTURAL DESIGNS, AND OTHER RELATED WORK. TOTAL FUNDING              BED             3,500 C           C 8.          CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, LANAKILA HOMES, MULTI-PHASE, HAWAII PLANS AND DESIGN TO PROVIDE AN INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE HPHA KA LEI MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, LANAKILA HOMES, MULTI-PHASE, WHICH MAY INCLUDE ASSESSMENTS, STUDIES, PERMITTING, ARCHITECTURAL DESIGNS, AND OTHER RELATED WORK. TOTAL FUNDING              BED               700 C           C 9.          CASH INFUSION FOR RENTAL HOUSING REVOLVING FUND FOR HPHA KA LEI MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, NANAKULI HOMES, OAHU PLANS AND DESIGN TO PROVIDE AN INFUSION OF FUNDS TO FINANCE HPHA KA LEI MOMI PREDEVELOPMENT, NANAKULI HOMES, WHICH MAY INCLUDE ASSESSMENTS, STUDIES, PERMITTING, ARCHITECTURAL DESIGNS, AND OTHER RELATED WORK. TOTAL FUNDING              BED               750 C           C HHL602 - PLANNING AND DEVELOPMENT FOR HAWAIIAN HOMESTEADS 10.         LUMP SUM REPAIR AND MAINTENANCE - HAWAIIAN HOME LANDS EXISTING INFRASTRUCTURE, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR REPAIR AND MAINTENANCE OF EXISTING INFRASTRUCTURE ON VARIOUS HAWAIIAN HOME LANDS, STATEWIDE. TOTAL FUNDING              HHL            20,000 C           C HMS904 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION - DHS 11.         IT MODERNIZATION FOR THE BES SYSTEM, STATEWIDE CONSTRUCTION TO COMPLETE THE BENEFITS ELIGIBILITY SOLUTION (BES) IT SYSTEM. TOTAL FUNDING              HMS            10,000 C           C HMS777 - OFFICE ON HOMELESSNESS AND HOUSING SOLUTIONS 12.         KAUHALE DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS LUMP SUM, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN, LAND ACQUISITION, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR KAUHALE DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS, STATEWIDE, GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENT; ACCESS, SERVICES, AND RELATED IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              HMS            24,400 C     13,000 C G.  FORMAL EDUCATION EDN100 - SCHOOL-BASED BUDGETING 1.          JAMES CAMPBELL HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU CONTINUATION OF PHASED FUNDING FOR TITLE IX PROJECT FOR DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION OF ATHLETIC STADIUM AND SUPPORT FACILITIES, INCLUDING LOCKER ROOMS UNDER BLEACHERS, FITNESS AND WEIGHT ROOM, RENOVATION OF PLAY COURTS; AND ALTERNATIVES, INCLUDING CONCESSION STAND, RESTROOM, AND VISITOR BLEACHERS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              EDN             9,000 C           C 2.          KAILUA HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR THE ATHLETIC COMPLEX GIRLS LOCKER ROOM; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              EDN             9,500 C           C 3.          LUMP SUM CIP - CAPACITY, STATEWIDE PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR CAPACITY; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              EDN             3,000 C           C 4.          LUMP SUM CIP - COMPLIANCE, STATEWIDE DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION PROJECTS TO BRING THE DOE IN COMPLIANCE WITH ADA, ABR, AND GENDER EQUITY REQUIREMENTS. TOTAL FUNDING              EDN            16,000 C           C 5.          LUMP SUM CIP - DEFERRED MAINTENANCE PROJECTS, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION TO MAINTAIN AND IMPROVE FACILITIES AND INFRASTRUCTURE, INCLUDING HAZARDOUS MATERIALS REMEDIATION; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              EDN            71,000 C           C 6.          LUMP SUM CIP - FEDERAL GRANTS, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR REPLACEMENT OR RENOVATED BUILDINGS OR REPLACEMENT SCHOOLS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              EDN                   C     30,000 C P    120,000 P 7.          LUMP SUM CIP - HEALTH AND SAFETY, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO SCHOOL FACILITIES AND GROUNDS TO MEET HEALTH AND SAFETY REQUIREMENTS/LAWS, AND ORDINANCES AND/OR COUNTY REQUIREMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              EDN            40,000 C           C 8.          LUMP SUM CIP - INSTRUCTIONAL, STATEWIDE DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR EQUITY, INCLUDING RENOVATION, EXPANSION AND/OR REPLACEMENT OF FACILITIES; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              EDN             2,000 C           C 9.          LUMP SUM CIP - PROJECT COMPLETION, STATEWIDE DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR PROJECT COMPLETION INCLUDING CONSTRUCTION MANAGEMENT COSTS, PURCHASE ORDERS, UTILITIES CHARGES, CHANGE ORDERS, AND ALL OTHER COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE COMPLETION OF A PROJECT. TOTAL FUNDING              EDN            50,000 C           C 10.         LUMP SUM CIP - SUPPORT FACILITIES, STATEWIDE DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR THE IMPROVEMENT OF EXISTING OR NEW SCHOOL FACILITIES; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              EDN            18,000 C           C 11.         LUMP SUM CIP - TELECOMMUNICATIONS, STATEWIDE DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT TO MAINTAIN AND IMPROVE DOE'S CONVERGED INFRASTRUCTURE PROVIDING BELLS AND PAGING FOR SCHOOL SAFETY; CONVERGED INFRASTRUCTURE PROVIDING SCHOOLS' ACCESS TO ONLINE LEARNING AND INTERNET RESOURCES; TELECOMMUNICATIONS, AND ELECTRICAL INFRASTRUCTURE IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              EDN             3,000 C           C 12.         MCKINLEY HS ATHLETIC COMPLEX IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR VARIOUS ATHLETIC COMPLEX IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING BLEACHERS AND LIGHTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              EDN             7,000 C           C 13.         PAIA ELEMENTARY SCHOOL NEW CLASSROOM, MAUI CONSTRUCTION FOR A NEW CLASSROOM BUILDING AT PAIA ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, MAUI. TOTAL FUNDING              EDN            35,000 C           C 14.         PUU KUKUI ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, MAUI PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR TWO PORTABLE CLASSROOMS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              EDN             3,200 C           C 15.         REGIONAL KITCHENS, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS, EQUIPMENT, FURNISHING, AND APPURTENANCES FOR THE EXPANSION OF REGIONAL KITCHENS, STATEWIDE. TOTAL FUNDING              EDN            55,650 C     16,500 C 16.         WILCOX ELEMENTARY SCHOOL TENNIS COURTS, KAUAI PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR RECONSTRUCTION AND IMPROVEMENTS OF TENNIS COURTS INCLUDING FENCING, TENNIS NETS, RESURFACING, AND STRIPING; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              EDN               950 C           C EDN450 - SCHOOL FACILITIES AUTHORITY 17.         LUMP SUM CIP - PRE-KINDERGARTEN CAPACITY PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES FOR NEW FACILITIES AND/OR RENOVATION, IMPROVEMENT, AND EXPANSION OF EXISTING SCHOOL FACILITIES; GROUND & SITE IMPROVEMENTS. TOTAL FUNDING              EDN            20,000 C           C 18.         NEW CENTRAL MAUI ELEMENTARY AND MIDDLE SCHOOL, MAUI PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES FOR NEW K-8 SCHOOL USING STANDARDS BASED DESIGNS, MODERN EDUCATIONAL SPECIFICATIONS, DESIGN GUIDES, CONSTRUCTION SPECIFICATIONS, STANDARD TECHNICAL DRAWINGS, AND COMMISSIONING PLANS, FOR ACCELERATED CONSTRUCTION SCHEDULES AND BUILDING MAINTAINABILITY. TOTAL FUNDING              EDN            35,000 C           C EDN407 - PUBLIC LIBRARIES 19.         HAWAII STATE PUBLIC LIBRARY SYSTEM, HEALTH AND SAFETY, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR HEALTH, SAFETY, ACCESSIBILITY, AND OTHER CODE REQUIREMENTS. PROJECTS MAY INCLUDE, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE REMOVAL OF HAZARDOUS MATERIALS, RENOVATIONS FOR LIBRARY PATRONS AND EMPLOYEES, ENVIRONMENTAL CONTROLS, FIRE PROTECTION, IMPROVEMENTS TO BUILDINGS GROUNDS, AND NEW CONSTRUCTION; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS            25,000 C     25,000 C 20.         KAPAA LIBRARY, KAUAI PLANS AND DESIGN FOR A NEW KAPAA LIBRARY. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS             2,000 C           C DEF114 - HAWAII NATIONAL GUARD YOUTH CHALLENGE ACADEMY 21.         YOUTH CHALLENGE ACADEMY B1786 AND B1787 UPGRADES AND IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR UPGRADES AND IMPROVEMENTS TO BUILDINGS 1786 AND 1787, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO WINDOW SYSTEM, PLUMBING, AIR CONDITIONING, EMERGENCY GENERATOR SYSTEM, UTILITY SYSTEM, FIRE ALARMS, AND OTHER SYSTEMS AT THE YOUTH CHALLENGE ACADEMY IN KALAELOA, OAHU. TOTAL FUNDING              DEF             8,000 C           C UOH100 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, MANOA 22.         UHM, HOLMES HALL, OAHU DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION TO RENOVATE AND MODERNIZE HOLMES HALL STUDENT LABS THAT SUPPORT CIVIL, MECHANICAL, AND ELECTRICAL ENGINEERING PROGRAMS. TOTAL FUNDING              UOH             9,000 C           C 23.         UHM, STUDENT HOUSING SERVICES (SHS) IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE UH MANOA STUDENT HOUSING SERVICES FACILITIES.  PROJECTS TO INCLUDE RENEWAL, IMPROVEMENTS, AND MODERNIZATION TO THE INTERIOR AND EXTERIOR OF THE FACILITIES. IMPROVEMENTS INCLUDE BUT ARE NOT LIMITED TO ROOFS, BUILDING ENVELOPE, MECHANICAL, ELECTRICAL, PLUMBING, FIRE PROTECTION SYSTEMS, ELEVATORS, STRUCTURAL, AND PEDESTRIAN PATHWAYS. TOTAL FUNDING              UOH            30,750 C     28,500 C UOH            30,750 E     28,500 E 24.         UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII AT MANOA COLLEGE OF TROPICAL AGRICULTURE AND HUMAN RESILIENCE, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR THE WAIMANALO CTAHR AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH AND EXTENSION STATION (CARES) CENTER, INCLUDING REPAIRS, MAINTENANCE, AND DEMOLITION OF BUILDINGS, AND PHASE 1 REDESIGN. TOTAL FUNDING              UOH             4,000 C           C 25.         UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII AT MANOA COLLEGE OF TROPICAL AGRICULTURE AND HUMAN RESILIENCE, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR DEVELOPMENT OF THE CONTROLLED ENVIRONMENTAL AGRICULTURE INNOVATION FARM LOCATED AT THE MAGOON RESEARCH STATION IN MANOA. TOTAL FUNDING              UOH             6,000 C           C 26.         UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, MANOA CAMPUS, ATHLETIC FACILITY IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR VARIOUS REPAIRS AND IMPROVEMENTS TO ATHLETIC FACILITIES AND FIELD IMPROVEMENTS. TOTAL FUNDING              UOH            10,000 C           C UOH210 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, HILO 27.         HILO, RENEW, IMPROVE, AND MODERNIZE, HAWAII DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, HILO. PROJECTS TO INCLUDE RENEWAL, IMPROVEMENTS, AND MODERNIZATION OF INTERIOR AND EXTERIOR STRUCTURES, ROOFS, MECHANICAL AND ELECTRICAL SYSTEMS, PEDESTRIAN PATHWAYS, ROADWAYS, GROUNDS, AND OTHER PROJECT COSTS TO UPGRADE EXISTING TEMPORARY AND NEW FACILITIES. TOTAL FUNDING              UOH            15,000 C           C UOH700 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, WEST OAHU 28.         UHWO, RENEW, IMPROVE, AND MODERNIZE, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII AT WEST OAHU FACILITIES.  PROJECTS TO INCLUDE RENEWAL, IMPROVEMENTS, AND MODERNIZATION OF INTERIOR AND EXTERIOR STRUCTURES, ROOFS, MECHANICAL AND ELECTRICAL SYSTEMS, PEDESTRIAN PATHWAYS, ROADWAYS, GROUNDS, AND OTHER PROJECT COSTS TO UPGRADE EXISTING TEMPORARY AND NEW FACILITIES; PLANNING PROJECTS AND STUDIES; AND ALL PROJECT RELATED COSTS. TOTAL FUNDING              UOH             6,500 C           C UOH800 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, COMMUNITY COLLEGES 29.         CCS, CAPITAL RENEWAL AND DEFERRED MAINTENANCE, AND MINOR CIP STATEWIDE DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO UH COMMUNITY COLLEGES SYSTEM FACILITIES. PROJECTS TO INCLUDE CAPITAL RENEWAL, REDUCTION OF MAINTENANCE BACKLOG, MAJOR AND MINOR RENOVATIONS, MODERNIZATION OF FACILITIES, RE-ROOFING, MECHANICAL AND ELECTRICAL SYSTEMS, RESURFACING, INFRASTRUCTURE, DEMOLITION OF EXISTING FACILITIES, AND OTHER REPAIRS AND PROJECT COSTS FOR UPGRADES. TOTAL FUNDING              UOH            20,000 C           C 30.         CCS, MINOR CIP FOR THE COMMUNITY COLLEGES, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR MINOR CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS PROGRAM PROJECTS FOR CAMPUS FACILITIES WITHIN THE UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII COMMUNITY COLLEGES SYSTEM. PROJECT MAY INCLUDE RENOVATIONS FOR THE MODERNIZATION OF FACILITIES, ADDITIONS, DEMOLITION OF EXISTING FACILITIES, AND OTHER IMPROVEMENTS AND PROJECT COSTS TO UPGRADE AND IMPROVE FACILITIES OF THE COMMUNITY COLLEGES SYSTEM. TOTAL FUNDING              UOH            20,000 C           C 31.         KAUAI CC, STUDENT, FACULTY/STAFF, AND WORKFORCE HOUSING, KAUAI PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR STUDENT, FACULTY/STAFF, AND WORKFORCE HOUSING; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              UOH             5,000 C     10,000 C UOH900 - UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII, SYSTEMWIDE SUPPORT 32.         HAWAII UNDERSEA RESEARCH LABORATORY AND MAKAI PIER, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT RELATED TO THE DEMOLITION OF THE HAWAII UNDERSEA RESEARCH LABORATORY BUILDING AND APPURTENANT REPAIRS TO MAKAI PIER. TOTAL FUNDING              UOH               500 C           C 33.         SYSTEM, RENEW, IMPROVE, AND MODERNIZE, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII SYSTEM FACILITIES.  PROJECT TO INCLUDE RENEWAL, IMPROVEMENTS, AND MODERNIZATION OF INTERIOR AND EXTERIOR STRUCTURES, STUDENT HOUSING FACILITIES, ROOFS, MECHANICAL AND ELECTRICAL SYSTEMS, PEDESTRIAN PATHWAYS, ROADWAYS, GROUNDS AND OTHER PROJECT COSTS TO UPGRADE EXISTING TEMPORARY AND NEW FACILITIES. TOTAL FUNDING              UOH            50,000 C           C 34.         SYSTEM, UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII PROJECT ADJUSTMENT FUND, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A CONTINGENCY FUND FOR PROJECT ADJUSTMENT PURPOSES SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THE APPROPRIATIONS ACT. TOTAL FUNDING              UOH                 4 C          4 C H.  CULTURE AND RECREATION UOH881 - AQUARIA 1.          WAIKIKI AQUARIUM IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR REPLACEMENT OF THE CEILING IN EXHIBIT GALLERIES, RESURFACING OF THE GALLERY FLOORING, AND UPGRADING OF THE ELECTRICAL SYSTEM IN AQUARIUM. TOTAL FUNDING              UOH             1,702 C           C AGS881 - STATE FOUNDATION ON CULTURE AND THE ARTS 2.          PERFORMING ARTS CENTER, OAHU LAND ACQUISITION, PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR A PERFORMING ARTS CENTER, OAHU,           TMK 7-4-007-002. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS             8,500 C           C LNR806 - PARKS ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATION 3.          STATE PARKS INFRASTRUCTURE AND PARK IMPROVEMENTS, LUMP SUM, STATEWIDE DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION OF IMPROVEMENTS TO STATE PARKS (WAILUA RIVER SP, PUAʻA  KAʻA SW, WAILOA RIVER SRA, KEOLONAHIHI SHP, KEAIWA HEIAU SRA), STATEWIDE. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID REIMBURSEMENT AND/OR FINANCING. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR             2,650 C           C LNR               500 N           N 4.          WAHIAWA FRESHWATER STATE RECREATION AREA PARK IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT, AND FURNISHINGS FOR PARK IMPROVEMENTS, EXPANSION, AND THE DEVELOPMENT OF FACILITIES AT WAHIAWA FRESHWATER STATE RECREATION AREA. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR             5,750 C      2,150 C LNR               250 N        250 N LNR801 - OCEAN-BASED RECREATION 5.          ALA WAI CANAL WALL REPAIR, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR ALA WAI SBH CANAL WALL REPAIR AND HAUL-OUT REMOVAL; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR             5,000 C           C 6.          KAWAIHAE NORTH SMALL BOAT HARBOR, HAWAII DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO HARBOR DOCK, BREAK WALL, AND RELATED IMPROVEMENTS. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR             9,450 C           C 7.          LAHAINA SMALL BOAT HARBOR MAINTENANCE DREDGING, MAUI CONSTRUCTION FOR MAINTENANCE DREDGING OF HARBOR BASIN AND ENTRANCE CHANNEL. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR             5,000 C           C 8.          LAHAINA SMALL BOAT HARBOR RECONSTRUCTION OF OUTER MARGINAL WHARF, MAUI DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION OF HARBOR OUTER MARGINAL WHARF DESTROYED BY AUGUST 2023 WILDFIRES. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR             8,000 C           C 9.          POHOIKI SAFE SWIM AREA, HAWAII PLANS AND DESIGN INCLUDING FEASIBILITY STUDY AND SITE SELECTION FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF A SAFE SWIM AREA LOCATED IN POHOIKI. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR               200 C           C 10.         REPLACEMENT OF FISH HOIST AND CONCRETE LANDING STRUCTURES, MILOLII LANDING, HAWAII PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR REPLACEMENT OF FISH HOIST WITH NEW FISH HOIST ASSEMBLY AND CONCRETE FOOTING; REMOVAL OF EXISTING DAMAGED/DETERIORATING CONCRETE LANDING STRUCTURES, AND CONSTRUCTION OF NEW CONCRETE LANDING STRUCTURES INCLUDING NEW CLEATS AND BULL RAILS. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR             1,000 C           C I.  PUBLIC SAFETY LAW900 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION 1.          PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT AND FURNISHING FOR DEPARTMENT OF LAW ENFORCEMENT FACILITY, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT AND FURNISHING FOR A DEPARTMENT OF LAW ENFORCEMENT FACILITY.  GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES, TMKs 7-1-002:004 (por.) 009 (por.); 023(por.). TOTAL FUNDING              LAW             3,000 C           C PSD900 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATION 2.          DCR 10-YR DEPARTMENT MASTER PLAN, NEW FACILITIES, AND SUSTAINABLE MASTER PLANS, AND OTHER PLANNING ASSESSMENTS, STATEWIDE PLANS TO UPDATE THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND REHABILITATION'S 10-YEAR MASTER PLAN, NEW FACILITY, AND SUSTAINABILITY MASTER PLANS AND OTHER PLANNING ASSESSMENTS, STATEWIDE. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS               250 C           C 3.          DCR FAC-WIDE REPAIRS, DEFERRED MAINTENANCE, RELATED SUPPORT AND IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT AND RELATED SERVICES IN SUPPORT OF AND TO ADDRESS IMMEDIATE REPAIRS, DEFERRED MAINTENANCE, AND IMPROVEMENTS AFFECTING FACILITY AND BUILDING INFRASTRUCTURE, SECURITY, AND OPERATIONS OR SIMILAR, WHILE ALSO ADDRESSING CODE VIOLATIONS AND/OR CITATIONS AFFECTING PSD FACILITIES, STATEWIDE. TOTAL FUNDING              PSD             5,000 C           C 4.          DCR FAC-WIDE SECURITY PERIMETER FENCING REPAIRS, UPGRADES, AND RELATED IMPROVEMENTS, LUMP SUM CIP, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT TO REPAIR, UPGRADE, AND CONDUCT NECESSARY GROUND IMPROVEMENTS TO DCR'S FACILITIES STATEWIDE, PERIMETER SECURITY FENCE SYSTEM REPAIRS, RETAINING WALLS, AND REPAIRS TO IMPACTED AREAS, WHILE ALSO PROVIDING THE NECESSARY SECURITY PERIMETER MONITORING SYSTEMS, LIGHTING, AND SECURITY CAMERA SYSTEM WHERE NEEDED. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS            10,000 C           C 5.          DCR, DOJ ARCHITECTURAL BARRIER REMOVAL, ADA AND OTHER RELATED IMPROVEMENTS, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT TO CORRECT AND ADDRESS CURRENT ADA VIOLATIONS CITED BY THE U.S. DEPT OF JUSTICE (DOJ) UNDER A SETTLEMENT AGREEMENT WITH THE STATE OF HAWAII, AND TO ADDRESS ASSOCIATED ADA NON-DOJ CODE VIOLATIONS AT DCR FACILITIES, STATEWIDE. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS             7,000 C           C 6.          HALAWA CORRECTIONAL FACILITY, CONSOLIDATED HEALTH CARE UNIT, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT TO CONSTRUCT A NEW CONSOLIDATED HEALTH CARE UNIT SECTION AT THE HALAWA CORRECTIONAL FACILITY ON OAHU. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS            28,500 C           C 7.          MAUI COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER RENOVATION, SECURITY UPGRADE, AND OTHER IMPROVEMENTS, TO INCLUDE THE MEDICAL AND MENTAL HEALTH AREAS, MAUI PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS, RENOVATIONS, REFURBISHMENTS, UPGRADES, INFRASTRUCTURE WORK, AND NEW CONSTRUCTION FOR THE MAUI COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS             4,000 C           C 8.          NEW OAHU COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER FACILITY, OAHU PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR THE PROJECT MANAGEMENT SUPPORT AND FINANCIAL PARTICIPATION BY THE STATE OF HAWAII TO FUND AND CONSTRUCT THE NEW OAHU COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER (OCCC) FACILITY, OAHU. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS            15,000 C     15,000 C 9.          WOMEN'S COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER, KITCHEN EXPANSION, AND RELATED INTERIM AND PERMANENT IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR THE EXPANSION, MODERNIZATION, AND UPGRADE OF THE WOMEN'S COMMUNITY CORRECTIONAL CENTER (WCCC) KITCHEN SERVICES AND RELATED SUPPORT AND EDUCATIONAL SERVICES, FACILITY-WIDE. TOTAL FUNDING              PSD             5,000 C           C DEF110 - AMELIORATION OF PHYSICAL DISASTERS 10.         FORT RUGER REPLACEMENT ELEVATOR, OAHU CONSTRUCTION FOR A REPLACEMENT OF THE ELEVATOR AT FORT RUGER, BUILDING 306A. TOTAL FUNDING              DEF               725 C           C DEF116 - HAWAII ARMY AND AIR NATIONAL GUARD 11.         UPGRADES AND IMPROVEMENTS TO HAWAII ARMY NATIONAL GUARD FACILITIES, STATEWIDE DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR UPGRADES AND IMPROVEMENTS TO FACILITIES SUPPORTING UNIT STATIONING/RESTATIONING REQUIREMENTS AND/OR FACILITATE COMPLIANCE WITH FEDERAL, STATE, AND LOCAL SAFETY AND ENVIRONMENTAL REQUIREMENTS. IMPROVEMENTS TO INCLUDE BUT NOT BE LIMITED TO ADDITIONS, ALTERATIONS, AND/OR NEW CONSTRUCTION. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              DEF             1,173 C           C DEF             3,223 P           P DEF118 - HAWAII EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT AGENCY 12.         RETROFIT PUBLIC BUILDINGS WITH HURRICANE PROTECTIVE MEASURES, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT TO RETROFIT EXISTING BUILDINGS AND/OR REINFORCE NEW BUILDINGS WITH HURRICANE PROTECTIVE MEASURES TO INCREASE THE NUMBER OF EMERGENCY SHELTERS STATEWIDE. THIS PROJECT IS DEEMED NECESSARY TO QUALIFY FOR FEDERAL AID FINANCING AND/OR REIMBURSEMENT. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS             1,500 C      1,500 C AGS             1,500 P      1,500 P 13.         SIREN MAINTENANCE AND MODERNIZATION, STATEWIDE DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR UPGRADES AND MODERNIZATION OF EXISTING OUTDOOR SIRENS TO PROVIDE PUBLIC SAFETY ANNOUNCEMENT IN THE EVENT OF A WARNING HAZARD, STATEWIDE. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS             5,000 C      5,000 C K.  GOVERNMENT-WIDE SUPPORT BED144 - STATEWIDE PLANNING AND COORDINATION 1.          EAST KAPOLEI TOD INFRASTRUCTURE, OAHU PLANS FOR AN ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT STATEMENT FOR THE EAST KAPOLEI TOD DISTRICT. TOTAL FUNDING              BED               500 C           C 2.          STATE TRANSIT-ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT (TOD) PLANNING, STATEWIDE PLANS, FEASIBILITY AND COST STUDIES, AND COORDINATION OF TOD PROJECTS, TOD PUBLIC INFRASTRUCTURE REQUIREMENTS, AND RELATED ENVIRONMENTAL REVIEW DOCUMENTS FOR TOD PROJECTS IN STATE TOD STRATEGIC PLAN, STATEWIDE. TOTAL FUNDING              BED             2,000 C           C 3.          WAIKIKI RESILIENCE AND SEA LEVEL RISE ADAPTATION PROJECT, OAHU PLANS AND DESIGN FOR THE WAIKIKI RESILIENCE AND SEA LEVEL RISE ADAPTATION PROJECT. TOTAL FUNDING              BED             5,000 C           C AGS131 - ENTERPRISE TECHNOLOGY SERVICES 4.          LUMP SUM HEALTH AND SAFETY, HAWAII WIRELESS INTEROPERABILITY NETWORK, STATEWIDE PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR REPAIRS, MODERNIZATION, AND EXPANSION OF CRITICAL COMMUNICATIONS SYSTEMS, INCLUDING THE STATEWIDE ANUENUE AND HAWAIIAN MICROWAVE SYSTEMS AND LAND MOBILE RADIO, STATEWIDE SHARED BLENDED RADIO SYSTEM, AND NEW RADIO SITES AND TOWERS STATEWIDE. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS             4,000 C      2,000 C LNR101 - PUBLIC LANDS MANAGEMENT 5.          CESSPOOL CLOSURES IN ACCORDANCE WITH EPA CONSENT ORDER, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR CLOSURE OF LARGE CAPACITY CESSPOOLS (LCC) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE CONSENT AGREEMENT AND FINAL ORDER (CA/FO) WITH THE U.S. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY (EPA). TOTAL FUNDING              LNR             1,500 B           B 6.          DEMOLITION OF EXISTING IMPROVEMENTS AT 121 BANYAN DRIVE, HAWAII PLANS AND DESIGN FOR DEMOLITION OF 121 BANYAN DRIVE, HILO, HAWAII. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR             1,200 C           C 7.          EAST KAPOLEI TRANSIT ORIENTED DEVELOPMENT PROJECT, OAHU PLANS AND DESIGN FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF FOUR DLNR PARCELS ADJACENT TO AND NEARBY THE KEONEAE RAIL STATION. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR               500 B           B 8.          HALAI STREET PROPERTY, AUWAI DRAINAGE, HAWAII PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION TO REMOVE EXISTING CRM DITCH AND INSTALL A 60-INCH RCP CULVERT. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR             1,455 C           C 9.          LOWER KAPAHI RESERVOIR REMOVAL, KAUAI PLANS AND DESIGN FOR BREACH OF LOWER KAPAHI RESERVOIR TO COMPLY WITH DAM SAFETY REGULATIONS. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR               500 B           B 10.         SHANGRI LA BREAKWATER REMOVAL, OAHU PLANS AND DESIGN FOR DEMOLITION OF STATE-OWNED STRUCTURE LOCATED IN THE OCEAN SEAWARD OF THE SHANGRI LA MUSEUM. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR               700 B           B 11.         STADIUM IMPROVEMENTS, KAUAI PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR TRACK AND FACILITY MAINTENANCE; REPAIR AND UPGRADES TO STADIUM; TRACK LIGHTING; SPECTATOR LIGHTING; EQUIPMENT ACQUISITION. TOTAL FUNDING              LNR               700 C           C AGS221 - PUBLIC WORKS - PLANNING, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION 12.         LUMP SUM CIP - PROJECT ADJUSTMENT FUND, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A CONTINGENCY FUND FOR PROJECT ADJUSTMENT PURPOSES SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THE APPROPRIATIONS ACT. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS                 4 C          4 C 13.         LUMP SUM MAINTENANCE OF EXISTING FACILITIES, PWD, STATEWIDE PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR IMPROVEMENTS AND MAINTENANCE OF PUBLIC FACILITIES AND SITES, STATEWIDE. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS            20,000 C           C 14.         LUMP SUM STATE OFFICE BUILDING REMODELING, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR REMODELING AND UPGRADE OF STATE-OWNED OFFICES TO ACCOMMODATE STATE AGENCIES' OPERATIONAL REQUIREMENTS. PROJECT INCLUDES RENOVATION FOR REORGANIZATION, PROGRAM AND STAFFING CHANGES, AND CONSOLIDATION, AS WELL AS IMPROVEMENTS FOR OFFICE LAYOUTS, ENERGY CONSERVATION, LIGHTING, A/C, VENTILATION, PLUMBING, ELECTRICAL, AND DATA/COMMUNICATIONS SYSTEMS. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS             2,000 C           C 15.         PLANNING FOR STATE CAPITOL BUILDING REHABILITATION AND RELATED IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU PLANS FOR THE TOTAL RENOVATION OF THE STATE CAPITOL BUILDING AND TEMPORARY ACCOMMODATION FOR OCCUPANTS AND OPERATIONS. INCLUDES IDENTIFICATION AND EVALUATION OF STATE AND PRIVATE SECTOR OPTIONS WHICH COULD BE RENOVATED OR REDEVELOPED TO TEMPORARILY RELOCATE OCCUPANTS AND FUNCTIONS FROM THE STATE CAPITOL BUILDING AND PLANNING FOR SUBSEQUENT RE-USE OF ANY STATE ASSETS THAT WERE UTILIZED. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS             2,000 C           C AGS901 - GENERAL ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES 16.         ENTERPRISE FINANCIAL SYSTEM, STATEWIDE PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR THE STATE FINANCIAL SYSTEM. TOTAL FUNDING              AGS            35,000 C           C SUB201 - CITY AND COUNTY OF HONOLULU 17.         BOARD OF WATER SUPPLY - MONITORING WELLS AT VARIOUS LOCATIONS, OAHU PLANNING, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, EQUIPMENT, AND APPURTENANCES FOR GROUNDWATER MONITORING WELLS TO MEASURE AND MONITOR THE LEVEL, QUALITY, QUANTITY, OR MOVEMENT OF SUBSURFACE WATER, FOR CONTAMINANTS WITH TOTAL PETROLEUM HYDROCARBONS OR AQUEOUS FILM FORMING FOAM, AND ALLOW FOR THE MONITORING OF OTHER CONTAMINANTS RELATED TO THE RED HILL FUEL CRISIS.  PROVIDED THAT THE CITY AND COUNTY OF HONOLULU CONTRIBUTES 80% OF THE TOTAL PROJECT COST. TOTAL FUNDING              CCH             2,000 C           C CCH             8,000 S           S SUB301 - COUNTY OF HAWAII 18.         KAWANANAKOA GYM RENOVATION, HAWAII PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR RENOVATIONS TO THE GYM; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; PROVIDED THAT NO STATE FUNDS SHALL BE EXPENDED UNLESS THE COUNTY OF HAWAII CONTRIBUTES MATCHING COUNTY FUNDS FOR STATE FUNDS ON A DOLLAR-FOR-DOLLAR BASIS. TOTAL FUNDING              COH             3,500 C           C COH             3,500 S           S SUB501 - COUNTY OF KAUAI 19.         HANAPEPE STADIUM IMPROVEMENTS, KAUAI PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR HANAPEPE STADIUM INCLUDING LOCKER ROOMS UPGRADES, LIGHT FIXTURES AND POLES, CARETAKER OFFICE BUILDING REPLACEMENT, AND ELECTRICAL ROOM UPGRADES; PROVIDED THAT NO STATE FUNDS SHALL BE EXPENDED UNLESS THE COUNTY OF KAUAI CONTRIBUTES MATCHING COUNTY FUNDS FOR STATE FUNDS ON A DOLLAR-FOR-DOLLAR BASIS. TOTAL FUNDING              COK             3,500 C           C COK             3,500 S           S 20.         KAUAI DEPARTMENT OF WATER, KUHIO HIGHWAY WATER MAIN REPLACEMENT, KAUAI CONSTRUCTION FOR REPLACEMENT OF 18-INCH WATER MAIN ALONG KUHIO HIGHWAY (HARDY TO OXFORD ST); PROVIDED THAT NO STATE FUNDS SHALL BE EXPENDED UNLESS THE COUNTY OF KAUAI CONTRIBUTES MATCHING COUNTY FUNDS FOR STATE FUNDS ON A DOLLAR-FOR-DOLLAR BASIS. TOTAL FUNDING              COK             1,500 C           C COK             1,500 S           S 21.         VIDINHA STADIUM IMPROVEMENTS, KAUAI PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR ADA UPGRADES, LIGHTING, RENOVATE LOCKER ROOMS, RESTROOMS, OFFICE SPACES, AND FOOD BOOTHS, REPLACE FENCING, PAVING, AND PEDESTRIAN SAFETY; PROVIDED THAT NO STATE FUNDS SHALL BE EXPENDED UNLESS THE COUNTY OF KAUAI CONTRIBUTES MATCHING COUNTY FUNDS FOR STATE FUNDS ON A DOLLAR-FOR-DOLLAR BASIS. TOTAL FUNDING              COK             8,000 C           C COK             8,000 S           S PART VI. CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT PROGRAM PROVISIONS SECTION 15. Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, the appropriations under Act 164, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, section 7, as amended and renumbered by Act 230, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, section 7, in the amounts indicated or balances thereof, unallotted, allotted, unencumbered, or encumbered and unrequired, are hereby lapsed: "Item No.      Amount (MOF) G-6            $ 500,000 C G-9.3 671,000 C G-14.3 660,000 C G-15.3 1,000,000 C G-24 2,500,000 C G-25.1 350,000 C G-36 21,000 C G-46 6,000,000 C G-52 2,500,000 C G-53.2 100,000 C G-54.1 2,000,000 C G-61.1 1,000,000 C G-64 130,000 C G-70.1 500,000 C G-78.2 4,000,000 C G-79.2 150,000 C G-86.1 1,000,000 C G-92.1 650,000 C G-98 200,000 C G-99.2 1,320,000 C G-111.2 650,000 C G-112 3,000,000 C G-112.1 200,000 C G-113 1,500,000 C G-113.2 1,680,000 C G-113.3 1,000,000 C G-119 100,000 C" SECTION 16.  Part IV, section 7, of Act 164, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, as amended by section 7 of Act 230, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, is amended as follows: 1.   By amending item A-17 to read: "17.   [PRESCHOOL EARLY EDUCATION,] TEACHER HOUSING AND AFFORDABLE WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT INITIATIVE, KIHEI, MAUI PLANS, LAND ACQUISITION, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR REPURPOSING EXISTING FACILITY FOR [PUBLIC PREKINDERGARTEN CLASSROOMS,] DEDICATED TEACHER HOUSING AND AFFORDABLE WORKFORCE HOUSING; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. TOTAL FUNDING              BED            45,000 C          C" 2.   By amending item C-21.1 to read: "21.1  KAKAAKO ROAD IMPROVEMENTS, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR [RESURFACING] IMPROVEMENTS TO ROADS IN KAKAAKO[.], INCLUDING DRAINAGE, SIDEWALKS & PATHS, UTILITY IMPROVEMENTS, LANDSCAPING, LIGHTING, AND RELATED AMENITIES. TOTAL FUNDING           TRN             C       5,000 C" 3.   By amending item D-11.1to read: "11.1  WEST MAUI AND UPCOUNTRY FIRE PREVENTION AND EROSION CONTROL, MAUI PLANNING, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF APPROXIMATELY 15 MILES OF FIREBREAKS, REDUCTION OF FUELS, INSTALLATION OF WATER TANKS OR SOURCES FOR FIRE-FIGHTING, AND CONSTRUCTION OF EROSION. TOTAL FUNDING           LNR          [D] C   2,000 [D] C" 4.   By amending item D-11.2 to read: "11.2  WEST MAUI AND UPCOUNTRY FIRE SUPPRESSION DIP TANKS (6), MAUI" PLANS, LAND, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR INSTALLATION OF [3,] SIX 40,000-GALLON DIP TANKS FOR FIRE SUPPRESSION IN WEST MAUI. IMPLEMENTS PORTION OF THE WEST MAUI COMMUNITY WILDFIRE ACTION PLAN TOTAL FUNDING           LNR          [D] C     360 [D] C" 5.   By amending item H-10.1 to read: "10.1. ALA WAI SMALL BOAT HARBOR, OAHU PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION OF IMPROVEMENTS INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, FINGER PIERS, DOCKS, RESTROOM FACILITIES, ELECTRICAL INFRASTRUCTURE, SEWER AND GENERAL REPAIRS. TOTAL FUNDING            LNR                C 3,000 C" 6.   By amending item K-21 to read: "21.   KAUAI DEPARTMENT OF WATER REVISED ENVIRONMENTAL REVIEW PROJECT, KAUAI PLANS AND DESIGN FOR AN ENVIRONMENTAL REVIEW DOCUMENT TO RE-EVALUATE AND ALLOW THE CONSTRUCTION OF THE DOW'S WATER PLAN 2020 NO. PLH-35B CONSTRUCT KAPAIA CANE HAUL ROAD [19-INCH] 18-INCH MAIN PROJECT. PROVIDED THAT NO STATE FUNDS SHALL BE EXPENDED UNLESS THE COUNTY OF KAUAI CONTRIBUTES MATCHING COUNTY FUNDS FOR STATE FUNDS ON A DOLLAR-FOR-DOLLAR BASIS. TOTAL FUNDING          COK            375 C C COK            375 S         S" SECTION 17. Provided that of the general obligation bond fund appropriation for school-based budgeting (EDN100), the sum of $71,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 may be used for capital improvement projects and deferred maintenance projects with the following projects given priority; provided further that the department of education shall submit a summary report regarding the use of this appropriation for the previous twelve month period from December 1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027: 1. AINA HAINA ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR PAVING THE MAUKA LOT OUTSIDE OF THE BACK CATTLE GATE FOR PARKING, FENCE SURROUNDING PARKING LOT AND CAMPUS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 2. CASTLE HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR DEFERRED MAINTENANCE INCLUDING REROOFING PORTABLES 1-10 AND GUTTER REPLACEMENT CAMPUS-WIDE; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 3. CASTLE HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR RONALD E. BRIGHT PERFORMING ARTS CENTER SEATING, LIGHTING REPLACEMENT, AND OTHER IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 4. HONOKAA ELEMENTARY SCHOOL AND HONOKAA HIGH AND INTERMEDIATE SCHOOL, HAWAII; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR CAFETERIA REFRIGERATION SYSTEMS REPAIRS AND IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 5. JARRETT MIDDLE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR PARKING LOT IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 6. KAEWAI ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR PARKING LOT IMPROVEMENTS AND EXPANSION; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 7. KAIMUKI HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR DEFERRED MAINTENANCE INCLUDING AUDITORIUM REROOFING AND L BUILDING SEWER LINE RELOCATION; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 8. KAIMUKI MIDDLE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR THE REPLACEMENT OF WATER PIPING; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; 9. KALIHI KAI ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR F BUILDING ROOF REPAIRS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 10. KE KULA KAIAPUNI O ANUENUE, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR A BUILDING FIRST AND SECOND FLOOR RRM; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCE; 11. KEALAKEHE HIGH SCHOOL, HAWAII; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR DEFERRED MAINTENANCE INCLUDING V BUILDING AC REPLACEMENT, EXTERIOR REPAINTING FOR A, BB, D, E, F, I, J, AND Q BUILDINGS, AND INTERIOR AND EXTERIOR PAINTING FOR SBBH BUILDING; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 12. KING INTERMEDIATE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION TO ADDRESS DEFERRED MAINTENANCE INCLUDING D BUILDING ELECTRICAL UPGRADES, F BUILDING STRUCTURAL EVALUATION, CAMPUS WALKWAY AND SPALLING REPAIRS, K BUILDING WATERPROOFING UPPER WALLS, C BUILDING WATER LINE REPLACEMENT, FIELD MAINTENANCE/RESODDING, AND A BUILDING EROSION CONTROL IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 13. MOANALUA MIDDLE SCHOOL, OAHU; PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR PLANNED CAMPUS-WIDE ELECTRICAL UPGRADES; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 14. PALOLO ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR CAMPUS REPAINTING EXTERIOR; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 15. PRESIDENT ABRAHAM LINCOLN ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR INSTALLATION OF A FENCE TO SECURE THE WEST SIDE OF THE CAMPUS; EXTEND THE FENCE LINKING TO THE EXISTING FENCE; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 16. RADFORD HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR PARKING LOT IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 17. WAIAKEA INTERMEDIATE SCHOOL, HAWAII; GENERAL MAINTENANCE AND FACILITY IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 18. WAIKIKI ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION TO ADDRESS BUILDING G GROUND SETTLEMENT ISSUES; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; 19. WAILUKU ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, MAUI; PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR PARKING LOT IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 20. WAIPAHU INTERMEDIATE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR GENERAL REPAIRS FOR WATER MAIN; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; AND 21. WAIPAHU INTERMEDIATE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR CAFETERIA HEAT ABATEMENT; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. SECTION 18.  Provided that of the general obligation bond fund appropriation for school-based budgeting (EDN100), the sum of $40,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 may be used for capital improvement projects and health and safety projects with the following projects given priority; provided further that the department of education shall submit a summary report regarding the use of this appropriation for the previous twelve month period from December 1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027: 1. KAHALUU ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR FIRE ALARM UPGRADES INCLUDING SYSTEM MONITORING; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 2. KALAKAUA MIDDLE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR FIRE ALARM UPGRADES INCLUDING SYSTEM MONITORING; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 3. KANEOHE ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR REPLACEMENT OF FIRE ALARM SYSTEM INCLUDING SYSTEM MONITORING; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 4. NANAKULI HIGH AND INTERMEDIATE SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR REPLACEMENT OF CAMPUS FIRE ALARM SYSTEM INCLUDING SYSTEM MONITORING; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; AND 5. PUUHALE ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR FIRE ALARM UPGRADES INCLUDING SYSTEM MONITORING; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. SECTION 19.  Provided that of the general obligation bond fund appropriation for school-based budgeting (EDN100), the sum of $18,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 may be used for capital improvement projects and support projects with the following projects given priority; provided further that the department of education shall submit a summary report regarding the use of this appropriation for the previous twelve month period from December 1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027: 1. AIEA HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR VISITOR BLEACHERS, DRAINAGE, AND ACCESS IMPROVEMENTS AT THE ATHLETIC STADIUM; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 2. HILO HIGH SCHOOL, HAWAII; PLANS, DESIGN, AND CONSTRUCTION FOR BLEACHERS FOR THE FOOTBALL FIELD/TRACK; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 3. KAILUA HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR TRACK AND FIELD IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 4. KILAUEA ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, KAUAI; DESIGN FOR A COVERED PLAY COURT; 5. KUHIO ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR A COVERED WALKWAY/RAMP AND ACCESSIBLE ROUTE IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 6. WAIMEA HIGH SCHOOL, KAUAI; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR GYMNASIUM RELATED FACILITIES AND IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS, EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 7. WAIPAHU HIGH SCHOOL SOFTBALL FIELD IMPROVEMENTS - PHASE 2, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR IMPROVEMENTS TO THE WAIPAHU HIGH SCHOOL SOFTBALL FIELD; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 8. WAIPAHU INTERMEDIATE SCHOOL, OAHU; PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR NEW COVERED ATHLETIC COURT; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; AND 9. WEBLING ELEMENTARY SCHOOL, OAHU; PLANS AND DESIGN FOR A NEW MAIN OFFICE OR EXPANSION TO THE EXISTING OFFICE. SECTION 20.  Provided that of the general obligation bond fund appropriation for school-based budgeting (EDN100), the sum of $16,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 may be used for capital improvement projects and compliance projects with the following projects given priority; provided further that the department of education shall submit a summary report regarding the use of this appropriation for the previous twelve month period from December 1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027: 1. MOANALUA HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; PLANS AND DESIGN OF GIRLS ATHLETIC LOCKER ROOM, WEIGHT ROOM, AND OTHER FACILITIES; 2. RADFORD HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR SOFTBALL IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; 3. ROOSEVELT HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION FOR THE GIRLS ATHLETIC LOCKER ROOM; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES; AND 4. WAIANAE HIGH SCHOOL, OAHU; PLANS, DESIGN, CONSTRUCTION, AND EQUIPMENT FOR SOFTBALL FIELD IMPROVEMENTS; GROUND AND SITE IMPROVEMENTS; EQUIPMENT AND APPURTENANCES. SECTION 21.  Provided that of the general obligation bond fund appropriation for school-based budgeting (EDN100), the sum of $50,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 may be used for capital improvement project completion; provided further that the department of education shall submit a summary report regarding the use of this appropriation for the previous twelve month period from December 1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. SECTION 22.  Provided that of the general obligation bond funds to be deposited into the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation's (BED160) rental housing revolving fund for fiscal year 2025-2026, the sum of $56,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary shall be utilized for the Hawaii public housing authority's Ka Lei Momi development Mayor Wright Homes project on Oahu; provided further that if construction does not commence by August 31, 2026, the deposited funds may be utilized for other affordable housing projects of the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation; and provided further that the construction commencement date may be extended with the approval of the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation's board of directors and the governor. SECTION 23.  Provided that of the general obligation bond funds to be deposited into the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation's (BED160) rental housing revolving fund for fiscal year 2025-2026, the sum of $3,050,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary shall be utilized for the Hawaii public housing authority's Ka Lei Momi predevelopment Kaahumanu Homes project on Oahu. SECTION 24.  Provided that of the general obligation bond funds to be deposited into the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation's (BED160) rental housing revolving fund for fiscal year 2025-2026, the sum of $4,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary shall be utilized for the Hawaii public housing authority's Ka Lei Momi predevelopment Kapaa Homes project on Kauai. SECTION 25.  Provided that of the general obligation bond funds to be deposited into the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation's (BED160) rental housing revolving fund for fiscal year 2025-2026, the sum of $4,200,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary shall be utilized for the Hawaii public housing authority's Ka Lei Momi predevelopment Lanakila Homes project on Hawaii. SECTION 26.  Provided that of the general obligation bond funds to be deposited into the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation's (BED160) rental housing revolving fund for fiscal year 2025-2026, the sum of $750,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary shall be utilized for the Hawaii public housing authority's Ka Lei Momi predevelopment Nanakuli Homes project on Oahu. SECTION 27. Provided that the general fund and general obligation bond fund appropriations for Maui Health System, a KFH LLC (HTH214), for fiscal biennium 2025-2027 shall be disbursed by the Hawaii health systems corporation to the Maui Health System, a Kaiser Foundation Hospitals LLC, for its capital subsidies in the respective fiscal years; provided further that the Maui Health System has satisfied all of the standards and conditions of section 323F-58, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 28.  Provided that of the general obligation bond funds and revenue bond funds for UHM Student Housing Services Improvements (UOH100), the sums of $30,750,000 out of general obligation bond funds, and $30,750,000 out of revenue bond funds, or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026, and the sums of $28,500,000 out of general obligation bond funds and $28,500,000 out of revenue bond funds, or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027, shall be used for planning, design, construction, equipment, and furnishing of improvements for university of Hawaii at Manoa student housing services facilities and pedestrian pathways; provided further that students residing in the university of Hawaii student housing services program with a demonstrated financial need, as determined by the university of Hawaii, who qualify for the resident tuition fee pursuant to section 304A-402, Hawaii Revised Statutes, are assisted with a housing allowance, stipend, or similar financial aid to help offset a portion of an increase in room and board costs that are due to increased debt service from said revenue bonds; and provided further that any unexpended and unencumbered balance of the appropriation shall not lapse at the end of fiscal year 2026-2027 and shall lapse instead on June 30, 2030. PART VII. ISSUANCE OF BONDS SECTION 29. AIRPORT REVENUE BONDS.  The department of transportation is authorized to issue airport revenue bonds for airport capital improvement program projects authorized in part II and listed in part V of this Act and designated to be financed by revenue bond funds or by general obligation bond funds with debt service costs to be paid from special funds, in such principal amount as shall be required to yield the amounts appropriated for such capital improvement program projects, and, if so determined by the department and approved by the governor, any additional principal amount as may be necessary by the department to pay interest on such airport revenue bonds during the estimated period of construction of the capital improvement program project for which such airport revenue bonds are issued, to establish, maintain, or increase reserves for the airport revenue bonds and to pay the expenses of issuance of such bonds.  The airport revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant to the provisions of part III of chapter 39, Hawaii Revised Statutes, as the same may be amended from time to time. The principal of and interest on airport revenue bonds, to the extent not paid from the proceeds of such bonds, shall be payable solely from and secured solely by the revenues from airports and related facilities under the ownership of the State or operated and managed by the department and the aviation fuel taxes levied and paid pursuant to sections 243-4(a)(2) and 248-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, or such parts of either thereof as the department may determine, including rents, landing fees, and other fees or charges presently or hereafter derived from or arising through the ownership, operation, and management of airports and related facilities and the furnishing and supplying of the services thereof, and passenger facility charges pursuant to section 261-5.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, as amended, and as determined by the department.  The expenses of the issuance of such airport revenue bonds shall, to the extent not paid from the proceeds of such bonds, be paid from the airport revenue fund and passenger facility charge special fund as determined by the department. The governor, in the governor's discretion, is authorized to use the airport revenue fund and passenger facility charge special fund to finance those projects authorized in part II and listed in part V of this Act where the method of financing is designated to be by airport revenue bond funds. SECTION 30. RENTAL MOTOR VEHICLE CUSTOMER FACILITY REVENUE BONDS.  The department of transportation is authorized to issue rental motor vehicle customer facility revenue bonds for airport capital improvement program projects relating to consolidated rental car facilities authorized in part II and listed in part V of this Act and designated to be financed by revenue bond funds with debt service cost to be paid from rental motor vehicle customer facility charge special funds, as authorized by section 261-5.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, in such principal amount as shall be required to yield the amounts appropriated for such capital improvement program projects, and, if so determined by the department and approved by the governor, any additional principal amount as may be necessary by the department to pay interest on the rental motor vehicle customer facility revenue bonds during the estimated period of construction of the capital improvement program project for which the rental motor vehicle customer facility revenue bonds are issued, to establish, maintain, or increase reserves for the rental motor vehicle customer facility revenue bonds and to pay the expenses of issuance of the bonds.  The rental motor vehicle customer facility revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant to the provisions of part III of chapter 39, Hawaii Revised Statutes, as the same may be amended from time to time. The principal of and interest on rental motor vehicle customer facility revenue bonds, to the extent not paid from the proceeds of such bonds, shall be payable solely from and secured solely by the revenues from the rental motor vehicle surcharge tax and the rental motor vehicle customer facility charge special fund pursuant to section 261-5.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, as amended, and as determined by the department.  The expenses of the issuance of such rental motor vehicle customer facility revenue bonds, to the extent not paid from the proceeds of such bonds shall be paid from the rental motor vehicle customer facility charge special fund as determined by the department. The governor, in the governor's discretion, is authorized to use the rental motor vehicle customer facility charge special fund to finance those projects authorized in part II and listed in part V of this Act where the method of financing is designated to be by rental motor vehicle customer facility revenue bond funds. SECTION 31. HARBOR REVENUE BONDS.  The department of transportation is authorized to issue harbor revenue bonds for harbor capital improvement program projects authorized in part II and listed in part V of this Act and designated to be financed by revenue bond funds or by general obligation bond funds with debt service cost to be paid from special funds, in such principal amount as shall be required to yield the amounts appropriated for such capital improvement program projects, and, if so determined by the department and approved by the governor, such additional amounts as may be deemed necessary by the department to pay interest on such revenue bonds during the estimated construction period of the capital improvement project for which such harbor revenue bonds are issued to establish, maintain, or increase reserves for the harbor revenue bonds or harbor revenue bonds heretofore authorized (whether authorized and issued or authorized and still unissued), and to pay the expenses of issuance of such bonds.  The aforementioned harbor revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant to the provisions of part III of chapter 39, Hawaii Revised Statutes, as the same may be amended from time to time.  The principal of and interest on harbor revenue bonds, to the extent not paid from the proceeds of such bonds, shall be payable solely from and secured solely by the revenues derived from harbors and related facilities under the ownership of the State or operated and managed by the department, including rents, mooring, wharfage, dockage, pilotage fees, and other fees or charges presently or hereafter derived from or arising through the ownership, operation, and management of harbor and related facilities and the furnishing and supplying of the services thereof.  The expenses of the issuance of such harbor revenue bonds shall, to the extent not paid from the proceeds of such bonds, be paid from the harbor special fund. The governor, in the governor's discretion, is authorized to use the harbor revenue fund to finance those projects authorized in part II and listed in part V of this Act where the method of financing is designated to be by harbor revenue bond funds. SECTION 32. HIGHWAY REVENUE BONDS.  The department of transportation is authorized to issue highway revenue bonds for highway capital improvement program projects authorized in part II and listed in part V of this Act and designated to be financed by revenue bond funds or by general obligation bond funds with the debt service cost to be paid from special funds, in such principal amount as shall be required to yield the amounts appropriated for such capital improvement projects, and, if so determined by the department and approved by the governor, such additional principal amount as may be deemed necessary by the department to pay interest on such highway revenue bonds during the estimated period of construction of the capital improvement project for which such highway revenue bonds are issued, to establish, maintain, or increase reserves for such highway revenue bonds or highway revenue bonds heretofore authorized (whether authorized and issued or authorized and still unissued), and to pay all or any part of the expenses related to the issuance of such highway revenue bonds.  The aforementioned highway revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant to the provisions of part III of chapter 39, Hawaii Revised Statutes, as the same may be amended from time to time.  The principal of and interest on such highway revenue bonds, to the extent not paid from the proceeds of such highway revenue bonds, shall be payable from and secured by the revenues derived from highways and related facilities under the ownership of the State or operated and managed by the department, from the highway fuel taxes, vehicle weight taxes, and vehicle registration fees, levied and paid pursuant to sections 243-4, 248-8, 249-31, and 249-33, Hawaii Revised Statutes, and federal moneys received by the State or any department thereof which are available to pay principal of or interest on indebtedness of the State, or such part of any thereof as the department may determine, and other user taxes, fees or charges currently or hereafter derived from or arising through the ownership, operation, and management of highways and related facilities and the furnishing and supplying of the services thereof.  The expenses related to the issuance of such highway revenue bonds, to the extent not paid from the proceeds of such bonds, shall be paid from the state highway fund. The governor, in the governor's discretion, is authorized to use the state highway fund to finance those projects authorized in part II and listed in part V of this Act where the method of financing is designated to be by highway revenue bond funds; provided that the governor shall submit a report of all uses of this authority for the previous twelve month period from December 1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. PART VIII.  SPECIAL PROVISIONS SECTION 33. GOVERNOR'S DISCRETIONARY POWERS. Any law or provision to the contrary notwithstanding, the governor may replace general obligation bond funds appropriated for capital improvement projects with general obligation reimbursable bond funds, when the expenditure of such general obligation reimbursable bond funds is deemed appropriate for the project. SECTION 34. All general obligation bond funds used for a public undertaking, improvement, or system designated by the letter (D) shall have the bond principal and interest reimbursed from the special fund in which the net revenue, or net user tax receipts, or combination of both, of such public undertaking, improvement, or system are deposited or credited.  Bonds issued for irrigation and housing projects shall be reimbursed as provided by section 174-21 and chapter 201H, Hawaii Revised Statutes, respectively. The governor is authorized to use, at the governor's discretion, the state highway fund, the harbor special fund, the boating special fund, the airport revenue fund, the special land and development fund, or other appropriate special funds to finance the respective public undertaking, improvement, or system described above and authorized in this Act, where the method of financing is designated to be general obligation bond fund with debt service cost to be paid from the funds. SECTION 35. The governor may supplement funds for any cost element for a capital improvement project authorized under this Act by transferring sums as may be needed from the funds appropriated for other cost elements of the same project by this Act or any other prior or future act that has not lapsed; provided that the total expenditure of funds for all cost elements shall not exceed the total appropriations for that project. SECTION 36. If the authorized appropriations specified for a capital improvement project listed in this Act are insufficient and where the source of funding is designated as airport passenger facility charge funds, the governor may make supplemental allotments from the airport revenue fund or airport revenue bond funds, or transfer unrequired balances from other unlapsed projects in this Act or prior appropriation acts that authorized the use of airport passenger facility charge funds; provided further that the supplemental allotments shall not be used to increase the scope of the project; provided further that the supplemental allotments shall not impair the ability of the fund to meet the purposes for which it was established; and provided further that the governor, at the governor's discretion, is authorized to increase the passenger facility charge fund authorization ceiling for the program to accommodate the expenditure of those funds. SECTION 37. In the event that the authorized appropriations specified for a capital improvement project for the department of transportation listed in this Act are insufficient and where the source of funding is designated as special funds, general obligation bond fund with debt service cost to be paid from special funds, revenue bond funds, or revolving funds, the governor may make supplemental allotments from the special fund or revolving fund responsible for cash or debt service payments for the projects, or transfer unrequired balances from other unlapsed projects in this Act or prior appropriation acts that authorized the use of special funds, general obligation bond fund with debt service costs to be paid from special funds, revenue bond funds, or revolving funds; provided that such supplemental allotments shall not be used to increase the scope of the project; and provided further that such supplemental allotments shall not impair the ability of the fund to meet the purposes for which it was established; and provided further that the governor shall submit a report of all uses of this authority for the previous twelve month period from December 1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. SECTION 38. After the objectives and purposes of appropriations made in this Act from the general obligation bond fund for capital improvement projects for the university of Hawaii have been met, unrequired balances shall be transferred to the university of Hawaii project adjustment fund appropriated in part II and described in part V of this Act, and shall be considered a supplementary appropriation thereto; provided that all other unrequired allotment balances, unrequired appropriation balances, and unrequired encumbrance balances shall lapse as of June 30, 2028, as provided in section 44 of this Act. SECTION 39.  If authorized appropriations specified for university of Hawaii capital improvement projects listed in this Act or in any other act currently authorized by the legislature are insufficient, and where the source of funding for the project is designated as the general obligation bond fund, the governor may make supplemental allotments from the university of Hawaii project adjustment fund appropriated in part II and described in part V of this Act to supplement any currently authorized capital investment project cost elements for the university of Hawaii; provided that such supplemental allotments from the project adjustment fund shall not be used to increase the scope of the project; and provided further that the governor shall submit a report of all uses of this authority for the previous twelve month period from December 1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. SECTION 40.  After the objectives and purposes of appropriations made in this Act from the general obligation bond fund for capital improvement projects for the department of accounting and general services, including any project the department of accounting and general services has been designated as the expending agency for, have been met, unrequired balances shall be transferred to the department of accounting and general services project adjustment fund appropriated in part II and described in part V of this Act, and shall be considered a supplementary appropriation thereto; provided that all other unrequired allotment balances, unrequired appropriation balances, and unrequired encumbrance balances shall lapse as of June 30, 2028, as provided in section 44 of this Act. SECTION 41.  If authorized appropriations specified for department of accounting and general services capital improvement projects, including any project the department of accounting and general services has been designated as the expending agency for, listed in this Act or in any other act currently authorized by the legislature are insufficient, and where the source of funding for the project is designated as the general obligation bond fund, the governor may make supplemental allotments from the department of accounting and general services project adjustment fund appropriated in part II and described in part V of this Act to supplement any currently authorized capital investment project cost elements for the department of accounting and general services; provided that such supplemental allotments from the project adjustment fund shall not be used to increase the scope of the project; and provided further that the governor shall submit a report of all uses of this authority for the previous twelve month period from December 1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. SECTION 42.  After the objectives and purposes of appropriations made in this Act from the revenue bond fund for capital improvement projects for the department of transportation airports division have been met, unrequired balances shall be transferred to the airports project adjustment fund appropriated in part II and described in part V of this Act, and shall be considered a supplementary appropriation thereto; provided that all other unrequired allotment balances, unrequired appropriation balances, and unrequired encumbrance balances shall lapse as of June 30, 2028, as provided in section 44 of this Act. SECTION 43.  If authorized appropriations specified for department of transportation airports division capital improvement projects listed in this Act or in any other act currently authorized by the legislature are insufficient, and where the source of funding for the project is designated as the revenue bond fund, the governor may make supplemental allotments from the airports project adjustment fund appropriated in part II and described in part V of this Act to supplement any currently authorized capital investment cost elements for the department of transportation airports division; provided that such supplemental allotments from the project adjustment fund shall not be used to increase the scope of the project; and provided further that the governor shall submit a report of all uses of this authority for the previous twelve month period from December 1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. SECTION 44.  Any provision of this Act to the contrary notwithstanding, the appropriations made for capital improvement projects authorized under this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all appropriations made to be expended in fiscal biennium 2025-2027 that are unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date; provided further that this lapsing date shall not apply to non-general fund appropriations for projects described in part V of this Act where such appropriations have been deemed necessary to qualify for federal aid financing and reimbursement and are unencumbered as of June 30, 2032, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 45.  In releasing funds for capital improvement projects, the governor shall consider legislative intent and the objectives of the user agency and its programs; the scope and level of the user agency's intended service; and the means, efficiency, and economics by which the project will meet the objectives of the user agency and the State; provided further that agencies responsible for construction shall take into consideration legislative intent, the objectives of the user agency and its programs, and the scope and level of the user agency's intended service and construct the improvement to meet the objectives of the user agency in the most efficient and economical manner possible. SECTION 46.  With the approval of the governor, designated expending agencies for capital improvement projects authorized in this Act may delegate to other state or county agencies the implementation of projects when it is determined advantageous to do so by both the original expending agency and the agency to which expending authority is to be delegated. SECTION 47.  Where county capital improvement projects are partially or totally funded by state grants as authorized in this Act or any other act of the legislature, this fact should be appropriately acknowledged during construction and upon completion of these projects. SECTION 48. Whenever the expending agency to which an appropriation is made is changed due to legislation enacted during any session of the legislature that affects the appropriations made by this Act, the governor shall transfer the necessary funds and positions to the proper expending agency as provided by law. SECTION 49. If unanticipated federal funding cutbacks diminish or curtail essential, federally-funded state programs, the governor may utilize savings as determined to be available from other state programs for the purpose of maintaining such programs until the next legislative session; provided that the governor shall submit a report of all uses of this authority for the previous twelve month period from December 1 to November 30 to the legislature no later than thirty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. SECTION 50. With the approval of the governor, agencies that use appropriations authorized in part II of this Act for audit services may delegate that responsibility and transfer funds to the internal post audit program (AGS104), when it is determined by such agencies that it is advantageous to do so. SECTION 51.  Agencies with appropriations authorized in part II of this Act for risk management costs shall transfer funds authorized for that purpose to the state risk management and insurance division (AGS203) for the administration and implementation of state risk management costs and expenses, except as otherwise provided by law. SECTION 52.  With the approval of the governor, the Hawaii health systems corporation in the department of health may transfer to the department of human services funds appropriated to the Hawaii health systems corporation for the care and treatment of patients, whenever the department of human services can utilize such funds to match federal funds that may be available to help finance the cost of outpatient, acute hospital, or long-term care of indigents or medical indigents in designated critical access hospitals. SECTION 53.  With the approval of the governor, the department of health may transfer to the department of human services funds appropriated to the department of health for the care and treatment of patients, whenever the department of human services can utilize such funds to match federal funds to finance the cost of outpatient, hospital, or skilled nursing home care of indigents or medical indigents. SECTION 54.  The department of human services may enter into agreements with the department of health to furnish outpatient, hospital, and skilled nursing home care of indigents or medical indigents and to pay the department of health for such care; provided that with the approval of the director of finance, the department of health may deposit part of such receipts into the appropriations from which transfers were made as provided elsewhere in this Act. PART IX. MISCELLANEOUS AND EFFECTIVE DATE SECTION 55. If any portion of this Act or its application to any person, entity, or circumstance is held to be invalid for any reason, then the legislature declares that the remainder of this Act and each and every other provision of this Act shall not be affected thereby. If any portion of a specific appropriation is held to be invalid for any reason, the remaining portion shall be expended to fulfill the objective of such appropriation to the extent possible. SECTION 56. In the event manifest clerical, typographical, or other mechanical errors are found in this Act, the governor is hereby authorized to correct such errors. SECTION 57. Material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New material in prior enacted laws is underscored. SECTION 58. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.